rufe ich geschwind: Herein! 
       
Woran soll es gehn? Ans Sterben? 
Hab ich zwar noch nie gemacht, 
doch wir werd'n das Kind schon schaukeln-- 
na, das wre ja gelacht! 
       
Interessant so eine Sanduhr! 
Ja, die halt ich gern mal fest. 
Ach--und das ist Ihre Sense? 
Und die gibt mir dann den Rest? 
       
Wohin soll ich mich jetzt wenden? 
Links? Von Ihnen aus gesehn? 
Ach, von mir aus! Bis zur Grube? 
Und wie soll es weitergehn? 
       
Ja, die Uhr ist abgelaufen. 
Wollen Sie die jetzt zurck? 
Gibt's die irgendwo zu kaufen? 
Ein so ausgefall'nes Stck 
       
Findet man nicht alle Tage, 
womit ich nur sagen will 
--ach! Ich soll hier nichts mehr sagen? 
Geht in Ordnung! Bin schon





kommentar/comment
 

that never 
would he write 
his autobiography 

because his life 
seemed to him 
just so much filth 

that only a few 
points, bloody ones 
he still remembers 

but that he would 
never hesitate 
to reach into the filth 

to pull out 
what perhaps 
could serve as stuff 

for poetry 
his disgusting 
purpose in life 

* * * 

da niemals 
er schreiben werde 
seine autobiographie 

da ihm sein leben 
viel zu sehr 
als dreck erscheine 

da auch nur wenige 
punkte, blutige 
er noch erinnere 

da aber niemals 
er zgern werde 
in den dreck zu fassen 

um herauszuziehen 
was vielleicht 
einen stoff abgbe 

fr poesie 
seinen widerlichen 
lebenszweck 







Free Verses
 

Last night I awoke knew
That I should say goodbye now
To these verses. That's how it always goes
After a few years. They have to get out
Into the world. It's not possible to keep them
Forever! here under the roof.
Poor things. They must set out for town.
A few will be allowed to return later.
But most of them are still hanging around out there.
Who knows what will become of them. Before they
Find their peace.





Ingeborg Bachmann stirbt in Rom/Ingeborg Bachmann Dies in Rome
 

One death comes
before another.
Breath and smoke.
And smoke which puts out breath.
And silence.

But sometimes only a cigarette
helps you keep your grip. And keeps
its promises more quickly, too.
Between yellowed fingers
it burns like love becomes ashes
like betrayal. Breath and smoke.

The three fingers of oath curved
around the cigarette: to
not forswear.
Giordano burns on the Campo de Fiori.
The bells of Santa Maria Maggiore
are still pealing for the auto-da-f.

Breath and smoke.
And smoke which puts out breath.
And to write with
a burned hand about fire.
And the borders of the German language
are mined with murderous accidents.
One death comes before another.


* * *


Ein Tod kommt
vor dem andern.
Atem und Rauch.
Und Rauch der Atem lscht.
Und Schweigen.

Manchmal ist aber eine Zigarette
der letzte Halt. Und hlt
was sie verspricht auch schneller.
Zwischen vergilbten Fingern
brennts wie Liebe wird Asche
wie Verrat. Atem und Rauch.

Die Schwurfinger gekrmmt
um die Zigarette: um
nicht abzuschwren.
Giordano brennt auf dem Campo de Fiori.
Die Glocken von Santa Maria Maggiore
gellen noch immer zum Autodaf.

Atem und Rauch.
Und Rauch der Atem lscht.
Und mit verbrannter Hand
ber das Feuer schreiben.
Und die Grenzen der deutschen Sprache
sind mit mrderischen Zufllen vermint.
Ein Tod kommt dem andern zuvor.





An Interview
 

Yes, I've been in Rome, at least two times,
though on second thought it probably was
three or maybe five. When was the last?
That's easy, for I remember it exactly--
at least what it was like when I first left.
You mean a part of you remains in Rome?

Not really, for when I was first in Rome
I was truly there. That ended the second time,
though I only realized it when I first left.
So when you were in Rome your last time was
consumed by thoughts of leaving? Not exactly.
As time went on, I came around at last,

thinking: obsess about leaving and nothing lasts;
I'll end up never having been in Rome.
Yet back then did you know just what exactly
it meant to be in Rome during that time
you thought about leaving, even if it was
then you saw what you'd lose if you had left?

Even at the time when I first left
I'd no idea. But you're not saying the last
you saw of Rome was your third visit, for wasn't
it earlier that you felt you'd never leave Rome?
No, all that happened there my second time,
though to this day I feel about Rome exactly

what I felt from the first. What that means exactly
is hard to say, for perhaps I never left,
since after all, my being there the first time
didn't involve my leaving. Tell me then, at last,
was it once or twice? were you really in Rome?
Why certainly--I'm sure, I know I was,

and on top of that you might even say I was
there time and again, everything there exactly
just the same, or like my last time in Rome,
me feeling as if I'd never really left.
But tell me now precisely, was the last
you saw of Rome indeed that second time?

To be exact, it happened the very first time
that I saw Rome, darkness falling as I left
causing me to see what simply couldn't last.





Grber/Graves
 

From here into the north, the ways are 
dry. Yellow grass, 
thirst in the roots. In the hearts. 
It's all simple, but false. 
      
When I try to think history, 
the enormous vertebrae 
of the dinosaur behind the purple beeches 
in Invalidenstrasse, 
Bismarck in marble, 
and Benn, a nameplate on Bozener, lifeless. 
      
In the depths of the bunkers 
on Potsdamer Platz in Berlin 
are the shoes of Hitler's favorite horse. 
Profile of power: armor and helmet. 
In our pants pockets, we crumple 
the banners. Full of satisfaction 
we hear the flags splinter 
in the fabric's darkness. 
      
Don't forget the poets' loaded dice. 
When iron rules again, 
we will have to console ourselves, 
adorn stones with smaller stones, 
the heart with water. 
      

* * * 


Von hier in den Norden sind die Wege 
trocken. Gelbes Gras, 
Durst in den Wurzeln. Im Herzen. 
Alles ist einfach, aber falsch. 
      
Wenn ich versuche, Geschichte zu denken, 
die riesigen Wirbelknochen 
des Sauriers hinter den Blutbuchen 
in der Invalidenstrae, 
Bismarck in Marmor, 
und Benn, ein Klingelschild in der Bozener, leblos. 
      
In den Tiefen der Bunker 
des Potsdamer Platzes in Berlin 
liegen die Hufeisen von Hitlers Lieblingspferd. 
Profile der Macht: Harnisch und Helm. 
In der Hosentasche zerknicken wir 
die Standarten. Voll Genugtuung 
hren wir die Fahnen splittern 
im Dunkel des Stoffs. 
      
Verget nicht die geflschten Wrfel der Dichter. 
Wenn die Eisernen wieder herrschen, 
werden wir uns trsten mssen, 
Steine schmcken mit kleinen Steinen, 
mit Wasser das Herz.





Noahs Wife
 

is doing her usual for comic relief.   
                        She doesn't 
               see why she should get on the boat, etc., 

etc., while life as we know it hangs by a thread.   
                        Even God 
               has had one or two great deadpan lines: 

Who told you (this was back at the start-- 
                        the teeth 
               of the tautology had just snapped shut) Who 

told you you were naked? The world   
                        was so new 
               that death hadn't been till this minute 

required. What makes you think (the   
                        ground 
               withers under their feet) we were told? 
 
The woman's disobedience is good for   
                        plot, 
               as also for restoring plot to human 

scale: three hundred cubits by fifty   
                        by what? 
               What's that in inches exactly? Whereas 

all obstinate wife is common coin.   
                        In 
               the beginning was nothing and then a flaw 

in the nothing, a sort of mistake that amplified, the   
                        nothing 
               mistranscribed (it takes such discipline 

to keep the prospect clean) and now the lion   
                        whelps, 
               the beetle rolls its ball of dung, and Noah 

with no more than a primitive double- 
                        entry audit   
               is supposed to make it right. 

We find the Creator in an awkward bind.   
                        Washed back 
               to oblivion? Think again. The housewife 

at her laundry tub has got a better grip.    
                        Which may 
               be why we've tried to find her laughable, 

she's such an unhappy reminder of what   
                        understanding 
               costs. Ask the boy who cannot, though 

God know's he's tried, he swears   
                        each bar 
               of melting soap will be his last, who cannot 

turn the water off when once he's turned it on.   
                        His hands 
               are raw. His body seems like filth to him. 

Who told you (the pharmacopoeia has   
                        changed, 
               the malady's still the same) Who told you 

you were food for worms? 
                        What 
               makes you think (the furrow, the fruit) 

I had to be told?





Natural Selection
 

proceeds by chance
and necessity

becomes nonrandom
through randomness

builds complexity
from simplicity

nurtures consciousness
unconsciously

evolves purposelessly
creatures who demand

purpose
and discover

natural selection





Late Confession
 

Monsignor, I believed Jesus followed me 
With his eyes, and when I slept, 
An angel peeled an orange 
And waited for me to wake up. 
This was 1962. I was ten, small as the flame 
Of a struck match, my lungs fiery 
From hard, wintery play. When I returned home, 
Legs hurting, I placed my hands on the windowsill 
And looked out--clouds dirty as towels 
And geese I have yet to see again 
Darkening the western sky. 

Monsignor, a machine 
Had painted on the eyes of my toy soldier, 
Little dots off-center, 
Almost on his cheeks. Such a cheap toy, 
I drowned him over and over in my bath, 
Drowned him until the painted-on eyes flaked off. 
Then a leg fell off--surge of dirty water 
Sunk him to the bottom. 

I now at this age place hands on the windowsill, 
My eyes nearly on my cheeks, 
My belly with its rising tide. 
There is no angel with an orange at the edge 
Of my bed. There is no soldier 
Of God. Only a pane between the inside 
And the outside, between this living 
And this dying. Monsignor, 
Saintly man of this child's wonderment, 
When will I see the geese again?





Egg
 

We are in the position of defining myth by the shape of its absence.          -Sean Kane, Wisdom of the Mythtellers
       The bluebird's cold mistimed egg
fetched up from the one-legged
       box after the pair had left for
points south & unknown (never,
       as it turned out, to return) I
renested in the half-geode by
       the windowsill where it gleamed
&, months becoming years, seemed
       about to last forever, grow more
consistent with itself, holding its pure
       blue firmament up over what by now
was nothing, till one January day, snow
       melting to a fast flood,
I blew it softly onto my palm so I could
       hold its cerulean up against new sky,
home against home, where it lay
       weightless & delicate as the Xmas ornament
we'd just put away, but when I went
       to roll it gently back onto its bed,
& leave it there, I saw a thread,
       a crack, another, watched it sink in
slowly on itself, shard on shard collapsing
       from my touch & breath, relaxing
into the shape of its absence





Becune Point
 

Stunned heat of noon. In shade, tan, silken cows 
hide in the thorned acacias. A butterfly staggers. 
      
Stamping their hooves from thirst, small horses drowse 
or whinny for water. On parched, ochre headlands, daggers 

of agave bristle in primordial defense, 
like a cornered monster backed up against the sea. 

A mongoose charges dry grass and fades through a fence 
faster than an afterthought. Dust rises easily. 

Haze of the Harmattan, Sahara dust, memory's haze 
from the dried well of Africa, the headland's desert 

or riders in swirling burnooses, mixed with the greys 
of hills veiled in Impressionist light. We inherit 
    
two worlds of associations, or references, drought 
that we heighten into Delacroix's North Africa, 

veils, daggers, lances, herds the Harmattan brought 
with a phantom inheritance, which the desperate seeker 

of a well-spring staggers in the heat in search of-- 
heroic ancestors; the other that the dry season brings 

is the gust of a European calendar, but it is the one love 
that thirsts for confirmations in the circling rings 

of the ground dove's cooing on stones, in the acacia's 
thorns and the agave's daggers, that they are all ours, 

the white horsemen of the Sahara, India's and Asia's 
plumed mongoose and crested palmtree, Benin and Pontoise. 

We are history's afterthought, as the mongoose races 
ahead of its time; in drought we discover our shadows, 

our origins that range from the most disparate places, 
from the dugouts of Guinea to the Nile's canted dhows. 


                                     II 

The incredible blue with its bird-inviting cloud, 
in which there are crumbling towers, banners and domes, 

and the sliding Carthage of sunsets, the marble shroud 
drawn over associations that are Greece's and Rome's 

and rarely of Africa. They continue at sixty-seven 
to echo in the corridors of the head, perspectives 

of a corridor in the Vatican that led, not to heaven, 
but to more paintings of heaven, ideas in lifted sieves 

drained by satiety because great art can exhaust us, 
and even the steadiest faith can be clogged by excess, 

the self-assured Christs, the Madonnas' inflexible postures 
without the mess of motherhood. With this blue I bless 

emptiness where these hills are barren of tributes 
and the repetitions of power, our sky's naive 

ceiling without domes and spires, an earth whose roots 
like the thorned acacia's deepen my belief.





The Afterlife: Letter to Sam Hamill
 

You may think it strange, Sam, that I'm writing 
a letter in these circumstances. I thought 
it strange too--the first time. But there's 
a misconception I was laboring under, and you 
are too, viz. that the imagination in your 
vicinity is free and powerful. After all, 
you say, you've been creating yourself all 
along imaginatively. You imagine yourself 
playing golf or hiking in the Olympics or 
writing a poem and then it becomes true. 
But you still have to do it, you have to exert 
yourself, will, courage, whatever you've got, you're 
mired in the unimaginative. Here I imagine a letter 
and it's written. Takes about two-fifths of a 
second, your time. Hell, this is heaven, man. 
I can deluge Congress with letters telling 
every one of those mendacious sons of bitches 
exactly what he or she is, in maybe about 
half an hour. In spite of your Buddhist 
proclivities, when you imagine bliss 
you still must struggle to get there. By the way 
the Buddha has his place across town on 
Elysian Drive. We call him Bud. He's lost weight 
and got new dentures, and he looks a hell of a 
lot better than he used to. He always carries 
a jumping jack with him everywhere just 
for contemplation, but he doesn't make it 
jump. He only looks at it. Meanwhile Sidney 
and Dizzy, Uncle Ben and Papa Yancey, are 
over by Sylvester's Grot making the sweetest, 
cheerfulest blues you ever heard. The air, 
so called, is full of it. Poems are fluttering 
everywhere like seed from a cottonwood tree. 
Sam, the remarkable truth is I can do any 
fucking thing I want. Speaking of which 
there's this dazzling young Naomi who 
wiped out on I-80 just west of Truckee 
last winter, and I think this is the moment 
for me to go and pay her my respects. 
Don't go way. I'll be right back.





Study in Orange and White
 

I knew that James Whistler was part of the Paris scene, 
but I was still surprised when I found the painting 
of his mother at the Muse d'Orsay 
among all the colored dots and mobile brushstrokes 
of the French Impressionists. 

And I was surprised to notice 
after a few minutes of benign staring, 
how that woman, stark in profile 
and fixed forever in her chair, 
began to resemble my own ancient mother 
who was now fixed forever in the stars, the air, the earth. 

You can understand why he titled the painting 
"Arrangement in Gray and Black" 
instead of what everyone naturally calls it, 
but afterward, as I walked along the river bank, 
I imagined how it might have broken 
the woman's heart to be demoted from mother 
to a mere composition, a study in colorlessness. 

As the summer couples leaned into each other 
along the quay and the wide, low-slung boats 
full of spectators slid up and down the Seine 
between the carved stone bridges 
and their watery reflections, 
I thought: how ridiculous, how off-base. 

It would be like Botticelli calling "The Birth of Venus" 
"Composition in Blue, Ochre, Green, and Pink," 
or the other way around 
like Rothko titling one of his sandwiches of color 
"Fishing Boats Leaving Falmouth Harbor at Dawn." 

Or, as I scanned the menu at the cafe 
where I now had come to rest, 
it would be like painting something laughable, 
like a chef turning on a spit 
over a blazing fire in front of an audience of ducks 
and calling it "Study in Orange and White." 

But by that time, a waiter had appeared 
with my glass of Pernod and a clear pitcher of water, 
and I sat there thinking of nothing 
but the women and men passing by-- 
mothers and sons walking their small fragile dogs-- 
and about myself, 
a kind of composition in blue and khaki, 
and, now that I had poured 
some water into the glass, milky-green.





Iceberg Lettuce
 

What vegetable leviathan
extends beneath the dinner table,
an unseen, monstrous green that pulls
the chair out from under our faith
 
in appearances: see a mere tuft
of leaf on the plate like a wing,
but if it flies away, it undoubtedly
will disturb the continental drift
 
asleep under the salad plate,
the hidden world we forget
as we reach for the smaller fork--
(and now, mouth full, don't speak: politely
 
chew your leaf of firmament
that's torn and tossed up in vinegar here as
we'll be tossed before its vast
root maybe someday or any moment).





Men Say Brown
 

On the radio this morning: The average woman knows
275 colors--and men know eight. Women say coffee,
mocha, copper, cinnamon, taupe. Men say brown.

Women know an Amazon of colors I might have said
were green, an Antarctica of whites, oceans of colors
I'd stupidly call blue, fields of color, with flowers in them
I would have said were red.

From women, I've learned to love the browns,
the earths, the dusts, the clays, the soft colors, the colors
brought out from the mines, hardened ones,
hardened in fires I would call red; the colors of the furies;
the reconciling colors of the cooling ash.

By myself I know the evening colors when the sky goes
from blue to another blue to black--although it's a lonely,
whitish black sometimes,
                                                                        like the color of sleep--
the way dreams are lit by the light that's thrown
from nowhere on the things you find in them. Last night
there was a turtle, I would say it was brown or green,
or it was a snake, mottled, a kind of grey, disguised
as a turtle, red spots as if painted on the shell,
a palish greenish underside--vulnerable, alone
swimming in water I would say was colorless.

I woke to the pale colors of the morning--no one
has a name for those: the white-rose white you see
through the white of the curtains on the window,
the milks, the creams, the cream a galactic swirl
before it turns to brown when your wife stirs it in the coffee,
the faint drying oval on the silver of the spoon.





The Kiss
 

By freezing passion at its blossoming
perhaps Rodin knew he challenged
Sophocles who said as lover you want
ice to be ice yet not melt
in your hands. How stone,
implying permanence, might let us believe,
a moment, the seated figures are beyond the leaf
that cannot keep from letting go the branch,
beyond even stupidly purpling grapes
that do not understand the process
by which they darken; darken nevertheless.





Canto III
 

Canto III appeared in the July, 1917 issue of Poetry. Originally part of what scholars call the "Ur-Cantos," this version of Canto III was later edited by Pound to become Canto I of his collected Cantos. The section that eventually became Canto I is highlighted in blue in the poem below. 
--THE EDITORS 


III 

Another's a half-cracked fellow--John Heydon, 
Worker of miracles, dealer in levitation, 
In thoughts upon pure form, in alchemy, 
Seer of pretty visions ("servant of God and secretary of nature");          
Full of plaintive charm, like Botticelli's, 
With half-transparent forms, lacking the vigor of gods. 
Thus Heydon, in a trance, at Bulverton, 
Had such a sight: 
Decked all in green, with sleeves of yellow silk 
Slit to the elbow, slashed with various purples. 
Her eyes were green as glass, her foot was leaf-like. 
She was adorned with choicest emeralds, 
And promised him the way of holy wisdom. 
"Pretty green bank," began the half-lost poem. 
Take the old way, say I met John Heydon,          
Sought out the place, 
Lay on the bank, was "plungd deep in swevyn;" 
And saw the company--Layamon, Chaucer-- 
Pass each in his appropriate robes; 
Conversed with each, observed the varying fashion. 
And then comes Heydon. 
                                 "I have seen John Heydon." 
Let us hear John Heydon! 
                                 "Omniformis 
Omnis intellectus est"--thus he begins, by spouting half of Psellus. 
(Then comes a note, my assiduous commentator: 
Not Psellus De Daemonibus, but Porphyry's Chances, 
In the thirteenth chapter, that "every intellect is omni-form.") 
Magnifico Lorenzo used the dodge, 
Says that he met Ficino 
In some Wordsworthian, false-pastoral manner, 
And that they walked along, stopped at a well-head, 
And heard deep platitudes about contentment 
From some old codger with an endless beard. 
"A daemon is not a particular intellect, 
But is a substance differed from intellect," 
Breaks in Ficino, 
"Placed in the latitude or locus of souls"-- 
That's out of Proclus, take your pick of them. 
Valla, more earth and sounder rhetoric-- 
Prefacing praise to his Pope Nicholas: 
"A man of parts, skilled in the subtlest sciences; 
A patron of the arts, of poetry; and of a fine discernment." 
Then comes a catalogue, his jewels of conversation. 
No, you've not read your Elegantiae-- 
A dull book?--shook the church. 
The prefaces, cut clear and hard: 
"Know then the Roman speech, a sacrament," 
Spread for the nations, eucharist of wisdom, 
Bread of the liberal arts. 
                                 Ha! Sir Blancatz, 
Sordello would have your heart to give to all the princes; 
Valla, the heart of Rome, 
Sustaining speech, set out before the people. 
"Nec bonus Christianus ac bonus 
                                 Tullianus." 
Marius, Du Bellay, wept for the buildings, 
Baldassar Castiglione saw Raphael 
"Lead back the soul into its dead, waste dwelling," 
Corpore laniato; and Lorenzo Valla, 
"Broken in middle life? bent to submission?-- 
Took a fat living from the Papacy" 
(That's in Villari, but Burckhardt's statement is different)-- 
"More than the Roman city, the Roman speech" 
(Holds fast its part among the ever-living). 
"Not by the eagles only was Rome measured." 
"Wherever the Roman speech was, there was Rome," 
Wherever the speech crept, there was mastery 
Spoke with the law's voice while your Greek, logicians... 
More Greeks than one! Doughty's "divine Homeros" 
Came before sophistry. Justinopolitan 
Uncatalogued Andreas Divus, 
Gave him in Latin, 1538 in my edition, the rest uncertain, 
Caught up his cadence, word and syllable: 
"Down to the ships we went, set mast and sail, 
Black keel and beasts for bloody sacrifice, 
Weeping we went." 
I've strained my ear for -ensa, -ombra, and -ensa 
And cracked my wit on delicate canzoni-- 
                   Here's but rough meaning: 

"And then went down to the ship, set keel to breakers, 
Forth on the godly sea; 
We set up mast and sail on the swarthy ship, 
Sheep bore we aboard her, and our bodies also 
Heavy with weeping. And winds from sternward 
Bore us out onward with bellying canvas-- 
Circe's this craft, the trim-coifed goddess. 
Then sat we amidships, wind jamming the tiller. 
Thus with stretched sail 
                   We went over sea till day's end: 
Sun to his slumber, shadows o'er all the ocean. 
Came we then to the bounds of deepest water, 
To the Kimmerian lands and peopled cities 
Covered with close-webbed mist, unpiercd ever 
With glitter of sun-rays, 
Nor with stars stretched, nor looking back from heaven, 
Swartest night stretched over wretched men there. 
Thither we in that ship, unladed sheep there, 
The ocean flowing backward, came we through to the place 
Aforesaid by Circe. 
Here did they rites, Perimedes and Eurylochus, 
And drawing sword from my hip 
I dug the ell-square pitkin, poured we libations unto each the dead,            
First mead and then sweet wine, 
Water mixed with white flour. 
Then prayed I many a prayer to the sickly death's-heads 
As set in Ithaca, sterile bulls of the best, 
For sacrifice, heaping the pyre with goods. 
Sheep, to Tiresias only, 
Black, and a bell sheep; 
Dark blood flowed in the fosse. 
Souls out of Erebus, cadaverous dead 
Of brides, of youths, and of many passing old, 
Virgins tender, souls stained with recent tears, 
Many men mauled with bronze lance-heads, 
Battle spoil, bearing yet dreary arms: 
These many crowded about me, 
With shouting, pallor upon me, cried to my men for more beasts; 
Slaughtered the herds--sheep slain of bronze, 
Poured ointment, cried to the gods, 
To Pluto the strong, and praised Proserpine. 
Unsheathed the narrow steel, 
I sat to keep off the impetuous, impotent dead 
Till I should hear Tiresias. 
But first Elpenor came, our friend Elpenor, 
Unburied, cast on the wide earth-- 
Limbs that we left in the house of Circe, 
Unwept, unwrapped in sepulchre, since toils urged other, 
Pitiful spirit--and I cried in hurried speech: 
'Elpenor, how art thou come to this dark coast? 
Cam'st thou afoot, outstripping seamen?' And he in heavy speech: 
'Ill fate and abundant wine! I slept in Circe's ingle, 
Going down the long ladder unguarded, I fell against the buttress, 
Shattered the nape-nerve, the soul sought Avernus. 
But thou, O King, I bid remember me, unwept, unburied! 
Heap up mine arms, be tomb by the sea-board, and inscribed, 
A man of no fortune and with a name to come; 
And set my oar up, that I swung 'mid fellows.' 
Came then another ghost, whom I beat off, Anticlea, 
And then Tiresias, Theban, 
Holding his golden wand, knew me and spoke first: 
'Man of ill hour, why come a second time, 
Leaving the sunlight, facing the sunless dead and this joyless region? 
Stand from the fosse, move back, leave me my bloody bever, 
And I will speak you true speeches.' 
                                                       "And I stepped back, 
Sheathing the yellow sword. Dark blood he drank then 
And spoke: 'Lustrous Odysseus, shalt 
Return through spiteful Neptune, over dark seas, 
Lose all companions.' Foretold me the ways and the signs. 
Came then Anticlea, to whom I answered: 
'Fate drives me on through these deeps; I sought Tiresias.' 
I told her news of Troy, and thrice her shadow 
Faded in my embrace. 
Then had I news of many faded women-- 
Tyro, Alcmena, Chloris-- 
Heard out their tales by that dark fosse, and sailed 
By sirens and thence outward and away, 
And unto Circe buried Elpenor's corpse." 

Lie quiet, Divus. 
                                 In Officina Wechli, Paris, 
M. D. three X's, Eight, with Aldus on the Frogs, 
And a certain Cretan's          
                                 Hymni Deorum: 
(The thin clear Tuscan stuff 
                      Gives way before the florid mellow phrase.) 
Take we the Goddess, Venus: 
                                                       Venerandam, 
Aurean coronam habentem, pulchram, 
Cypri munimenta sortita est, maritime, 
Light on the foam, breathed on by zephyrs, 
And air-tending hours. Mirthful, orichalci, with golden 
Girdles and breast bands. 
                                       Thou with dark eye-lids,          
Bearing the golden bough of Argicida.





"Find Work
 

I tie my Hat--I crease my Shawl--Life's little duties do--preciselyAs the very leastWere infinite--to me-- --Emily Dickinson, #443
My mother's mother, widowed very young 
of her first love, and of that love's first fruit, 
moved through her father's farm, her country tongue 
and country heart anaesthetized and mute 
with labor. So her kind was taught to do-- 
"Find work, she would reply to every grief-- 
and her one dictum, whether false or true, 
tolled heavy with her passionate belief. 
Widowed again, with children, in her prime, 
she spoke so little it was hard to bear 
so much composure, such a truce with time 
spent in the lifelong practice of despair. 
But I recall her floors, scrubbed white as bone, 
her dishes, and how painfully they shone.





The Package
 

It was a green barn coat from L. L. Bean   
That he had ordered, thinking of her   
Walking the snowy hillside of his dream   
Though she detested the style and color. 

That it arrived two days after he died   
Did not dispose her to detest it less   
Though she may have wished she did,   
The way she wished she'd kept house 

More neatly or baked instead of fried,   
For every coronary's a latent homicide-- 
If not what we did, what we did not do.   
If not what we said, what we did not say. 

In this, the inner jury's always out,   
No different for man or woman-- 
For everyone over forty, the human   
Condition is grief complicated by guilt. 

It's unexceptional really, what's left 
After deaths. We're thrown back on our own taste.   
That coat, for instance. If that was a gift, 
She would have to hide to throw it away. 







A Dog Has Died
 

My dog has died. 
 I buried him in the garden 
 next to a rusted old machine. 

 Some day I'll join him right there, 
 but now he's gone with his shaggy coat, 
 his bad manners and his cold nose, 
 and I, the materialist, who never believed 
 in any promised heaven in the sky 
 for any human being, 
 I believe in a heaven I'll never enter. 
 Yes, I believe in a heaven for all dogdom 
 where my dog waits for my arrival 
 waving his fan-like tail in friendship. 

 Ai, I'll not speak of sadness here on earth, 
 of having lost a companion 
 who was never servile. 
 His friendship for me, like that of a porcupine 
 withholding its authority, 
 was the friendship of a star, aloof, 
 with no more intimacy than was called for, 
 with no exaggerations: 
 he never climbed all over my clothes 
 filling me full of his hair or his mange, 
 he never rubbed up against my knee 
 like other dogs obsessed with sex. 

 No, my dog used to gaze at me, 
 paying me the attention I need, 
 the attention required 
 to make a vain person like me understand 
 that, being a dog, he was wasting time, 
 but, with those eyes so much purer than mine, 
 he'd keep on gazing at me 
 with a look that reserved for me alone 
 all his sweet and shaggy life, 
 always near me, never troubling me, 
 and asking nothing. 

 Ai, how many times have I envied his tail 
 as we walked together on the shores of the sea 
 in the lonely winter of Isla Negra 
 where the wintering birds filled the sky 
 and my hairy dog was jumping about 
 full of the voltage of the sea's movement: 
 my wandering dog, sniffing away 
 with his golden tail held high, 
 face to face with the ocean's spray. 

 Joyful, joyful, joyful, 
 as only dogs know how to be happy 
 with only the autonomy 
 of their shameless spirit. 

 There are no good-byes for my dog who has died, 
 and we don't now and never did lie to each other. 

 So now he's gone and I buried him, 
 and that's all there is to it.





Posthumous
 

Would it surprise you to learn 
 that years beyond your longest winter 
 you still get letters from your bank, your old 
 philanthropies, cold flakes drifting 
 through the mail-slot with your name? 
 Though it's been a long time since your face 
 interrupted the light in my door-frame, 
 and the last tremblings of your voice 
 have drained from my telephone wire, 
 from the lists of the likely, your name 
 is not missing. It circles in the shadow-world 
 of the machines, a wind-blown ghost. For generosity 
 will be exalted, and good credit 
 outlasts death. Caribbean cruises, recipes, 
 low-interest loans. For you who asked 
 so much of life, who lived acutely 
 even in duress, the brimming world 
 awaits your signature. Cancer and heart disease 
 are still counting on you for a cure. 
 B'nai Brith numbers you among the blessed. 
 They miss you. They want you back.





Home Movies:  A Sort of Ode
 

Because it hadn't seemed enough, 
after a while, to catalogue 
more Christmases, the three-layer cakes 
ablaze with birthday candles, the blizzard 
Billy took a shovel to, 
Phil's lawnmower tour of the yard, 
the tree forts, the shoot-'em-ups 
between the boys in new string ties 
and cowboy hats and holsters, 
or Mother sticking a bow as big 
as Mouseketeer ears in my hair, 

my father sometimes turned the gaze 
of his camera to subjects more 
artistic or universal: 
long closeups of a rose's face; 
a real-time sunset (nearly an hour); 
what surely were some brilliant autumn 
leaves before their colors faded 
to dry beige on the aging film; 
a great deal of pacing, at the zoo, 
by polar bears and tigers caged, 
he seemed to say, like him. 

What happened between him and her 
is another story. And just as well 
we have no movie of it, only 
some unforgiving scowls she gave 
through terrifying, ticking silence 
when he must have asked her (no 
sound track) for a smile. 
Still, what I keep yearning for 
isn't those generic cherry 
blossoms at their peak, or the brave 
daffodil after a snowfall, 

it's the re-run surprise 
of the unshuttered, prefab blanks 
of windows at the back of the house, 
and how the lines of aluminum 
siding are scribbled on with meaning 
only for us who lived there; 
it's the pair of elephant bookends 
I'd forgotten, with the upraised trunks 
like handles, and the books they meant 
to carry in one block to a future 
that scattered all of us. 

And look: it's the stoneware mixing bowl 
figured with hand-holding dancers 
handed down so many years 
ago to my own kitchen, still 
valueless, unbroken. Here 
she's happy, teaching us to dye 
the Easter eggs in it, a Grecian 
urn of sorts near which--a foster 
child of silence and slow time 
myself--I smile because she does 
and patiently await my turn.





Peach
 

         Come here's
a peach he said
         and held it out just far
enough to reach beyond his lap
         and off-

         ered me
a room the one
         room left he said in all
of Thessaloniki that night
         packed with

         traders
The peach was lush
         I hadn't slept for days
it was like velvet lips a lamp
         he smiled

         patted
the bed for me
         I knew it was in fact
the only room the only bed
         The peach

         trembled
and he said Come
         nodding to make me
agree I wanted the peach and
         the bed

         he said
to take it see
         how nice it was and I
thought how I could take it ginger-
         ly my

         finger-
tips only touch-
         ing only it Not in
or out I stayed in the doorway
         watching

         a fly
He stroked the peach
         and asked where I was from
I said the States he smiled and asked
         how long

         I'd stay
The fly had found
         the peach I said I'd leave
for Turkey in the morning I
         wanted

         so much
to sleep and on
         a bed I thought of all
the ways to say that word
         and that

         they must
have gradient
         meanings He asked me did
I want the peach and I said sure
         and took

         it from
his hand He asked
         then if I'd take the room
It costs too much I said and turned
         to go

         He said
to stay a while
         and we could talk The sun
was going down I said no thanks
         I'd head

         out on
the late train but
         could I still have the peach
and what else could he say to that
         but yes






The Visit
 

A flashlight rolls over the walls of a cave,
 searching, until the transducer comes to a halt
 low on my still-flat belly.
 The doctor says, "There's definitely a kid in there."

 Easy for her to say--she sees this all day.
 But it took us years to get to this point.
 Years in the dark. Months of nothing and never.
 Her expert eye interprets the grainy screen,

 which I can't stop reaching toward,
 pretending to point to features but really
 just longing to touch the image,
 as if it were somehow more there than in me,

 this tiny, blurry, leaping bison or bear,
 something from Altamira or Lascaux,
 from the hand of an ancestor--
 the first art we know.





Evening Conversation
 

                      For Robert Penn Warren
Reckless and white as a flashlight beam cast
into some dark corner, the moon
insists on the deeper blackness

surrounding it. Perhaps it wishes
to be a woman or a window, 
cushioning everything, full of itself

for the moment, yet frightened, like any egotist.
But still the stars patiently insist
on their presence, pinholes to nothingness. 

When else would I walk on such a night in the world? 

Half answers suggest themselves. 
The body consumes and wanes, collapses. 
We get to watch how everyone
dies who dies before us,
how birds rest. 

And yet while night solidifies, 
we can continue our discussion
in our effort to open the gift of the world, 
our hope to find years
in this box we tear apart. 

Birds do not count in our calibration. 
They crack time randomly, as if it were seeds. 
With sudden unaccountability
they start up and disappear. 

And yet, in some way all of this
is beside the point, for what can we do
except continue our conversation, 
and what would we gain if we disappeared? 

They tell us that this is so. 

Do you have any songs from your childhood
you still use to sing yourself to sleep? 

Being, mind, ego: the moon loves itself
in cloud shimmers, dancing as if it had pulled
a scant nightie off a laundry line
to clown with. 

We can only walk while there is light.





Rage for Order
 

I guess you could call it
 a sort of sympathetic magic.
 How else to explain
 this obsessive reorganizing
 of my home, my books, my papers,
 my poems, this housekeeping
 of my hard drive and floppies,
 all the deleting and casting away
 of redundancy and obsolescence,
 dead files and moved-on addresses
 and the scrubbing, the constant
 scrubbing and dusting and the howl
 of the protesting vacuum
 that struggles to inhale
 at least the 70% of house-dust
 that is dead human skin
 some of which might be hers.





Far Company
 

At times now from some margin of the day

 I can hear birds of another country

 not the whole song but a brief phrase of it

 out of a music that I may have heard

 once in a moment I appear to have

 forgotten for the most part that full day

 no sight of which I can remember now

 though it must have been where my eyes were then

 that knew it as the present while I thought

 of somewhere else without noticing that

 singing when it was there and still went on

 whether or not I noticed now it falls

 silent when I listen and leaves the day

 and flies before it to be heard again

 somewhere ahead when I have forgotten





Mountain Dulcimer
 

Where does such sadness in wood come 
 from? How could longing live in these 
 wires? The box looks like the most fragile 
 coffin tuned for sound. And laid 
 across the knees of this woman 
 it looks less like a baby nursed 
 than some symbolic Piet, 
 and the stretched body on her lap 
 yields modalities of lament 
 and blood, yields sacrifice and sliding 
 chants of grief that dance and dance toward 
 a new measure, a new threshold, 
 a new instant and new year which 
 we always celebrate by 
 remembering the old and by 
 recalling the lost and honoring 
 those no longer here to strike these 
 strings like secrets of the most 
 satisfying harmonies, as 
 voices join in sadness and joy 
 and tell again what we already 
 know, have always known but forget, 
 from way back in the farthest cove, 
 from highest on the peaks of love.





Driving West in 1970
 

My dear children, do you remember the morning
 When we climbed into the old Plymouth
 And drove west straight toward the Pacific?

 We were all the people there were.
 We followed Dylan's songs all the way west.
 It was Seventy; the war was over, almost;

 And we were driving to the sea.
 We had closed the farm, tucked in
 The flap, and were eating the honey

 Of distance and the word "there."
 Oh whee, we're gonna fly 
 Down into the easy chair. We sang that

 Over and over. That's what the early
 Seventies were like. We weren't afraid.
 And a hole had opened in the world.

 We laughed at Las Vegas.
 There was enough gaiety
 For all of us, and ahead of us was

 The ocean. Tomorrow's 
 The day my bride's gonna come.
 And the war was over, almost.





Sex and Taxes
 

       Plum black & the blush white of an apple
shoulder, melon & cream, in tones to list
       the flesh; in light, washed colors off at last
& textures sheer with damp I slowly pull
       from you with your quick help. Weekend's ample
procrastinations to forget the least
       of what we want to do. April, half a blast
of cold, half new light, green & simple.
       Now dusk. Now fear. We pencil what we owe
on this short form, our numbers good enough.
       The goose-neck glare undoes how we spent the day.
Each bite each bee-sting kiss each bitten O
       all aftertaste. Later, at the drop-off,
       postmark queue, we joke: "Now we can die!"





Detroit, Tomorrow
 

Newspaper says the boy killed by someone,   
don't say who. I know the mother, waking,   
gets up as usual, washes her face 
in cold water, and starts the coffee pot. 

She stands by the window up there on floor   
sixteen wondering why the street's so calm   
with no cars going or coming, and then 
she looks at the wall clock and sees the time. 

Now she's too awake to go back to bed,   
she's too awake not to remember him, 
her one son, or to forget exactly 
how long yesterday was, each moment dragged 

into the next by the force of her will   
until she thought this simply cannot be.   
She sits at the scarred, white kitchen table,   
the two black windows staring back at her, 

wondering how she'll go back to work today.   
The windows don't see anything: they're black,   
eyeless, they give back only what's given;   
sometimes, like now, even less than what's given, 

yet she stares into their two black faces   
moving her head from side to side, like this,   
just like I'm doing now. Try it awhile,   
go ahead, it's not going to kill you. 

Now say something, it doesn't matter what   
you say because all the words are useless:   
"I'm sorry for your loss. "This too will pass. 
"He was who he was. She won't hear you out 

because she can only hear the torn words   
she uses to pray to die. This afternoon   
you and I will see her just before four   
alight nimbly from the bus, her lunch box 

of one sandwich, a thermos of coffee, 
a navel orange secured under her arm, 
and we'll look away. Under your breath make   
her one promise and keep it forever: 

in the little store-front church down the block,   
the one with the front windows newspapered,   
you won't come on Saturday or Sunday   
to kneel down and pray for life eternal.





One Angel:  Palazzo Arian, at San Raffaele Arcangelo
 

At San Raffaele Arcangelo
One angel got it all wrong.
 She plopped into this
 sad century feet first
 in her dark clothes.
 There wasn't much water
 that winter--just a few
 puddles really--
 to break her fall.
 Mud-splattered, she rose
 and shook like a canine.
 It didn't take long
 to see her soaked wings
 as a backdrop to all
 the nonmagic to which we were
 accustomed, or to see
 what passed for history
 as a forgetting of sorts.
 (Was that one or two wars?)
 Strange how, as she limped
 down a dim vicolo,
 some willful disc hovered
 above her more florid
 than a sky--how the putrid
 puddles with their last
 reflections could neither
 correct nor register that light.





In a Field Outside the Town
 

Three days later, Suljic was finally given a drink 
of water and marched with a dozen other men 
onto a small livery truck, one of two, fenced 
along each side by wooden planks, 

the back left open to give a clear shot 
to the automatic weapon poking out the window 
of the red sedan that followed, the squat nose 
trained on them, ridiculously, as if they'd any thought 

of hopping off a moving truck. Suljic peered 
vacantly through the slats. He'd missed the yellow flowers 
of Spring and by now saw a landscape taken over 
by Summer, the grasses closing behind them as they veered 

from the road and lurched across cow paths. They drove 
to the center of a wide field and stopped. Old sweat, 
without the breeze of movement, prickled in the heat. 
A metal smell drifted, an untended apple grove 

baked on a hill, and the weeds droned, motory with bees. 
But Suljic noticed none of these, fixed instead 
on the gaps in the field where bodies, all dead, 
matted down the wild carrot and chicory, their khakis 

splotched darkly, like a fawn's dappled haunches 
obscuring them. The men clambered down into the tall grass 
and lined up at gunpoint. Suljic was sure the last 
good thing he'd ever see would be the apple branches 

drooping with fruit, but the man beside him grabbed 
his hand, and looked him in the face, as if 
Suljic, just a bricklayer, had any assurances to give. 
He squeezed the hand back, hard, and felt a scab 

crossing the man's knuckles. He saw, too, a thin scar 
worrying the arch of his left eyebrow, much older, 
perhaps from a fall as a child from a ladder 
picking fruit. His hand was like a clump of mortar, 

and three nights without sleep had webbed his eyes red. 
And Suljic suddenly stuttered to ask his name, 
what town was he from, his job--anything--but there came 
the crackle, like sometimes thunder, undecided 

whether to begin, that starts, stalls, then trips 
over itself, the sound crinkling from one 
end of the sky to the other. The sound took possession 
of his face until it, too, crinkled, his grip 

pulsed, and he fell forward. Suljic winced 
in the tackle of bodies, and splayed down in the dirt 
flattening himself like a beetle, not hurt 
in any new way, not yet convinced 

he wasn't dead and didn't feel it. He heard the click 
of fresh clips sliding into place, and shut 
his eyes lightly, sure someone had seen he wasn't shot 
and would come finish it. But no one came. Another truck 

rolled up. The men climbed down, and lined up, docilely. 
He recognized, solely by rhythm, a prayer, cut off 
by the crackle, the hush of crickets, the soft 
whump of bodies folding at the knees 

and knocked by bullets shoulder first 
into the grass. No one yelled. No one tried to run. 
Another truck, another group, falling like a succession 
of bricks sliding off a hod. Suljic finally pissed 

where he lay, and blended in all the better 
with the others. The noise stopped, and he cracked 
his eyes enough to see, across the backs 
like bleeding hills, a man strolling along the scatter 

of bodies with a pistol, putting a slug 
into the skull of anyone that still twitched 
or mumbled. Then came the snort and low-pitched 
rumble of diesel engines as two backhoes dug 

a trench along the margin of all the collapsed 
bodies. Impossibly, the crackling started anew, 
and when darkness finally settled, the squads continued 
in what light the backhoes' headlights threw. Perhaps 

the shooting was over long before the sound 
left him, the crackle to his eardrums 
was like the rolling of a boat to his limbs 
echoing long after he'd reached dry ground. 

The soldiers left. Still he didn't move, but eased 
his eyes full open. The moon above the orchard 
was shrinking higher, its light glossing the awkward 
pale forms that stubbled the dry weeds, 

glinting off teeth and eyes. He scuttled from beneath 
the arms and legs flopped sleepingly over 
his own, as though by drunkards or lovers, 
and rose like a foal to his numb feet, 

seeing throughout the field no man not touched 
by three dead others. He stood for a moment, trying 
to guess, even roughly, their number, multiplying 
bodies per square yard, but the math was too much, 

the count too huge. He stared at the faces beside him 
in the grass, like a man leaving something he knew 
he would someday have to return to, 
looking for the landmarks that would guide him-- 

the crooked teeth, the welted cheek, the pale eyes eclipsed 
by half-shut lids, lolling upward, inward, swollen 
as though with weeping, blood from an unseen hole 
glistering down a chin line, crusting on lips. 

How could he explain his life, what could he say 
to those who weren't here to see, to the mothers and wives 
who'd swear for years their men were still alive, 
somewhere, the bodies never found, bulldozed into clay-- 

would he tell them how he tiptoed, unable to avoid 
stepping on hands and ankles, or how the tears 
like a secret he'd harbored through three years 
of siege shook loose, and how he let them, no longer afraid 

of being found out and cut down by gunfire, 
or how he ran anyway, when he reached the open, quick 
as his bum leg would let him, without a look 
back at the faces turned like gourds in the dark mire.





Count Down
 

Survival is the final offer
 that arrives at the eleventh hour
 just when pain to the tenth power
 would kill you with another ninth degree.

 By then, relief strikes you brief as an eighth note;
 you wear doom proudly; it's your seventh seal.
 But life whispers through your sixth sense
 of what might await you in some fifth dimension

 where miracle is saved for the fourth quarter.
 Tricked, you sigh and rise on the third day.
 You know better, but with no second thought,
 risk that first step--absurd as first love at first sight--

 as if you were back at ground zero, as if it cost
 nothing, as if this were not the last laugh.





Wight
 

In the dark we disappear, pure being. 
 Our mirror images, impure being. 

 Being and becoming (Heidegger), being and 
 nothingness (Sartre)--which is purer being? 

 Being alone is no way to be: thus 
 loneliness is the test of pure being. 

 Nights in love I fell too far or not quite 
 far enough--one pure, one impure being. 

 Clouds, snow, mist, the dragon's breath on water, 
 smoke from fire--a metaphor's pure being. 

 Stillness and more stillness and the light locked 
 deep inside--both pure and impure being. 

 Is is the verb of being, I the noun-- 
 or pronoun for the purists of being. 

 I was, I am, I looked within and saw 
 nothing very clearly: purest being.





Before the Rain
 

Minutes before the rain begins
 I always waken, listening
 to the world hold its breath,
 as if a phone had rung once in a far
 room or a door had creaked
 in the darkness.

 Perhaps the genes of some forebear
 startle in me, some tribal warrior
 keeping watch on a crag beside a loch,
 miserable in the cold,

 though I think it is a woman's waiting
 I have come to know,
 a Loyalist hiding in the woods,
 muffling the coughing of her child
 against her linen skirts, her dark head
 bent over his, her fear spent
 somewhere else in time,

 leaving only this waiting,

 and I hope she escaped
 with her child, and I suppose she did.
 If not, I wouldn't be lying here awake,
 alive, listening for the rain to begin
 so that she can run, the sound
 of her footsteps lost, the sight
 of them blotted away on the path.





Schools
 

All day they stream past, petitioners
for understanding, accolade, critique.
I read them all, a vast anthology
of jumbled genres on a common theme:
affliction. So I parse, interpret, scan.
I graph dysrhythmias, dysmetrias;
I eavesdrop on caesuras for unsaid
murmurs, gallops, rubs, snaps, flutters, clicks.
The perils of misreading harrow me--
beware the treacheries of metaphor!--
the elephant that squats upon a chest
is not a burning heart or waterbrash.

Just take the imagists. Their heads explode.
St Elmo's fire flashdances on their limbs.
They float, they swim. Knives twist within their flesh.
They're ball-and-chained by lead, filled with concrete.
Butterflies inhabit them. Their pipes
are wrong, and clogged. Their systems freeze and crash.
Invaded, they resist; defenses fail.
What they need, they think, is you to flush
it out of them, whatever it is, doc.

The formalists present minutiae,
in alphabetical enjambed iambs--
pentameter's ten digits, five lub-dubs--
from acne, backpain, catarrh, dandruff, eye-
strain, flatfoot, gas pains, hangnail, itchiness,
the jitters, kinks, lethargies, migraines, nose-
bleeds, obstipation, panics, queasy retch-
ings, styes and tremors, ulcers, vertigo,
to wandering womb, xerosis, yaws and zits.

Free versers, on the other hand, wax Walt
Whitmanic: their barbaric yawps celebrate and sing
incantatory songs of themselves, songs
of the breath as it wheezes and rales through them,
the short breath and long breath, the breath that is moist or dry,
songs of the blood, the thick- and thinness of it, its heat, its turbulence,
songs of the gut, its rippling coils, the dark burden of its secret indulgences,
songs of the muscled limb, inflamed with toil or the languid thrash of love.

Didacticists, of course, will always add
their theories of omission or commission:
slept in a draft, got their feet wet, caught a chill,
forgot their overshoes and oversoul,
ate too little roughage, too much ham,
should have pumped less iron or pumped more,
Mea culpa, meus morbus they intone,
certain you'll absolve them back to health.

Narrativists enshrine a fleeting pain
within an epic of chronology
I woke at six--I'm a morning person-- 
brushed my teeth, ate oatmeal with a pat 
of low-fat margarine, the kind that has 
the dancing turkey on the tub, on sale 
for .99 at Johnnie's, by the time
you tune back in it's afternoon, the pain
has come and gone; they're vacuuming the rug,
the doorbell rings, the kettle's whistling,
you try to interrupt--where did you say 
that pain was?--loquacity steamrolls on
through supper, TV, bedtime, dreams, alarm
clock going off at six. Try Tylenol,
you say, your fingers crossed. Call if it's worse. 

Then there's the avant garde. The cutting edge.
The text Munchausens off the sizzling page.
Hypoglossalalia muscles in,
between John Cagey silences, the din
and Sturm of wild unsound, unsense.
O, there are stranger dysphasias, Wernicke,
than are dreamt of in your neurologies,
mutant L=A=N=G=U=A=G=Es that cacophone
far off the beaten geographic tongue,
where elephants explode and overshoes
fibrillate with longing--El Dorado,
Shangri-la, Eden, Heaven, Hell--you name it,
it's yours. And that's, of course, the joke. You nod.
You say, "I understand." You really don't.





Reading an Anthology of Chinese Poems of the Sung Dynasty, I Pause To Admire the Length and Clarity of Their Titles
 

It seems these poets have nothing

 up their ample sleeves

 they turn over so many cards so early,

 telling us before the first line

 whether it is wet or dry,

 night or day, the season the man is standing in,

 even how much he has had to drink.


 Maybe it is autumn and he is looking at a sparrow.

 Maybe it is snowing on a town with a beautiful name.


 "Viewing Peonies at the Temple of Good Fortune

 on a Cloudy Afternoon" is one of Sun Tung Po's.

 "Dipping Water from the River and Simmering Tea"

 is another one, or just

 "On a Boat, Awake at Night."


 And Lu Yu takes the simple rice cake with

 "In a Boat on a Summer Evening

 I Heard the Cry of a Waterbird.

 It Was Very Sad and Seemed To Be Saying

 My Woman Is Cruel--Moved, I Wrote This Poem."


 There is no iron turnstile to push against here

 as with headings like "Vortex on a String,"

 "The Horn of Neurosis," or whatever.

 No confusingly inscribed welcome mat to puzzle over.


 Instead, "I Walk Out on a Summer Morning

 to the Sound of Birds and a Waterfall"

 is a beaded curtain brushing over my shoulders.


 And "Ten Days of Spring Rain Have Kept Me Indoors"

 is a servant who shows me into the room

 where a poet with a thin beard

 is sitting on a mat with a jug of wine

 whispering something about clouds and cold wind,

 about sickness and the loss of friends.


 How easy he has made it for me to enter here,

 to sit down in a corner,

 cross my legs like his, and listen.





The Svres Road
 

Camille Corot's painting, stolen from the Louvre, May 1998
It might have always been meant 
 that they walked completely away, 
 this man on horse, woman with basket. 
 With their backs to us and the painter, 
 they are so private. But like those stories 
 where children step right into a picture 
 and, looking over their shoulders, 
 see the consoling frame, 
 these two would know the way home 
 like the palms of their hands, the routine 
 so ordinary it most encloses, 
 no need for thought, only motion 
 and the full sensation of sun 
 on your flesh, along the usual road.





The Dowsers Ear
 

Empty cattle trailers 
               Rumbled dummy thunder 
Down the road all day, and now tonight, 
Heat lightning flashes more of the same fake rain. 
It's just as well. I couldn't get to sleep, 
And now it ricochets across the sky 
With empty loads of light. We've had a month 
Of drought that tightens dirt around my pond. 
The local wells are dry. But I've retired, 
Threw out my wand. I hate this time of year. 
            
               Roux can burn if flour 
               Sticks in skillet butter. 
I've been cooking up a storm myself, 
My Daddy's fil gumbo recipe. 
He used to be a chef on oil rigs 
Until the hurricane. I heard the waves 
That killed him, and I hear them every year. 
It's emptiness that fills me. That's my skill. 
I hear the vacant rain before it falls. 
It's like the murmur of a spiraled shell. 
         
               Hurricane weather, stewing 
               Deep for landfall, spewing 
Rain-a-plenty in the Gulf and here 
In Tennessee they always have a lack 
Of something. Two men called today for wells. 
I told them both to go to hell, and now 
They think I'm sinful, not to use my skill. 
They stand to lose so much, but don't we all. 
I lost a lot in Hurricane Camille 
And even now can't hear the end of it. 

               More heat lightning flashes, 
               Absent rain that passes 
Over clouds, and I can make it out, 
Each gurgling current under withered fields, 
Down kitchen drains. The neighbors think I'm crazy, 
Up all hours, but they'll never know 
The screaming voice inside a breaker's rage 
Or how it simmers in my ear. I hate 
The sound of water. Give me one good chance 
To make it silent. I'd be right as rain.





On the Road
 

Those dutiful dogtrots down airport corridors
 while gnawing at a Dunkin' Donuts cruller,
 those hotel rooms where the TV remote
 waits by the bed like a suicide pistol,
 those hours in the air amid white shirts
 whose wearers sleep-read through thick staid thrillers,
 those breakfast buffets in prairie Marriotts--
 such venues of transit grow dearer than home.

 The tricycle in the hall, the wife's hasty kiss,
 the dripping faucet and uncut lawn--this is life?
 No, vita thrives via the road, in the laptop
 whose silky screen shimmers like a dark queen's mirror,
 in the polished shoe that signifies killer intent,
 and in the solitary mission, a bumpy glide
 down through the cloud cover to a single runway
 at whose end a man just like you guards the Grail.





Truly Pathetic
 

Lately, the weather aches;
 the air is short of breath,
 and morning stumbles in, stiff-jointed.

 Day by day, the sun bores the sky,
 until the moon begins
 its some disappearing act,
 making the oceans yawn.

 Even the seasons change
 with a throb of weariness--
 bud, bloom, leaf, fall.

 If it would help,
 I would paint my house silver
 or sell it or buy
 a red convertible.

 I would, but who am I
 to try to cheer up
 the self-indulgent universe.





Immigrant Picnic
 

It's the Fourth of July, the flags 
are painting the town, 
the plastic forks and knives 
are laid out like a parade. 

And I'm grilling, I've got my apron, 
I've got potato salad, macaroni, relish, 
I've got a hat shaped   
like the state of Pennsylvania. 

I ask my father what's his pleasure 
and he says, "Hot dog, medium rare," 
and then, "Hamburger, sure,   
what's the big difference,"   
as if he's really asking. 

I put on hamburgers and hot dogs,   
slice up the sour pickles and Bermudas, 
uncap the condiments. The paper napkins   
are fluttering away like lost messages. 

"You're running around," my mother says,   
"like a chicken with its head loose." 

"Ma," I say, "you mean cut off, 
loose and cut off   being as far apart   
as, say, son and daughter." 

She gives me a quizzical look as though   
I've been caught in some impropriety. 
"I love you and your sister just the same," she says, 
"Sure," my grandmother pipes in, 
"you're both our children, so why worry?" 

That's not the point I begin telling them, 
and I'm comparing words to fish now,   
like the ones in the sea at Port Said,   
or like birds among the date palms by the Nile, 
unrepentantly elusive, wild.   

"Sonia," my father says to my mother, 
"what the hell is he talking about?" 
"He's on a ball," my mother says. 
                                                       
"That's roll!" I say, throwing up my hands, 
"as in hot dog, hamburger, dinner roll...." 

"And what about roll out the barrels?" my mother asks, 
and my father claps his hands, "Why sure," he says, 
"let's have some fun," and launches   
into a polka, twirling my mother   
around and around like the happiest top,   

and my uncle is shaking his head, saying 
"You could grow nuts listening to us,"   

and I'm thinking of pistachios in the Sinai 
burgeoning without end,   
pecans in the South, the jumbled 
flavor of them suddenly in my mouth, 
wordless, confusing, 
crowding out everything else. 







Tea-Strainer
 

Leaf-keep, un-sibyl; if the soul
 Has the weight of a swallow, what less
 Has the weight of a sip? You equal
 This riddle, unposed in your dish
 As a hand at rest in a lap. Held to,
 You hold back what can't be
 Prevented, what's no more palatable
 For that: the unfine; formerly, our future.





Nimis Compos Mentis
 

(Too sound of mind)
The paper table cloth was tastefully bleak, 
 The misty morning light shone on his cheek, 
 And made him look alone and masculine. 

 He talked of Seneca and bad translations, 
 Of modern critics' lightweight observations; 
 A bread crumb rested sweetly on his chin. 

 Behind him, through the glass, the ocean's heave 
 Uncurled against the sand, beside his sleeve, 
 As Eros aimed his toxic javelin. 

 I ducked out of the way, to no avail; 
 It glanced my flesh, injecting quite a cocktail 
 That blurred my sight and caused my head to spin-- 

 Never mind the coffee we were drinking, 
 Whatever I said was not what I was thinking. 
 I wanted to become his mandolin, 

 And lie across his lap, a dainty lute, 
 And sing to him and feed him ripened fruit, 
 While light upon the sea turned opaline. 

 Instead, this conversation about art 
 And formal education--God, he's smart! 
 Such rationality should be a sin. 

 The hour was up, he had to run, of course; 
 A handshake and a peck of shy remorse-- 
 Outside, the sea was gray and dull as tin; 
 It ruled the shore with tedious discipline.





Tomorrow
 

                             I

Tomorrow I will start to be happy.
The morning will light up like a celebratory cigar.
Sunbeams sprawling on the lawn will set
dew sparkling like a cut-glass tumbler of champagne.
Today will end the worst phase of my life.

I will put my shapeless days behind me,
fencing off the past, as a golden rind
of sand parts slipshod sea from solid land.
It is tomorrow I want to look back on, not today.
Tomorrow I start to be happy; today is almost yesterday.

                             II

Australia, how wise you are to get the day
over and done with first, out of the way. 
You have eaten the fruit of knowledge, while
we are dithering about which main course to choose.
How liberated you must feel, how free from doubt:

the rise and fall of stocks, today's closing prices
are revealed to you before our bidding has begun.
Australia, you can gather in your accident statistics
like a harvest while our roads still have hours to kill.
When we are in the dark, you have sagely seen the light.

                             III

Cagily, presumptuously, I dare to write 2018.
A date without character or tone. 2018.
A year without interest rates or mean daily temperature.
Its hit songs have yet to be written, its new-year
babies yet to be induced, its truces to be signed. 

Much too far off for prophecy, though one hazards
a tentative guess--a so-so year most likely,
vague in retrospect, fizzling out with the usual
end-of-season sales; everything slashed:
your last chance to salvage something of its style.






If Feeling Isn't In It
 

You can take it away, as far as I'm concerned--I'd rather spend the afternoon with a nice dog. I'm not kidding. Dogs have what a lot of poems lack: excitements and responses, a sense of play the ability to impart warmth, elation . . . .                                                                                     Howard Moss
Dogs will also lick your face if you let them.
Their bodies will shiver with happiness.
A simple walk in the park is just about
the height of contentment for them, followed
by a bowl of food, a bowl of water,
a place to curl up and sleep. Someone
to scratch them where they can't reach
and smooth their foreheads and talk to them.
Dogs also have a natural dislike of mailmen
and other bringers of bad news and will
bite them on your behalf. Dogs can smell
fear and also love with perfect accuracy.
There is no use pretending with them.
Nor do they pretend. If a dog is happy
or sad or nervous or bored or ashamed
or sunk in contemplation, everybody knows it.
They make no secret of themselves.
You can even tell what they're dreaming about
by the way their legs jerk and try to run
on the slippery ground of sleep.
Nor are they given to pretentious self-importance.
They don't try to impress you with how serious
or sensitive they are. They just feel everything
full blast. Everything is off the charts
with them. More than once I've seen a dog
waiting for its owner outside a caf
practically implode with worry. "Oh, God,
what if she doesn't come back this time?
What will I do? Who will take care of me?
I loved her so much and now she's gone
and I'm tied to a post surrounded by people
who don't look or smell or sound like her at all.
And when she does come, what a flurry
of commotion, what a chorus of yelping
and cooing and leaps straight up into the air!
It's almost unbearable, this sudden
fullness after such total loss, to see
the world made whole again by a hand
on the shoulder and a voice like no other.





Sotto Voce
 

To strip away this incessant chatter,
 yes, but what lies underneath it?

 Death, of course, or our fear of death.
 Which is why we talk so much,

 bury our heads in books, turn forests
 into pages and pages into mirrors

 in which we see ourselves appear
 and disappear. When I look up

 from the story I've been reading
 about the Jews in Nazi Germany

 and the silence that closed their
 mouths forever, I see a girl outside

 the cafe smiling in at her father
 who smiles back but cannot hear her.

 She makes all kinds of gestures
 with her hands, mimes herself

 inside an invisible box and breaks
 down laughing. Then she gathers

 her breath and blows it against
 the window. It is not snowing

 outside, the leaves have hardly begun
 to turn, the season is merely poised

 for the long descent, but still
 the glass steams up. And in this

 little cloud of warmth that's come
 from deep inside her body, she

 writes a single joyful word, which
 vanishes almost before she finishes.





Second Helpings
 

I wear my heart on my sleeve,
or rather both sleeves, since 
it's usually broken.

Sometimes when I join my hands
 to pray, the jagged edges
 briefly touch,

like a plate that fell and cracked
 apart from being asked 
to hold too much.





Landscape Survey
 

And what about this boulder, 
knocked off the moutaintop and 
tumbled down a thousand years ago

to lodge against the streambank,
 does it waste itself with worry
 about how things are going

to turn out? Does the current
 slicing around it stop itself mid-
stream because it can't get past

all it's left behind back at
the source or up in the clouds
where its waters first fell

to earth? And these trees,
 would they double over and
 clutch themselves or lash out

furiously if they were to discover
 what the other trees really
 thought of them? Would the wind

reascend into the sky forever,
like an in-drawn breath,
if it knew it was fated simply

to sweep the earth of windlessness,
 to touch everything and keep
 nothing and be beheld by no one?
 





Careless Perfection
 

According to Lin Yutang,
 both Po Chuyi and Su Tungpo
 "desperately admired" Tao Yuanming,

 a poet of nature who wrote a single love poem,
 a poem thought by Chinese dilettantes to be
 the one "blemish in a white jade."

 Can a poet be faulted for calling a woman
 carelessly perfect in beauty?
 He chose to long for her by envying

 the candle that glowed upon her
 beautiful face, the shadow
 that followed in her every move.

 Yet the nature poet Tao Yuanming, at home
 with the sudden turning of seasons,
 now feared the shadow in darkness,

 a discarded fan that once stirred her hair,
 feared the candle at dawn. At last believed
 that for beauty he had lived in vain.





The Tragedy of Hats
 

is that you can never see the one you're wearing,
 that no one believes the lies they tell,
 that they grow to be more famous than you,
 that you could die in one but you won't be buried in it.

 That we use them to create dogs
 in our own image. That the dogs
 in their mortarboards and baseball caps and veils
 crush our hubris with their unconcern.

 That Norma Desmond's flirty cocktail hat flung aside
 left a cowlick that doomed her. That two old ladies
 catfighting in Hutzler's Better Dresses both wore flowered
 straw. Of my grandmother the amateur hatmaker,

 this legend: that the holdup man at the Mercantile
 turned to say Madam I love your hat before
 he shot the teller dead who'd giggled at her
 homemade velvet roses. O happy tragedy of hats!

 That they make us mimic classic gestures,
 inspiring pleasure first, then pity and then fear.
 See how we tip them, hold them prettily against the wind
 or pull them off and mop our sweaty brows

 like our beloved foolish dead in photographs.
 Like farmers plowing under the ancient sun.





Keeping Track of My Genius
 

I sometimes find him in the attic,
lying on his side, contemplating
the insulation. Or just staring at

the beams, trying to get the measure
of force and distribution. He
turns up a lot in the garage.

I know he loves me. But if I look
away for an instant, he's off,
and I worry that he won't come back

(or when he does he'll have no taste,
gone in for some fad I'll have to bear,
and every move he makes a test).

But usually he's charming,
following me to the cafe
and lying on the awning so carefully

as not to make it sag, only
casting a slight shadow on my table.
Of course I act as though I

haven't seen a thing. He only wants,
I think, to do what can't be done.
Why just yesterday, for instance,

I found him going through the public trash,
figuring how to fill a bottle
some angry drunk had smashed.





Dog Music
 

Amongst dogs are listeners and singers.
 My big dog sang with me so purely,
 puckering her ruffled lips into an O,
 beginning with small, swallowing sounds
 like Coltrane musing, then rising to power
 and resonance, gulping air to continue--
 her passion and sense of flawless form--
 singing not with me, but for the art of dogs.
 We joined in many fine songs--"Stardust,"
 "Naima," "The Trout," "My Rosary," "Perdido."
 She was a great master and died young,
 leaving me with unrelieved grief,
 her talents known to only a few.

 Now I have a small dog who does not sing,
 but listens with discernment, requiring
 skill and spirit in my falsetto voice.
 I sing her name and words of love
 andante, con brio, vivace, adagio. 
 Sometimes she is so moved she turns
 to place a paw across her snout,
 closes her eyes, sighing like a girl
 I held and danced with years ago.

 But I am a pretender to dog music.
 The true strains rise only from
 the rich, red chambers of a canine heart,
 these melodies best when the moon is up,
 listeners and singers together or
 apart, beyond friendship and anger,
 far from any human imposter--
 ballads of long nights lifting
 to starlight, songs of bones, turds,
 conquests, hunts, smells, rankings,
 things settled long before our birth.





The School Where I Studied
 

I passed by the school where I studied as a boy 
 and said in my heart: here I learned certain things 
 and didn't learn others. All my life I have loved in vain 
 the things I didn't learn. I am filled with knowledge, 
 I know all about the flowering of the tree of knowledge, 
 the shape of its leaves, the function of its root system, its pests and parasites. 
 I'm an expert on the botany of good and evil, 
 I'm still studying it, I'll go on studying till the day I die. 
 I stood near the school building and looked in. This is the room 
 where we sat and learned. The windows of a classroom always open 
 to the future, but in our innocence we thought it was only landscape 
 we were seeing from the window. 
 The schoolyard was narrow, paved with large stones. 
 I remember the brief tumult of the two of us 
 near the rickety steps, the tumult 
 that was the beginning of a first great love. 
 Now it outlives us, as if in a museum, 
 like everything else in Jerusalem.





Scrapbook
 

Green and brown current of river:
 Reverberant iron bridge: crossing over,
 Woman and child fixed at the center,
 Holding hands and both weeping:

 Because her child is weeping: because
 His mother weeps: because the river, far
 Underfoot, glitters through cracks
 In the wooden flooring that widen

 Perceptively as he steps.
 Ahead, heightened by a hill, dwarfed
 In yellow trees, the house is made ready.
 All should have been primer-perfect,

 Including the train rushing headlong
 Past the station, always in arrears,
 Never deigning to stop and put down
 A stepping-stool. Nothing more is given:

 Except perhaps an assignment of cause:
 A plank has fallen away to the river.
 The two figures clasp hands across the gulf,
 Rocking back and forth in soundless

 Oscillation there on the bridge
 Where my mind proposes to leave them
 In place, my mother and me,
 On the first day of school, 1921.





Letter of Recommendation
 

Miss A, who graduated six years back,
 has air-expressed me an imposing stack
 of forms in furtherance of her heart's desire:
 a Ph.D. Not wishing to deny her,
 I dredge around for something laudatory
 to say that won't be simply a tall story;
 in fact, I search for memories of her,
 and draw a blank--or say, at best a blur.
 Was hers the class in that ungodly room
 whose creaking door slammed with a sonic boom,
 whose radiators twangled for the first
 ten minutes, and then hissed, and (this was worst)
 subsided with a long, regretful sigh?
 Yes, there, as every Wednesday we would try
 to overlook cacophony and bring
 our wits to bear on some distinguished thing
 some poet sometime wrote, Miss A would sit
 calm in a middle row and ponder it.
 Blonde, I believe, and quiet (so many are).
 A dutiful note-taker. Not a star.
 Roundheads and Cavaliers received their due
 notice from her before the term was through.
 She wrote a paper on . . . could it have been
 "Milton's Idea of Original Sin"?
 Or was it "Deathbed Imagery in Donne"?
 Whichever, it was likely not much fun
 for her. It wasn't bad, though I've seen better.
 But I can hardly say that in a letter
 like this one, now refusing to take shape
 even as wispy memories escape
 the reach of certitude. Try as I may,
 I cannot render palpable Miss A,
 who, with five hundred classmates, left few traces
 when she decamped. Those mortarboard-crowned faces,
 multitudes, beaming, ardent to improve
 a world advancing dumbly in its groove,
 crossing the stage that day--to be consigned
 to a cold-storage portion of the mind . . .
 What could be sadder? (She remembered me.)
 The transcript says I gave Miss A a B.





Ephemeroptera
 

On a slab of Jurassic shale, an ovate
 body, legs fine as eyelashes,
 the mayfly's precise signature,
 consummate, immortal.

 Now its descendents, in a tumult
 of mating, roil the air on Koerner's
 sluggish creek below the hill
 where the Ebenezer Baptist church,

 its doors agape, declines daily
 into dust and rubble.
 Beyond the church, the graveyard
 encroached by nightshade

 and nettle, its stones listing
 or broken or gone, a few bearing
 words now scarcely visible:
 Eliza, Beloved Wife . . . In Perpetual . . . . 

 A million years from now the stricken
 stones will be scoured clean
 and ephemerids will rise each spring
 to dance above the clouded waters.





Rarefied
 

This sweater is made from only the finest, softest underhairs of the Mongolian camel.
"Fancy-schmancy, my father would have said,   
whose snazziest sweater was still a declass   
synthetic from the sweatshops of Taiwan. My friend   
Deloris, however, who really owns such clothes,   
would say "exquisite or "sublime--her opened closet's   
row of shoulders teases late-day bedroomlight   
along such textures, there are days when the laboring brain   
and throbbing crotch appear to us to be not much more   
than her wardrobe's tasteful accessories. ". . . woven   
from genital-down of prepubescent yeti, and then   
hand-sewn in our undersea domes. "Untouched   
by anyone other than albino elves, this wool is . . . . 

______________ 


Rarefied--to Helthi Hart, the diet guru, it's   
a cup of clear organic cauliflower broth. And for   
the Emperor Excessia, it's a mad dessert of swans' tongues   
--there were, what? ten thousand?--dipped in a slip   
of stiffening honey and set out to await the banqueteers   
like a field of fresh shoots they could graze.   
Some Roman party hosts had great roped bowls of snow   
brought from the mountaintops to entertain their guests   
with dishes of rose-petal sherbet and chilled roe.   
They might even allow the household slaves to slide   
leftover snow along the burning welts the ropes ate   
into their shoulders all down the mountainside.   

______________ 
    
Afterwards it was an unrecognizable tatter.   
But an image of my father's worn-thin Bargain City   
"all-weather jacket is still whole in its polyester glory.   
This is what happened: the alley dog (he later called the thing   
a "cur) had cornered Livia, and she screamed once,   
with a seven-year-old's unselfconscious terror.   
And then my father was there, with his jacket wound around his arm,   
and a rock. When it was over, he tore the sleeves off, tied the poor dog   
quiet and, after comforting Livia, they both kneeled down   
to comfort the dog. He was like that. And the jacket   
that served as weapon and restraint?--was like him,   
every day of his life. It did what was needed.   

______________ 


I misread "migraine. Which of the two   
would we call the most rarefied? "Margarine?   
Or maybe comparison isn't the point. A ghost   
is a person rarefied through the fine, fine colander   
death; that doesn't make, for most of us, extinction   
an ideal. It was hard to think of Frank and Deloris   
divorcing, since it was hard to imagine the two of them   
engaging in anything so mundane as sex or rage or envy   
with the rest of the hoi polloi. They seemed unearthly   
in close to a literal way, like radio waves. And yet divorce 
they did. They found something real they could unjoin,   
hertz from hertz until there just was air.   

______________ 

A dream: We own the softest of the soft   
Mongolian camel underhair sweaters. One day   
(we think we're doing the "right thing) we release it   
into the wild, to romp with its brother and sister   
desert sweaters, out where it "belongs. 
You know, however, what happens by now: it's unfit   
to fend for itself amid that hardened herd.   
They beat it. It's hungry. It crawls back   
into the city, mewing, curling up at night against a door   
my father opens and, seeing something in need, brings it inside,   
wraps it in flannel. That's how he was.   
He'd give you the cheap shirt off his back.





from Paragraphs from a Day-Book (section 1 only)
 

For Hayden Carruth
Thought thrusts up, homely as a hyacinth    
wrapped in its bulb like a root-vegetable,    
a ninth-month    
belly, where the green indelible    
pattern's inscribed into the labyrinth.    
Thrust into light, it's air's inhabitant    
with light and air as food and drink.    
A hyacinth, tumescent pink    
on the low wooden Mexican chest    
confronts the wintry dusk    
with informed self-interest.    
Leaf-spears extravagantly ask    
what idea, still gnarled up in a knot    
of ganglions, will break through the husk    
shaped at last, recognizable as thought.    


 

    
Trace, on a city map, trajectories    
of partially-forgotten words    
along the river's arteries,    
volatile substance of a sentient world.    
Mauve heather crowds the window-grill. The light    
lingers a little later, with a slight    
vernal inflection. In a moon-glazed vase    
bloom yellow freesias, like some rainy day's    
brook-bank, in someone else's memory.    
Small whirlpools of perception widen, ring    
an infant's numinous discoveries    
of syllables for animals, toys, trees:    
a Lab's thick coat, the dusty birds    
in Claremont Park each tardy urban spring,    
a stuffed pink leather horse with button eyes.    


 

    
A question-mark in yellow overalls,    
I could read. I was three.    
I slept with that pink horse. My one doll's    
name was V. J. She'd been given to me    
to celebrate the Victory    
over Japan, that is to say, the Bomb    
I'd spend my schooldays taking shelter from.    
I couldn't tie my shoes. But Reddy the fox,    
Tootle the engine who jumped off the tracks,    
spelled me their stories on my mother's lap    
despite weak eyes and poor small-motor skills.    
My grandparents were dead: not in pogroms,    
not in the camps--of strokes and heart attacks,    
merely immigrants, not deportees.    
"When you die, does everything just stop?"    


 

    
I'm four, in itchy woolen leggings,    
the day that I can't recognize the man    
down at the park entrance, waving,    
as my father. He has ten    
more years to live, that spring. Dapper and balding    
he walks toward me; then I run toward him, calling    
him, flustered by my flawed vision.    
Underfoot, the maples' green-    
winged seeds splay on mica-specked octagons.    
His round face, thin nose, moustache silvered gray    
at thirty-eight look (I think now) Hungarian.    
I like his wood-smell of two packs a day    
as he swings me up to his shoulder    
and I say, things look blurry far away    
--one Saturday, two years after the war.





Sloth
 

If you're one of seven 

Downfalls, up in your kingdom 

Of mulberry leaves, there are men 

Betting you aren't worth a bullet, 



That your skin won't tan into a good 

Wallet. As if drugged in the womb 

& limboed in a honeyed languor, 

By the time you open your eyes 



A thousand species have lived 

& died. Born on a Sunday 

Morning, with old-world algae 

In your long hair, a goodness 



Disguised your two-toed claws 

Bright as flensing knives. In this 

Upside-down haven, you're reincarnated 

As a fallen angel trying to go home.





The Months
 

January


Contorted by wind,

mere armatures for ice or snow,

the trees resolve

to endure for now,


they will leaf out in April.

And I must be as patient

as the trees--

a winter resolution


I break all over again,

as the cold presses

its sharp blade 

against my throat.



February


After endless

hibernation

on the windowsill,

the orchid blooms--


embroidered purple stitches

up and down

a slender stem.

Outside, snow


melts midair

to rain.

Abbreviated month.

Every kind of weather.



March


When the Earl King came

to steal away the child

in Goethe's poem, the father said

don't be afraid,


it's just the wind. . .

As if it weren't the wind

that blows away the tender

fragments of this world--


leftover leaves in the corners

of the garden, a Lenten Rose

that thought it safe

to bloom so early.



April


In the pastel blur

of the garden, 

the cherry 

and redbud


shake rain

from their delicate

shoulders, as petals

of pink


dogwood

wash down the ditches

in dreamlike

rivers of color.



May


May apple, daffodil,

hyacinth, lily,

and by the front

porch steps


every billowing

shade of purple

and lavender lilac,

my mother's favorite flower,


sweet breath drifting through

the open windows:

perfume of memory--conduit

of spring.



June


The June bug

on the screen door

whirs like a small,

ugly machine,


and a chorus of frogs

and crickets drones like Musak

at all the windows.

What we don't quite see


comforts us.

Blink of lightning, grumble

of thunder--just the heat

clearing its throat.



July


Tonight the fireflies

light their brief

candles

in all the trees


of summer--

color of moonflakes,

color of fluorescent

lace


where the ocean drags

its torn hem

over the dark

sand.



August


Barefoot 

and sun-dazed, 

I bite into this ripe peach

of a month,


gathering children

into my arms

in all their sandy

glory,


heaping

my table each night

with nothing

but corn and tomatoes.



September


Their summer romance 

over, the lovers 

still cling 

to each other 


the way the green 

leaves cling 

to their trees 

in the strange heat 


of September, as if 

this time 

there will be 

no autumn. 



October


How suddenly 

the woods 

have turned 

again. I feel 


like Daphne, standing 

with my arms 

outstretched 

to the season, 


overtaken 

by color, crowned 

with the hammered gold 

of leaves. 



November 


These anonymous 

leaves, their wet 

bodies pressed 

against the window 


or falling past-- 

I count them 

in my sleep, 

absolving gravity, 


absolving even death 

who knows as I do 

the imperatives 

of the season. 



December


The white dove of winter 

sheds its first 

fine feathers; 

they melt 


as they touch 

the warm ground 

like notes 

of a once familiar 


music; the earth 

shivers and 

turns towards 

the solstice.









Figures in the Carpets
 

[SAROUK] 

We buy what we cannot control, the rugs, 
   rhythm-makers, containing refrains of 
the oldest story: a man takes a journey. 
   I have no stories inside me, he says, 
so travels on, to rest beneath a carpet 
   of blue constellations, star patterns 
at the edges of disordered border walls. 
   At the center, a meditative medallion 
makes a moving immortal-flowered ground: 
   to live there is to give oneself over 
to greenness, redness, occasional blues, 
   holding those spirits of woollen dyes 
rising from the knots within to breathe 
   against the woven, multi-colored air. 


[BIDJAR] 

Now there is a coat of many colors hung 
   around the wanderer's shoulders where 
he climbs out from that pit, down which 
   he flung himself, or was thrown into. 
Reaching to soothe his wounds, he finds 
   the dusts of centuries residing there 
beneath his feet, the hopeful travelers 
   passing, wearing thin, fighting about 
how best to articulate the names of gods 
   for whom they yearn--accursed by wars' 
helmet curves, shields, chained stitches 
   of unmediated reds and yellowed husks 
of blood--broken lines marking a garden 
   in whose precincts his journey began. 


[KAZAK] 

Three sunbursts spin, enigmatic energies 
   through golden latchhooks, surrounding 
cloudbanks; three eagles, darting within 
   their shifting images: they return him 
to streets of lit porches in summer dark, 
   a boy stuttering over random syllables, 
a blindfolded man pleading for his life-- 
   whose fate is in the hands of some men 
whose fate is in the hands of other men, 
   whose fate . . . until the whole pattern 
emerges, and the language becomes clear. 
   On the floor lies his mother, moaning, 
until he comes out, guilty, before her-- 
   amid the mud of his own frozen blood. 


[SHIRVAN] 

To live inside such squares as the weaver 
   of this green, becoming golden, labor; 
to pull back old skins and try to emerge, 
   victorious, from that old prison after 
so many years, is to find a path back to 
   harmonious designs, surely centered on 
the search--yet still speaking of a life 
   with knotted figures seen as suffering 
variations on themes that can be inferred 
   from small vibrations of weft and warp, 
the snakes' within the threads worn down 
   to the shapes of ribbons, even rhythms 
writhing in a loom of days: those humming 
   ancient instruments whose music seems 


[SHIRAZ] 

raw as colors governed by the earth, pink 
   as brick, or deserts scraped from rock, 
rough clay slowly grinding, then drifting 
   down the slopes of the central plateaus 
to fresh respites from thinner regions of 
   dessication fixed at the fringes below. 
These lands lie under the ache of desire, 
   which calls feet out to play upon sand, 
to fill each new hollow, and dance about, 
   tongues turning on the knots of umber, 
ochre, woven into those undulating waves 
   others might summon in flowery manners 
to escape from bitter orange, still held 
   by recalcitrant fingers, to the purple 


[KERMAN] 

empowering all those who try to hold on-- 
   as all things will hold to themselves 
an idea of themselves--to an aspiration 
   towards good fortune, unwavering even 
unto death. Yet here are dusky passages, 
   canopies of clearness, an everlasting 
understanding of the earth as cancerous 
   points of coloration, acid starbursts, 
or dangerous blots--all blurring the way 
   to move past sight: perspectives lost 
and found again, symmetrical, surrounded 
   by the momentos one saves from travel, 
old friends, like hues that may betoken, 
   in hopefulness, some changes of heart. 


[SENNEH] 

This creates a powerful language about 
   how to levitate a plane--for even as 
the occasional murmurs of new machines 
   are heard in the land, as old cyclic 
gardens arrange themselves in the whorls 
   and tendrils throughout tilled fields, 
snakes hold up this world in variations 
   of light blue skies above temptation. 
Even when an illiterate weaver mistakes 
   an old date for the design, then dyes 
and binds strange numbers into a ground, 
   the change of the serif, for instance, 
in a calligraphy of days marks the date 
   of cartouches as mysterious, unknown. 


[KASHAN] 

Yet the signals from the borders suggest 
   a different tale: lozenges are bottles 
strewn along mauve and terra cotta roads, 
   shaped like a woman found lying along 
the side of those same roads--the figure 
   of flesh, going nowhere but endlessly 
back on itself--as a web of years frames 
   a dying kind of certitude, innocence. 
The birds in these cages signify singing, 
   as the tapestries of perfected threads 
suggest reticence, chosen intermediaries 
   to the indeterminancy of all creation:

and we can buy it yet, articulate or not, 
   with each new freeing of our hearts.





Stalin's Library Card
 

A recent piece in PRAVDA gives the library books checked out by Stalin between April and December, 1926. Much has been made of their oddity... 
                                                   Robert Conquest
I

THE ESSENCE OF HYPNOSIS 
(Paris: LeGrande, 1902) 

The woman has agreed to swallow pins, 
and here, white-robed, 
                                  stands great Dr. Charcot, 

pointing to the needles in her palm. The photo 
makes them gleam. The stovepipe-hatted amphitheatre strains, 

heads abob for better looks. She's about 
to lap them like sugar, but the Doctor's minion 

stays her hand; down her dress they glitter and rain. 
And now from the murmuring crowd he procures a hat, 

placing it upon her lap. 
                                       Your child is crying. 
Can you soothe him? Tenderly the hat's caressed. 

To and fro she rocks it as she sings--a case 
of "simple congestive hysteria." He is dying, 

woman, your child is dying! The tears cascade, 
her shoulders twitch and tremble. Diagnosis confirmed. 

II 

SYPHILLIS: ITS DETECTION, HISTORY, AND TREATMENT--ILLUSTRATED 
(Munich: Insel Verlag, 1922) 

"The shoulders twitch and tremble at the tertiary stage, 
signalling generally the advent of paresis." 

Comrade Stalin tamps his pipe and struts 
the carpet to the phone, having marked another passage 

with red pen. Do not put him through, I said. 
I am trying to relax. The receiver's slammed down: 

collectivization can wait. 
                                          He re-cracks the spine, 
relights the merscham to Nietzsche gone mad, 

to Schumann demented, to sepias of six noseless 
Neopolitans, an aged whore whose arms are candlewax, 

spirochettes that marinate the blood, x-es 
and arrows to mark their swim. His pulse 

crescendos and his forehead glistens, 
x and asterisks-- 
                            all night the margins redden.

III

THE RIGHT TO KILL
(Moscow: Bezbozhnik, third ed., 1913) 

X and asterisk: shorthand all night flowing
out the stenographer's hand. Agent Shivarov:

Why do you think we've arrested you? He   cups
his face in his hands while Mandelstam fidgets, blowing

on his tea to cool it.
                              Could it be your poems? 
(The bulb's faint hum, the stenographer's cough.)

On the desk a bulging file, from which Shivarov
removes a smudged carbon, sliding it toward Mandelstam

along the tabletop. A recitation, please? 
The hand begins to quiver as the carbon blues

his palm--
               "the Kremlin mountaineer ... the thick worms
of his fingers ... executions on his tongue like berries."

Do you recognize yourself as guilty of composing tracts
of counter-revolutionary nature? And the blue hand shakes.

IV

IS RESURRECTION OF THE DEAD POSSIBLE?
(London: Theosophy International, 1921)

Against the table the cadaver thrashes: its blue arms quiver--
a little. More voltage to the genitals.

and a kind of erection is achieved, which Dr. Lysenko
duly notes, yet Lazarus does not stir,

exactly.
               One week to Comrade Stalin's visit,
and the demonstrations must impress:

too much voltage and the corpses combust,
too little and the limbs remain inert

as noodles. Notes scratched on his clipboard, the doctor
scowls to his humpbacked assistant, who hits

the switch.
                   And Lazarus sizzles--flames emit
from the electroded temples. The good doctor swears

and flails his arms, as the corpse performs
its own suttee. The corpse has the final word.

V

RITUAL MURDER AMONG THE JEWS
(St. Petersburg: Grani Vot, 1910)

Do not wait until we force you: we will have the final say.
Begin your confession.
                                  Precise as a slide rule

and always natural as the smell of dill--
interrogation, too, is art. Babel sways

upon his stool, his neck goes limp. The aesthetics
of confession must be formalist:

The Trotskyist Babel will weep and stutter but list
in the end his cohort spies.
                                             Yet first he must wake.

Cold water to the face, a truncheon to the legs
and the writer's block is over. The singing

commences with the truncheon's sting,
the singing and the singing and the singing--

its own dark Kaddish, its own crematorium smoke.
The verdict is final, the case is closed. 

VI

PRACTICAL VERSIFICATION
(Moscow: Nova Mysl, 1908)

Should the couplets be open or should they be closed?
The day requires signatures, decrees.

He longs for verse, but must speak in prose.
All the endless signatures.
                                           A photo shoot: he poses

with pen in hand, the Pravda newsman on his knees.
Should the couplets be open or should they be closed?

Signatures of every sort, the pace never slows.
The State revised, rewritten endlessly.

He hungers for verse but lives by prose,
Redrafted, retouched. The coffins set in rows

like Red Square parades, marching to infinity.
Should the couplets be open
                                          or should they be closed?

Late in the Kremlin, his desk lamp glows.
So much to excise, he's up until three.

(O to live by verse instead of prose.)
The drafts soar upward. On his desk the pile grows

skyscraper high, Babel tower and gallows tree.
O sentence in verse, O sentence in prose.

Should the couplets be open or should they be closed?

VII

PROPOSAL FOR REVISION OF THE FIRST SOVIET ENCYCLOPEDIA
(Moscow: Kommunisticheskoy Partii, 1926)

The people can be made to swallow anything.
For example Comrade Yezhov,
                                           Special Marshal

of the Secret Police, has been shot. He will
now require closure, require editing.

His service to the party, his Trotskyite past,
all must now be excised, even his birth

converted to white space.
                                        And first
his face must pentimento down to nothingness.

No longer can he pose with Comrade Stalin
admiring the Moscow-Volga Canal. Now he is water.

No longer at His right in parades at Red Square.
Now he is air, is brickwork on the viewing stand.

And now the past itself is air, is water, and finally fire,
whitening to ash.
                           In his fat fingers its pages flare. 







Looking Around
 

I sit where I always sit, in back of the Buddha, 
Red leather wing chair, pony skin trunk 
                                                         under my feet, 
Sky light above me, Chinese and Indian rugs on the floor. 
1 March, 1998, where to begin again? 

Over there's the ur-photograph, 
          Giorgio Morandi, glasses pushed up on his forehead, 
Looking hard at four objects-- 
Two olive oil tins, one wine bottle, one flower vase, 
A universe of form and structure, 

The universe constricting in front of his eyes, 
                                                                   angelic orders 
And applications scraped down 
To paint on an easel stand, some in the frame, some not. 
Bologna, my friend, Bologna, world's bit and world's end. 
                                           _________ 

It's only in darkness you can see the light, only 
From emptiness that things start to fill, 
I read once in a dream, I read in a book 
                                                             under the pink 
Redundancies of the spring peach trees. 
Old fires, old geographies. 
In that case, make it old, I say, make it singular 
In its next resurrection, 
White violets like photographs on the tombstone of the yard. 

Each year it happens this way, each year 
Something dead comes back and lifts up its arms, 
                                                                      puts down its luggage 
And says--in the same costume, down-at-heels, badly sewn-- 
I bring you good news from the other world. 
                                           _________ 

One hand on the sun, one hand on the moon, both feet bare,    
God of the late 
                        Mediterranean Renaissance 
Breaststrokes across the heavens. 
Easter, and all who've been otherwised peek from their shells, 

Thunderheads gathering at the rear 
                                                    abyss of things, 
Lightning, quick swizzle sticks, troubling the dark in-between. 
You're everything that I'm not, they think, 
I'll fly away, Lord, I'll fly away. 

April's agnostic and nickel-plated and skin deep, 
Glitter and bead-spangle, haute couture, 
The world its runway, slink-step and glide. 
Roll the stone slowly as it vogues and turns, 
                                                                  roll the stone slowly. 
                                           _________ 

Well, that was a month ago. May now, 
What's sure to arrive has since arrived and been replaced, 
Snick-snack, lock and load, grey heart's bull's-eye, 
A little noon music out of the trees, 
                                                         a sonatina in green. 

Spring passes. Across the room, on the opposite wall, 
A 19th century photograph 
Of the Roman arena in Verona. Inside, 
                                                             stone tiers and stone gate. 
Over the outer portico, the ghost of Catullus at sky's end. 
The morning and evening stars never meet, 
                                                               nor summer and spring: 
Beauty has been my misfortune, 
                                             hard journey, uncomfortable resting place. 
Whatever it is I have looked for 
Is tiny, so tiny it can dance in the palm of my hand. 
                                           _________ 

This is the moment of our disregard-- 
                                                       just after supper, 
Unseasonable hail in huddles across the porch, 
The dogs whimpering, 
                         thunder and lightning eddying off toward the east, 
Nothing to answer back to, nothing to dress us down. 

Thus do we slide into our disbelief 
                                                      and disaffection, 
Caught in the weeds and understory of our own lives, 
Bad weather, bad dreams. 
Proper attention is our refuge now, our perch and our praise. 

So? So. The moon has its rain-ring auraed around it-- 
The more that we think we understand, the less we see, 
Back yard becoming an obelisk 
Of darkness into the sky, 
                                     no hieroglyphs, no words to the wise.





Some Assembly Required
 

Standing in line at the SuperSave, it all falls   
Into place, Princess Di and the aliens and diet   
Tips from outer space, King Tut and King Elvis,   
   Out of the subfusc air, the rank urgency of dusk,   
   Among the heavy odors of differing dungs,   
   Acrid signatures of urine, the bold perfume of musk . . . 
Nostradamus, this year's senate race, unforeseen   
Links between absolutely everything and sex,   
Conspiracies requiring conspiracy to be detected,   
   From a sibilance of scattered leaves, the sudden   
   Snap of twig, inflections of a gabbling breeze,   
   Horizons stained with dust, the attitude of trees . . . 
And O my fellow shoppers waiting to check out,   
What appetite is this that drives such dim belief,   
What thirst for intercourse between these banal bits?   
   From the cacophony of birds as from abrupt silence,   
   Odd sounds of usual insects, subliminal presence   
   Of added shadow, faintest trembling in the ground . . .   
When greed and accident stand ever ready to explain,   
Whence this convolvulus of tenuous connection?   
What need for the devious when the obvious will do?   
   From remarkable weeds, from a slight imbalance   
   In the normal proportion of game, from distressed bark,   
   Out of the bewildering swirl of importunate sense . . .   
Attention, shoppers, there lies a veldt within us each,   
Its grasses rustle with intent, and on that plain   
Was born the fine suspicion that has carried us so far,   
   To behold the unassuming fact and comprehend design,   
   To look upon confusion and construct its plot and act,   
 To leap at merest notion found floating in the mind . . .   
Has brought us to these sheltered aisles under thin gray light,   
Where in boredom and abundance we seek our narrative, 
Whatever tale comes now to kill us and can creep.





Good People
 

From the kindness of my parents   
I suppose it was that I held   
that belief about suffering   

imagining that if only   
it could come to the attention   
of any person with normal   
feelings certainly anyone   
literate who might have gone   

to college they would comprehend   
pain when it went on before them   
and would do something about it   
whenever they saw it happen   
in the time of pain the present   
they would try to stop the bleeding   
for example with their own hands   

but it escapes their attention   
or there may be reasons for it   
the victims under the blankets   
the meat counters the maimed children   
the animals the animals   
staring from the end of the world





In Time
 

The night the world was going to end
when we heard those explosions not far away
and the loudspeakers telling us
about the vast fires on the backwater
consuming undisclosed remnants
and warning us over and over
to stay indoors and make no signals
you stood at the open window
the light of one candle back in the room
we put on high boots to be ready 
for wherever we might have to go
and we got out the oysters and sat
at the small table feeding them
to each other first with the fork
then from our mouths to each other
until there were none and we stood up
and started to dance without music
slowly we danced around and around
in circles and after a while we hummed
when the world was about to end
all those years all those nights ago





To My Father's Business
 

Leo bends over his desk    
Gazing at a memorandum    
While Stuart stands beside him    
With a smile, saying,    
"Leo, the order for those desks    
Came in today    
From Youngstown Needle and Thread!"    
C. Loth Inc., there you are    
Like Balboa the conqueror    
Of those who want to buy office furniture    
Or bar fixtures    
In nineteen forty in Cincinnati, Ohio!    
Secretaries pound out    
Invoices on antique typewriters--    
Dactyllographs    
And fingernail biters.    
I am sitting on a desk    
Looking at my daddy    
Who is proud of but feels unsure about    
Some aspects of his little laddie.    
I will go on to explore    
Deep and/or nonsensical themes    
While my father's on the dark hardwood floor    
Hit by a couple of Ohio sunbeams.    
Kenny, he says, some day you'll work in the store.    
But I felt "never more" or "never ever"    
Harvard was far away    
World War Two was distant    
Psychoanalysis was extremely expensive    
All of these saved me from you.    
C. Loth you made my father happy    
I saw his face shining    
He laughed a lot, working in you    
He said to Miss Ritter    
His secretary    
"Ritt, this is my boy, Kenny!"    
"Hello there Kenny," she said    
My heart in an uproar    
I loved you but couldn't think    
Of staying with you    
I can see the virtues now    
That could come from being in you    
A sense of balance    
Compromise and acceptance--    
Not isolated moments of brilliance    
Like a girl without a shoe,    
But someone that you    
Care for every day--    
Need for customers and the economy    
Don't go away.    
There were little pamphlets    
Distributed in you    
About success in business    
Each about eight to twelve pages long    
One whole series of them    
All ended with the words    
"P.S. He got the job"    
One a story about a boy who said,    
"I swept up the street, Sir,    
Before you got up." Or    
"There were five hundred extra    catalogues    
So I took them to people in the city who have a dog"--    
P.S. He got the job.    
I didn't get the job    
I didn't think that I could do the job    
I thought I might go crazy in the job    
Staying in you    
You whom I could love    
But not be part of    
The secretaries clicked    
Their Smith Coronas closed at five p.m.    
And took the streetcars to Kentucky then    
And I left too.





The Men
 

I'm Ramn Gonzlez Barbagelata from anywhere,    
from Cucuy, from Paran, from Rio Turbio, from Oruro,   
from Maracaibo, from Parral, from Ovalle, from Loconmilla,    
I'm the poor devil from the poor Third World,    
I'm the third-class passenger installed, good God!    
in the lavish whiteness of snow-covered mountains,    
concealed among orchids of subtle idiosyncrasy.    

I've arrived at this famous year 2000, and what do I get? 
With what do I scratch myself? What do I have to do with    
the three glorious zeros that flaunt themselves    
over my very own zero, my own non-existence?    
Pity that brave heart awaiting its call    
or the man enfolded by warmer love,    
nothing's left today except my flimsy skeleton,    
my eyes unhinged, confronting the era's beginning.    

The era's beginning: are these ruined shacks,    
these poor schools, these people still in rags and tatters,    
this cloddish insecurity of my poor families,    
is all this the day? the century's beginning, the golden door?    

Well, enough said, I, at least, discreet,    
as in office, patched and pensive,    
I proclaim the redundancy of the inaugural:    
I've arrived here with all my baggage,    
bad luck and worse jobs,    
misery always waiting with open arms,    
the mobilization of people piled up on top of each other,    
and the manifold geography of hunger.





The Letter Scale
 

One of the objects I've treasured most in my life 
Is this letter scale which, long ago, you gave me. 
I was an active correspondent at the time, 
Even sending lots of letters overseas. 
While still enjoying the pleasure of going to the post, 
I now had another: assessing exactly, in advance, 
At my counter, the cost of packets and envelopes, 
To which, price list in hand, I stuck my stamps. 
I use it less these days, this quite simple device 
Graded with little marks up to a whole pound, 
For my mailings rarely still exceed the price 
Of an ordinary stamp. The tray of polished metal's now 
Covered with dust, without the slightest hint 
That the red pointer marking the weight on the front 
Has budged. But in the long run, one would, I think, 
Discern a difference and see how much the months 
Were worth in terms of dust, the seasons elapsed 
Since the previous weighing. But having been seized, 
Suddenly, just this morning, by a tremendous attack 
(Annual) of cleaning, from which nothing is released, 
I restored to the tray's slightly concave stainless steel, 
That ever so slightly distorted mirror, its polished shine. 
It reflected all of the sky, through which clouds reeled, 
And I could confirm that space does not weigh more than time.





Eschatology of the Lexicon
 

They come down to us   
rounding the corners of centuries   
at an innocent jog, shedding letters   
and most of the grand old meanings   
to take on the sleek new hide   
our day demands, a snappier   
nap that can repel the stare   
of a rather less tactful sun;   

they come down to us com-   
pounding, bounding in idiot   
joy, they come with that trustful   
tired old mutt look, that soft woof,   
warm doggie sigh on the knee,   
hoping for what? Some reason,   
no doubt, to continue sounding.   
Give me one good reason,   

they come down to us saying,   
as if we could have one without them.





The Heart's Archaeology
 

On some fundless expedition, 
you discover it beneath 
a pyracantha bush 
carved from the hip bone 
of a long-extinct herbivore 
that walked the plains on legs 
a story tall. An ocarina of bone 
drilled and shaped laboriously 
with tools too soft to be efficient 
by one primitive musician 
spending night after night 
squatting by the fire. 
No instrument of percussion: 
place this against your lips, 
fill it from your lungs to sound 
a note winding double helix, solo 
and thready calling to the pack.





Beech
 

For a tree, you're the worst kind 
of friend, remembering everything. 
Pale-skinned, slightly brailled, blank 
page of pre-adolescence. The way 
the smallest knife-slice would darken 
with time, rise and widen. 

mark was here. Left his. 
But these are the digs you're used to, 
sufferer of mere presence, 
scratched years, scratched loves 
we wanted to write on the world 
and couldn't trust to an eardrum. 

(I scarred you myself long ago with 
my own jack-knife, jill-name. 
You took her as the morning 
unsteamed around me. Took us 
as we had to be taken, in.) Old relief, 
new reminder, I was young, what could 

I have written? Didn't care then, had               
to see it scraped out, big letters beneath 
your erotic nubs and crotches. O beech, 
it's no big riddle: we fell in the forest, 
you heard. Quiet, in your own way. 
In your own way, spreading the word.





Subway Seethe
 

What could have been the big to-do 
that caused him to push me aside 
on that platform? Was a woman who knew 
there must be some good even inside 
an ass like him on board that train? 
Charity? Frances? His last chance 
in a ratty string of last chances? Jane? 
Surely in all of us is some good. 
Better love thy neighbor, buddy, 
lest she shove back. Maybe I should. 
It's probably just a cruddy 
downtown interview leading to 
some cheap-tie, careerist, dull 
cul-de-sac he's speeding to. 
Can he catch up with his soul? 
Really, what was the freaking crisis? 
Did he need to know before me 
if the lights searching the crowd's eyes 
were those of our train, or maybe 
the train of who he might have been, 
the person his own-heart-numbing, 
me-shoving anxiety about being 
prevents him from ever becoming? 
How has his thoughtlessness defiled 
who I was before he shoved me? 
How might I be smiling now if he'd smiled, 
hanging back, as though he might have loved me?





Butter
 

Butter, like love, 
seems common enough 
yet has so many imitators. 
I held a brick of it, heavy and cool, 
and glimpsed what seemed like skin 
beneath a corner of its wrap; 
the dcolletage revealed 
a most attractive fat! 

And most refined. 
Not milk, not cream, 
not even crme de la crme. 
It was a delicacy which assured me 
that bliss follows agitation, 
that even pasture daisies 
through the alchemy of four stomachs 
may grace a king's table. 

We have a yellow bowl near the toaster 
where summer's butter grows 
soft and sentimental. 
We love it better for its weeping, 
its nostalgia for buckets and churns 
and deep stone wells, 
for the press of a wooden butter mold 
shaped like a swollen heart.





Scary Movies
 

Today the cloud shapes are terrifying,   
and I keep expecting some enormous   
black-and-white B-movie Cyclops   
to appear at the edge of the horizon, 

to come striding over the ocean   
and drag me from my kitchen   
to the deep cave that flickered   
into my young brain one Saturday 

at the Baronet Theater where I sat helpless   
between my older brothers, pumped up   
on candy and horror--that cave, 
the litter of human bones 

gnawed on and flung toward the entrance,   
I can smell their stench as clearly 
as the bacon fat from breakfast. This   
is how it feels to lose it-- 

not sanity, I mean, but whatever it is   
that helps you get up in the morning 
and actually leave the house 
on those days when it seems like death 

in his brown uniform 
is cruising his panel truck 
of packages through your neighborhood.   
I think of a friend's voice 

on her answering machine-- 
Hi, I'm not here-- 
the morning of her funeral,   
the calls filling up the tape 

and the mail still arriving, 
and I feel as afraid as I was 
after all those vampire movies   
when I'd come home and lie awake 

all night, rigid in my bed, 
unable to get up 
even to pee because the undead   
were waiting underneath it; 

if I so much as stuck a bare 
foot out there in the unprotected air   
they'd grab me by the ankle and pull me   
under. And my parents said there was 

nothing there, when I was older   
I would know better, and now   
they're dead, and I'm older,   
and I know better.





Your Clothes
 

Of course they are empty shells, without hope of animation. 
Of course they are artifacts. 

Even if my sister and I should wear some, 
or if we give others away, 

they will always be your clothes without you, 
as we will always be your daughters without you.





Pauline Is Falling
 

                                             from the cliff's edge, 
kicking her feet in panic and despair 
as the circle of light contracts and blackness 
takes the screen. And that 
is how we leave her, hanging--though we know 
she will be rescued, only to descend 
into fresh harm, the story flowing on, 
disaster and reprieve--systole, diastole--split 
rhythm of a heart that hungers 

only to go on. So why is this like my mother, 
caged in a railed bed, each breath, 
a fresh installment in a tortured tale 
of capture and release? Nine days 
she dangled, stubborn, 
over the abyss, the soft clay crumbling 
beneath her fingertips, until she dropped 
with a little bird cry of surprise 
into the swift river below. 

Here metaphor collapses, for there was no love 
to rescue her, no small boat 
waiting with a net to fish her out, 
although the water carried her, 
and it was April when we buried her 
among the weeping cherries and the waving 
flags and in the final fade, a heron 
breasted the far junipers 
to gain the tremulous air and swim away.





Wake Me in South Galway
 

Wake me in South Galway, or better yet 
In Clare. You'll know the pub I have in mind. 
Improvise a hearse--one of those decrepit 
Postal vans would suit me down to the ground-- 
A rust-addled Renault, Kelly green with a splash 
Of Oscar Wilde yellow stirred in to clash 
With the dazzling perfect meadows and limestone 
On the coast road from Kinvara down toward Ballyvaughan. 

Once you've got in off the road at Newquay 
Push aside some barstools and situate me 
Up in front by the door where the musicians sit, 
Their table crowded with pints and a blue teapot, 
A pouch of Drum, some rolling papers and tin 
Whistles. Ask Charlie Piggott to play a tune 
That sounds like loss and Guinness, turf smoke and rain, 
While Brenda dips in among the punters like a hedge-wren. 

Will I hear it? Maybe not. But I hear it now. 
The smoke of the music fills my nostrils, I feel the attuned 
Box and fiddle in harness, pulling the plough 
Of the melody, turning the bog-dark, root-tangled ground. 
Even the ceramic collie on the windowsill 
Cocks an ear as the tune lifts and the taut sail 
Of the Galway hooker trills wildly in its frame on the wall, 
Rippling to the salt pulse and seabreeze of a West Clare reel. 

Many a night, two octaves of one tune, 
We sat here side by side, your body awake 
To a jig or slide, me mending the drift of a line 
As the music found a path to my notebook. 
Lost in its lilt and plunge I would disappear 
Into the heathery freedom of a slow air 
Or walk out under the powerful stars to clear 
My head of thought and breathe their cooled-down fire. 

When my own session ends, let me leave like that, 
Porous to the wind that blows off the ocean. 
Goodbye to the company and step into the night 
Completed and one-off, like a well-played tune-- 
Beyond the purified essence of hearth fires 
Rising from the life of the parish, past smoke and stars, 
Released from everything I've done and known. 
I won't go willingly, it's true, but I'll be gone.





Today
 

If ever there were a spring day so perfect, 

so uplifted by a warm intermittent breeze 


that it made you want to throw 

open all the windows in the house 


and unlatch the door to the canary's cage, 

indeed, rip the little door from its jamb, 


a day when the cool brick paths 

and the garden bursting with peonies 


seemed so etched in sunlight 

that you felt like taking 


a hammer to the glass paperweight 

on the living room end table, 


releasing the inhabitants 

from their snow-covered cottage 


so they could walk out, 

holding hands and squinting 


into this larger dome of blue and white, 

well, today is just that kind of day.





Mind | Body
 

How do they survive, riven   
as they are, the one undoing   
the other's desire?   

Tell the body to outrun   
the mind, and the mind smirks,   
whispering too loudly 
this way   this way,   
blocking all the exits.   

And the body, luxurious   
sensualist by pool side or in bed,   
doesn't it hear the mind's   
impatient machinery ticking 
it's time   it's time? 

And only in our mind's eye,   
as we're fond of saying,   
someone else's body leaping nimbly   
in jets of thought, or revealing   
to us Act V, scene iii   
in one gestural flourish,   
body and mind beautifully   
synchronous.   

Oh, the mind is eely, slipping   
out of its puzzle boxes,   
loving its own wit.   

And the earnest body: speak of it   
with the least irony, and already   
you've begun to unnerve it.   

Better to let them have their way,   
forgetting about them both   
until they meet again sometime   
as if for the first time   
in library or steam room   
ready to shake hello 

or lead you to whatever door there is   
and always the two sets of stairs.





Suitcase Song
 

John-O was given a key to the apartment. The deal   
was this: if Phil died suddenly, and John-O heard,   
he would rush on over, enter the apartment, leave   
unseen with Phil's brown suitcase, and secretly pitch it   
into the mounded deeps of the city dump.   
Simply, there were things that Phil didn't want   
to hurt his family with. Do you have yours?   
I have mine. The brown suitcase. Sasha's sister,   
on her deathbed--dinky, frail, just a mild   
skim-milk trickle of a hospice patient-- 
tensed, sat up, and unloosed   
such confessional invective that it seemed the walls   
and the sheets would have to be splattered in shit,   
her cancer having acted with the harsh, disbursing   
force of a tornado on the brown and hard-shelled   
suitcase in her electrochemical memory webs.   
Is yours secure? from love? from sodium pentathol?   
Last year, when a tornado hit our fringe   
of downtown businesses, the air was alive for counties around   
with the downward dance of naked canceled checks,   
handwritten notes, hotel receipts, e-mail transcripts,   
smeary Polaroids, a swirl of lacy underwisps   
that jellyfished the skies, and from The G-Spot Shoppe   
a rain of plastic pleasure aids, of which one prime example   
pierced a cow between the eyes and struck her dead.   

Maybe AIDS--I wasn't sure. But he was dying,   
that was sure: as dry as a stick of human chalk,   
and making the terrible scritch-sound of a stick of chalk,   
in his throat, in the community air, in the room   
across from Sasha's sister. Something . . . hidden 
in the trace of rundown aura still around him   
as we chatted there one morning . . . a tv? a sissyboy tv?   
I wasn't sure, but it was obvious   
his life-chalk held a story not yet written,   
not confessed yet   
for this storyniverous planet.   
And when I remembered my mother's own   
last days . . . the way a person is a narrative,   
the strength of which is either   
revelation or withholding. It was summer, and the garden   
at the nursing home was fat with summer's pleasures:   
flowered mounds like reefs of coral,   
bees as globular as whole yolks.   
In her room, my mother disappeared a breath   
at a time, and everything else was only a kind of scenery for that.   
The wink of pollen in the light. The birds. Their feather-lice.   
The bursting spores. Those opened-up   
cicada husks abandoned on the patio   
--the small, brown, unlocked luggage   
that's completed its work in this world.





Ants
 

Two wandering across the porcelain 

Siberia, one alone on the window sill, 


four across the ceiling's senseless field 

of pale yellow, one negotiating folds 


in a towel: tiny, bronze-colored, antennae 

'strongly elbowed,' crawling over Antony 


and Cleopatra, face down, unsurprised, 

one dead in the mountainous bar of soap. 


Sub-family Formicinae (a single 

segment behind the thorax), the sickle 


moons of their abdomens, one trapped in bubbles 

(I soak in the tub); with no clear purpose 


they come in by the baseboard, do not bite, 

crush bloodless beneath a finger. Peterson's


calls them 'social creatures,' yet what grim 

society: identical pilgrims, 


seed-like, brittle, pausing on the path 

only three seconds to touch another's 


face, some hoisting the papery carcasses 

of their dead in their jaws, which open and close 


like the clasp of a necklace. 'Mating occurs 

in flight'-- what better way? Weightless, reckless 


rapture: the winged queen and her mate, quantum 

passion spiraling near the kumquat, 


and then the queen sheds her wings, plants 

the pearl-like larvae in their cribs of sand: 


more anvil-headed, creeping attentions 

to follow cracks in the tile, the lip of the tub, 


and one starting across the mirror now, doubled.





Street Boy
 

The afternoon slows down, the town in steady rain.   
That one with the trendy chicken-plucked look--   
hair a tufted circle on top, the rest shaved all around--   
I can't really care about. Of course I hope   
he grows up without totalling himself and his car,   
but he's the clown in this act. He seems even   
to know his place as unworthy twerpy follower   
of the one no one would look away from for long,   
whose James Dean stance, hands deep in pockets   
of a rattily natty maroon corduroy blazer,   
shoves his shoulders nearly to his ears.   
Beneath the blazer, long sulked-in jeans,   
oversized black boots. He lifts one   
to kick a milkshake someone couldn't finish   
standing on the sidewalk, and it lands on   
its side, explodes and rolls a vanilla graffito,   
expletive unfurling. Expressionless himself.   
The other boy smirks before the rain douses   
and sweeps it stupidly into the gutter.   

Even if I were not invisible through this darkish window,   
they would know how to erase me. Well,   he  would.   
I would enjoy that, just to see how he would do it,   
what sort of panache he'd pack in his shrug.   

Raining harder, and the tuft-headed one shifts   
unhappily under the Revco awning, pivoting   
his whole body now and then to see what the one   
I'm half in love with's doing, fifteen, maybe sixteen:   
he's twitching in sublime irritation, lighting up   
again, hard to do with both hands in your pockets   
but he pretty much manages no problem, and now   
comes the move that gets me. He strides out   
from under the awning, a spotted Lucky sticking straight   
from his lip, walks two buildings down and turns   
at the corner so his back's to Main Street and me,   
stands, his twitch becalmed at last, stands   
without heeding his friend's pleading   
jeering calls, you idiot,  you idiot, you 
idiot, stands hunched, not looking up or down,   
and I can tell this is his moment, this is where   
he'll break off, he's going to unload everyone,   
he doesn't blink as he hawks up their nothingness   
and spits, feeling himself filling with what's left:   
he takes possession of his spirited bad luck for good   
and mounts and rides it without moving a muscle, stands   
letting the rain collect behind his collar and drench   
his gloriously inappropriately maroon corduroy   
and his hair that looks not combable by anyone   
alive, wild and bunched even when the rain   
has patted keeps patting at it harder and harder   
like an obsolete humiliated hand that wants to   
feed and fend for and in general do for him,   
and he has turned his back at last on the clown,   
and on Main Street full of clowns you can both see   
and not see, who wouldn't dare try to keep an eye on him   
or try to follow him from now on.





The Painter of the Night
 

          
             Someone called in a report that she had 
seen a man painting in the dark over by the 
pond. A police car was dispatched to go in- 
vestigate. The two officers with their big 
flashlights walked all around the pond, but 
found nothing suspicious. Hatcher was the 
younger of the two, and he said to Johnson, 
"What do you think he was painting?" Johnson 
looked bemused and said, "The dark, stupid. 
What else could he have been painting?" Hatcher, 
a little hurt, said, "Frogs in the Dark, Lily- 
pads in the Dark, Pond in the Dark. Just as 
many things exist in the dark as they do in
the light." Johnson paused, exasperated. Then 
Hatcher added, "I'd like to see them. Hell, 
I might even buy one. Maybe there's more out 
there than we know. We are the police, after- 
all. We need to know."
        




Battlefield
 

Back when I used to be Indian
I am standing outside the
pool hall with my sister.
She strawberry blonde. Stale sweat
and beer through the
open door. A warrior leans on his stick,
fingers blue with chalk.
Another bends to shoot.
His braids brush the green
felt, swinging to the beat
of the jukebox. We move away.
Hank Williams falls again
in the backseat of a Cadillac.
I look back.
A wind off the distant hills lifts my shirt,
brings the scent
of wounded horses.







That Child
 

That child was dangerous. That just-born 
    Newly washed and silent baby 
         Wrapped in deerskin and held warm 
Against the side of its mother could understand 
    The language of birds and animals 
         Even when asleep. It knew why Bluejay 
Was scolding the bushes, what Hawk was explaining 
   To the wind on the cliffside, what Bittern had found out 
         While standing alone in marsh grass. It knew 
What the screams of Fox and the whistling of Otter 
    Were telling the forest. That child knew 
         The language of Fire 
As it gnawed at sticks like Beaver 
    And what Water said all day and all night 
         At the creek's mouth. As its small fingers 
Closed around Stone, it held what Stone was saying. 
    It knew what Bear Mother whispered to herself 
         Under the snow. It could not tell 
Anyone what it knew. It would laugh 
    Or cry out or startle or suddenly stare 
         At nothing, but had no way 
To repeat what it was hearing, what it wanted most 
    Not to remember. It had no way to know 
         Why it would fall under a spell 
And lie still as if not breathing, 
    Having grown afraid 
         Of what it could understand. That child would learn 
To sit and crawl and stand and begin 
    Putting one foot forward and following it 
         With the other, would learn to put one word 
It could barely remember slightly ahead 
    Of the other and then walk and speak 
         And finally run and chatter, 
And all the Tillamook would know that child 
    Had forgotten everything and at last could listen 
         Only to people and was safe now. 







Numbers
 

I like the generosity of numbers.
The way, for example,
they are willing to count
anything or anyone:
two pickles, one door to the room,
eight dancers dressed as swans.

I like the domesticity of addition--
add two cups of milk and stir--
the sense of plenty: six plums
on the ground, three more
falling from the tree.

And multiplication's school
of fish times fish,
whose silver bodies breed
beneath the shadow
of a boat.

Even subtraction is never loss,
just addition somewhere else:
five sparrows take away two,
the two in someone else's 
garden now.

There's an amplitude to long division,
as it opens Chinese take-out
box by paper box,
inside every folded cookie
a new fortune.

And I never fail to be surprised
by the gift of an odd remainder,
footloose at the end:
forty-seven divided by eleven equals four,
with three remaining.

Three boys beyond their mother's call,
two Italians off to the sea,
one sock that isn't anywhere you look.





A Hopkins Rumble, 1999
 

For James Richardson
Gerard, juke-step Jerry, little wrestler, soul-mess 
of sinew and mind-sight, fired spark, joyed Jesuit, 
grief-clog too, but a Pan-flute in every Ave, you half-nelson 
the syntax dandies, ram them to canvas, sit upon and pin 

the god-fops, minions of ghost tomes, trite chimes, 
though you walk among them, too, jig and roar 
of black-robed stroll in golden-grove and choral iambs. 
You were, yes, that falcon flight, the labor, soar, and 

dive, but buzzard nose for carrion, too, sniffed your own, 
knew, alone, the rot, rope-knot or buckle of roots under-on 
rock, your gowned back to roses, rosaries, but eyes a song gone 
up, too, sickly little wings stuck in God-glue air: how long? 

You sang one dialectic flight, sir--the only kind. How high 
can the swallow swoop, how low the falcon grieve, relieve, 
in fall till pinions hold him, there, to kill? Light- 
weight, mutt, heaver of iron, scrap,feather: I believe 

the hurt, believe you saw what you saw.





The Fabric of Life
 

It is very stretchy.   
We know that, even if   
many details remain   
sketchy. It is complexly   
woven. That much too   
has pretty well been   
proven. We are loath   
to continue our lessons   
which consist of slaps   
as sharp and dispersed   
as bee stings from   
a smashed nest   
when any strand snaps-- 

hurts working far past   
the locus of rupture,   
attacking threads   
far beyond anything   
we would have said   
connects.





Hudson
 

unwavering noon, self-minus 
sun flake on the levels of gold

there are names for these things: rose, brick, plate glass

the annunciation of the sparrow 
a gene for anxiety

add hope, fear, greed, desire

no rest but the shade 
to which a sun implodes

perhaps on other worlds others walk streets 
muse on the weather

psyches built, say, on a double sun of unwavering noon

the balm of such congruence 

 

thick, white, stick bicyclists painted on the esplanade to Chambers

glinting Jersey cars 
helicopter blades under a ledge of cloud

alien first descent past the Trade Towers 
drifting in on the flyway to LaGuardia

landscape, local, locale: the man-made made man

trying to open to something like days' unraveling waves



blue pulled toward fire out toward the skyscraper lights

ancient mausoleums 
upheavals from personal terror

dark pier jut into dark water

turquoise, indigo, aqua, lapis; under the molten, under the bruise of night

blood in your lips
as a man I violated the boundary of your mouth

I say this because in the phantasmagoria 
I was woman and man

in another story you turn men to stone

though here, out of narrative, poignant at Morton Street against the twilight



incomprehensible rain under sun

heap-leached haze-gold fused into evening 
water's green-grey dense pliance

shadowed face that bends to the shadows to drink and be salvaged

tiered buildings like vast Titanics 
yellow truck-trailer's anonymous corpse conjoined to the numberless

a boy swept from the rocks at the Verrazano stanchion 
tomb cold draining past Liberty

it need not cohere but how could it not? 
without context, for which all are accountable

this is for you of the future: one was here who is gone, into the eigen levels





It Was Over
 

Something expired. At the turning, 
A spirit was gone. That which was 
Turned to sepia: high collars, punting, 
Waxed mustaches, parasols. 

From bridges, children stared in the river 
And felt themselves, also, halved. 
Old manners were patently over. 
New manners had not yet arrived. 

The old, without waiting to speak 
Their parting lines in the act, 
Learned to exit the way of pipe-smoke. 
Uttered nothing. Utter tact. 

Steamy ghosts rose from horses' 
Maws as they champed at their bits. 
The ladies reached for their purses. 
The gentlemen tipped their hats.





Missed Time
 

My notebook has remained blank for months 
thanks to the light you shower 
around me. I have no use 
for my pen, which lies 
languorously without grief. 

Nothing is better than to live 
a storyless life that needs 
no writing for meaning-- 
when I am gone, let others say 
they lost a happy man, 
though no one can tell how happy I was.





Anthem
 

        After the Fourth of July

On this night of the mid-   
summer festival of fire,   
where liquid explosives   
look like the arch and ache   
of the willow tree   

so near your grave, on this   
night of the awaiting mid-   
wife who lulled you in-   
to this world, the light   
all violet because the Earth and stars   
inclined toward each other,   
she also sleeps, she who was   
your first deliverer, guiding you out   

of your mother--her bluing   
skin no small sign of the future   
cyanosis of her spirit for no   
small journey was it to this   
country to bring you to birth   
in this torch   

song heat and an anthem of a free 
nation's conception of combustions:   
rosins, petroleum, tallow, arsenic   
and worse, as you, too, fell from the sky   

of her body with me   
a microscopic egg inside--   
half the composition   
that made up my own   
toss and tumble to this crash   
of ground I sit over and bless   
while you lie under, under   
the willow, under this world   
that no midwife   
nor wavelength can under-   
standably reach. So I stand   

in this over-   
determined fire forced out   
like bullets upon a target--   
the pulled trigger releasing   
the hammer that strikes   
the impacted mixture--   
hailstorm and hymn   

of memories. And the outstretched womb   
involutes and the abdominal wall tightens   
and inside all abandoned encasements   
the night over the day darkens.





Habitation
 

The long road south, the pavement flat   
and black as a dash without end, no signs,   

no houses, the heat like an unseen fog   
and the sun a swollen crimson clot 

above fields where frazzle-haired palm trees rose   
sporadic and unwieldy, the miles   

of pasture where cattle of every conceivable   
color, rust and tobacco and ashen, fed   

and nursed their stumbling young,   
heavy heads bent to the ground.   

And insects that crashed against windshield   
so tiny, no body was left behind.   

Then a wooden shack where we stopped to pee    
and the shock of iron-red flecks against   

bowl, the water placid, unmoved.   
There was hardly any pain.   

What could we do but continue on   
as scattered street-lamps gradually revealed   

a landscape inhabited once again: the still      
shuttered windows of bungalows pink   

as scrubbed flesh, the small dark yards of abandoned   
Bigwheels and plots of petunias or cukes,   

the closed, expectant mailboxes   
and the living already dead inside me.





The Snow Leopard
 

 In the Metro Toronto Zoo
He pads on grassy banks behind a fence,
          with measured paces slow and tense.

          Beyond his cage his thoughts are sharp and white;
                  he lives a compelled anchorite.

                  A solid ghost gone blind with all the green,
                              he waits and waits to be unseen.

                                                         -For Paul Strong





The Answering Machine
 

I call and hear your voice   

on the answering machine   

weeks after your death,   

a fledgling ghost still longing   

for human messages.   


Shall I leave one, telling   

how the fabric of our lives   

has been ripped before   

but that this sudden tear will not   

be mended soon or easily?   


In your emptying house, others   

roll up rugs, pack books,   

drink coffee at your antique table,   

and listen to messages left   

on a machine haunted   


by the timbre of your voice,   

more palpable than photographs   

or fingerprints. On this first day   

of this first fall without you,   

ashamed and resisting   


but compelled, I dial again   

the number I know by heart,   

thankful in a diminished world   

for the accidental mercy of machines,   

then listen and hang up.





Pura Vida
 

(Pura vida! --Costa Rican phrase for "O.K." or "Great!")
Such heat! It brings the brain back to its basic blank. 
Small, recurrent events become the daily news-- 
the white-nosed coati treading the cecropia's 
bending thin branches like sidewalks in the sky, 
the scarlet-rumped tanager flitting like a spark 
in the tinder of dank green, the nodding palm leaves 
perforated like Jacquard cards in a code of wormholes, 
the black hawk skimming nothingness over and over. 

What does the world's wide brimming mean, with hunger 
the unstated secret, dying the proximate reality? 
Con mucho gusto--the muchness extends to the stars, 
as wet and numerous as larvae underground 
where the ants in their preset patterns scurry and nurture, 
and the queen, immobilized, pours forth her eggs 
in the dark. We are far from oaks and stoplights, 
from England's chill classrooms and Tuscany's paved hills. 

For thought is a stridulation, an insect sizzling, 
knit of the moment's headlines and temperate-zone quips, 
viable in the debris of our rotting educations, 
that thatch where peer-groups call each to each in semes 
ecosystematically. Great God Himself 
wilts with a rise in temperature, a drop in soil acidity, 
a new language in its grimacing opacity. 
The brain's dry buzz revives, a bit, as evening falls.





from Double Exposures
 

MEDICAL SCHOOL SKELETON 
WITH DOMINO'S PIZZA MAN 

         Superbowl XXX. And see, strung-out and thin, 
The skeleton has been exposed against 
                           The Domino's Pizza man, enveloped in 
A black felt background. Poor Bones, he's been flensed. 
                              That baggy uniform, a backwards cap, 
He's pierced; he's heroin chic; but he's all grins, 
                        Come from the darkness in his rattletrap, 
Burlesquer, rake, this rack of candlepins, 
            Giving long odds, right here at the front door, 
A real smoothie, with a faint ennui, 
                   And winning the bet he'll be returning for.  
Another working stiff,   like you or me. 

PROFILES: ANNE DANCING WITH SKELETON 

                     (Or was it XXXI? Oh well.) That's Anne. 
And look who's back in this one: portrait style, 
               You see, Anne's dancing with the pizza man, 
Our old friend Bonesy, with the killer smile, 
                           Doing a sort of earthy, homegrown bop, 
With those dark, bedroom eyes and the cleft chin, 
                                 Belting it out like soul with ZZ Top, 
But think about his humble origin, 
             Bouyant with life, jouissance, the growing buzz 
About tough prizes won along the way 
                           And toasted. But, then, everybody was. 
Becoming much the man you see today.





Color in American History: An Essay
 

Did they enjoy this, those honorary ancestors 
Of ours, whom we may not speak of as Indians now, 
But, rather, as Native Americans? Did they, that is, 
Have the opportunity to take in such views? 
For there were no roads then, slicing through 
The hills, opening vistas like this. Astonishing! 
Unless, perhaps, they were upon the Delaware, 
A kind of road itself. But, otherwise, would not 
The land itself have been an inconvenience, 
The changing leaves an oracle of cruelties 
To come and not, as for the tourists on a bus, 
A postcard to sweep up at a glance and then 
Go home to the similar view they own-- 
One stately maple, or two, intensely orange? 
Only the birds, may be, might have known 
These colors, the sudden shift of gears from green 
To ocher, umber, brightest yellow, deepest red, 
The colors of the gleeful dead. For birds can fly 
Above the trees and see what we see from a bus. 
But is there gladness in their flight? Might it 
Not as well be night? And Indians (forgive the word), 
Did they delight more than a bird? Were there 
Esthetes then as now, before the ax, 
The ox, the plow? I must believe there were-- 
And why? Because they traded all Manhattan 
For a handful of ceramic beads. They knew, 
As we, that a glint of pure bright blue 
Is worth a whole October day, or two.





Call It Music
 

Some days I catch a rhythm, almost a song   
in my own breath. I'm alone here   
in Brooklyn Heights, late morning, the sky   
above the St. George Hotel clear, clear   
for New York, that is. The radio playing   
"Bird Flight," Parker in his California   
tragic voice fifty years ago, his faltering   
"Lover Man" just before he crashed into chaos.   
I would guess that outside the recording studio   
in Burbank the sun was high above the jacarandas,   
it was late March, the worst of yesterday's rain   
had come and gone, the sky washed blue. Bird   
could have seen for miles if he'd looked, but what   
he saw was so foreign he clenched his eyes,   
shook his head, and barked like a dog--just once--   
and then Howard McGhee took his arm and assured him   
he'd be OK. I know this because Howard told me   
years later that he thought Bird could   
lie down in the hotel room they shared, sleep   
for an hour or more, and waken as himself.   
The perfect sunlight angles into my little room   
above Willow Street. I listen to my breath   
come and go and try to catch its curious taste,   
part milk, part iron, part blood, as it passes   
from me into the world. This is not me,   
this is automatic, this entering and exiting,   
my body's essential occupation without which   
I am a thing. The whole process has a name,   
a word I don't know, an elegant word not   
in English or Yiddish or Spanish, a word   
that means nothing to me. Howard truly believed   
what he said that day when he steered   
Parker into a cab and drove the silent miles   
beside him while the bright world   
unfurled around them: filling stations, stands   
of fruits and vegetables, a kiosk selling trinkets   
from Mexico and the Philippines. It was all   
so actual and Western, it was a new creation   
coming into being, like the music of Charlie Parker   
someone later called "glad," though that day   
I would have said silent, "the silent music   
of Charlie Parker." Howard said nothing.   
He paid the driver and helped Bird up two flights   
to their room, got his boots off, and went out   
to let him sleep as the afternoon entered   
the history of darkness. I'm not judging   
Howard, he did better than I could have   
now or then. Then I was 19, working   
on the loading docks at Railway Express,   
coming day by day into the damaged body   
of a man while I sang into the filthy air   
the Yiddish drinking songs my Zadie taught me   
before his breath failed. Now Howard is gone,   
eleven long years gone, the sweet voice silenced.   
"The subtle bridge between Eldridge and Navarro,"   
they later wrote, all that rising passion   
a footnote to others. I remember in '85   
walking the halls of Cass Tech, the high school   
where he taught after his performing days,   
when suddenly he took my left hand in his   
two hands to tell me it all worked out   
for the best. Maybe he'd gotten religion,   
maybe he knew how little time was left,   
maybe that day he was just worn down   
by my questions about Parker. To him Bird   
was truly Charlie Parker, a man, a silent note   
going out forever on the breath of genius   
which now I hear soaring above my own breath   
as this bright morning fades into afternoon.   
Music, I'll call it music. It's what we need   
as the sun staggers behind the low gray clouds   
blowing relentlessly in from that nameless ocean,   
the calm and endless one I've still to cross.





[It's been two thousand years now]
 

It's been two thousand years now that, with a wounded leg,   
the god's amazing loves have dragged along.   

He has aged. Soon   
he won't be noticed except from way up in a plane   
in the markings of wheat   
that yield the trace   
of an ancient sanctuary.   

He solicits a language of caresses,   
open pasture, available bodies,   

and the words refuse, and this elsewhere is already in his death   
except for a slender purple flower under the sun.   

He can still act the god all around,   
evening's worn heart.   

He guesses the flower will slip   
fragile   
from one century to the next with its prayer.





Coda of the Fixed Itinerant
 


       Always the evening noises, the footsteps on the stairs, the day that rises in the throat. 
       A turn of the key will expel the world. 
       Against the extinct forest of furniture, the channeled bloodstream translates the dream into this small life. 

       In the end we shrink until finally we can no longer inhabit the gestures of our childhood. 

       A nail in a board: the remains of a fence; blurred memory of the mountain that raised the tree, that brooded over its ore. 

       Modest against a hedge, a spade dreams its beautiful death. 
       "Simple and calm, nourished on weeds and wind, the image moves, distilling its own memory. Far off, we disappear into the ochre and the gold, the mud-brown and the primordial green.

       The slightest evidence of life. In the courtyard's silence, the barking of that dog. A shutter, merely, that's banging. Those books stacked in one corner of the room. Everything that, ordinarily, follows its automated course. And there, all at once: the happiness that spreads its billion pinpricks through the body.

        Evening's voice unreels its argument. Five floors below, the courtyard and its echoes. The barking still, and overhead the footsteps of regret in the maids' rooms. I'll try to have given each thing my word before giving in to sleep. 

       The room breathes deeply the music of a quartet. It's that grave well-being, unexpectedly, you know? 
       Nobody. You may speak. I'm not there. 

       A gesture: the garden diffuses the pale green taste of currants. One remains quiet as long as possible.
       Another gesture: the sun rips open the scent of the lindens. Childhood leaps over the wall. 
       The miracle would be having something to say. 

       Maybe we could have inhabited that smile, over there, at the other end of the room; or else we could have met at the improbable dawn of memory. Maybe we could have fallen asleep in the twilight of this autumn when the brain is nothing more than oak and leather.
       But we have only this thin life to place beneath the axe. 

       The crows in the plowed field, black against the field's ochre, gleaming and black amid the smell of moist earth, a smell mixed with the brush and bark and roots that the wind returns as someone somewhere burns them. 
       And then that pile of words that rots with helplessness.

       In the forest, the sound, dry and brief, of a pebble in a streambed, fallen after patient millennia into the earth's darkness. Just a dry sound and its echo, quickly engulfed by birdcalls. And later, on the path, drops of blood from the trees. 

       A farmer carriers his tools slowly toward the shed. In the atmospheric silence, a woodpecker registers the sound of its life's work. That's all. Some animals, a pile of wood, and the smell of rain, which always calls to mind something that can't quite be reconstructed. 

       Acrid smoke; and then that crackling of the woods in the clearing. A few centimeters above the cut weeds, the tenuous vapor of memory. 
       Between eyelashes, amid the colors of the woods, the colors of weeds, and earth, that sky, that patch of sky, that sky. 

       The courtyard, the wood bench, the sputtering of the fishpond, the smell of humus, the smell of mushroom. 
       Five notes in the rain sketch the presence of a bird. 

       The village, the morning, belong to the birds. Images flow freely through the alleys. Silence full of events: the eyes prey on a shadow. A gull's passing reshapes all the shores of the world. 

       Birdcalls cut through the fog, wet grass: morning. The rectangle of a wall says: "blank, nothing else. On the horizon, very nearby, a woman dressed in black glides silently across her wide open destiny. 

       Between branches, near the sun, the moon, which opens the night to the night. I sink, gently, and disappear. On the surface, alone, the cry of an owl keeps watch. 

       The stairs, the brass doorknob, the smell of dark corners. The iron bed, the red bedspread. Slow breathing. That song that waits for nothing but our melody. 

       We are of the morning, of the gently sloping hour that comes slowly down from the sun. The old clothes in the corner are tinged with the morning's color, which will have to be worn. The lark's song widens the silence. 

       Deep in the forest, the cuckoo, the woodpecker, the chiaroscuro of ancient musics. Heavy wagons clench their signal-lights toward the heights of the opaque sky. I moved with closed words across the homeland that sleeps me. 

       From this far country, where you respond to me without my hearing a word of yours, without perhaps my words ever reaching you, from this country where perhaps we understand each other, I overhear the most contradictory noises, which veil and deny your voice, and which would like to make me believe that I'm speaking alone.





[Often when he was advancing]
 

often 
when he was advancing 
feeling his way in the night 
he was doubtful      rebelled 
wanted to climb back up 
to the old light 

but a force held him 
enjoined him 
to pursue 
to venture 
once more 
once again 
into the thickest darkness 
of his shadow 

one day 
at the height of his distress 
emptied of all force 
driven to see that 
the inaccessible would not yield 
he admitted that he must 
renounce it 

to his great surprise 
without his having 
to take a single step 
he crossed the threshold 
came into the light





Prehistoric
 

Whitecaps surge in from some infinite distance 
Rocks, grottoes, clay stridencies beneath the storm 
Amalgams of sea-wrack and brownish moss 
Each tide pushes forth its flesh-antennae 
The persistent squid stretches its arms, wave-crests 
Cave in, everything gives way to sand 
Which silently drinks up the acid, cold red sweat 
Those children launched in assault against the waves 
How could they turn their heads 
Back toward those who've brought them this far 
To be taken even farther in their turn 
They passed though the crowd, laughing 
Or crying without telling the password 
They've passed, the ferret runs and runs 
Memory, the battlefield nurse, can barely 
Triage the rarest ones 
Whose heat shifts at the crater's edge 
Yet they give our trajectory 
Its dreamlike depth: the whole chain 
Coils up in our smallest cells 
And in a lifetime time annuls itself





[Les plantes et les plantes] / [Plants and planets]
 

Les plantes et les plantes 
Au mme ciel obissent ; 
Du mme soleil les btes 
Et les hommes se nourrissent ; 

Et le mtal dans la mine 
Couve l'astre minuscule, 
Soufre dont la fleur si fine 
Vit en chaque corpuscule. 

Naines ou gantes sont 
Poudre et bran jets loin 
Qui sans chute ou frein s'en vont 
Aux quatre mondes sans coin 

Ni angle, d'anges peupls, 
Mais d'autres disent que non, 
Dont les mondes envols 
Seraient comme d'un canon, 

Par qui par hasard tir, 
L'expansive consquence, 
Et d'aucune intelligence 
Le fruit de quel grain tir. 


[Plants and planets] 

Plants and planets 
Obey the same heaven; 
As beasts and men 
Are nourished by the same sun; 

And the metal in the mine 
Warms minute stars, 
Sulphurous flowers so delicate 
They live in every corpuscule. 

Dwarves and giants are   
Powder and dust thrown far 
Without fall or check whirl 
To the four cornerless, angleless 

Worlds, peopled with angels, 
But others say not at all. 
Their worlds seem   
Fired from a cannon, 

Fired by whom by chance, 
This expanding consequence, 
The fruit of some grapeshot 
Without any intelligence.





Town Hall, Fifteenth Arrondissement
 

You should have heard the soldiers' feet
wounding the swirls that the accordion waltz
left on the pavement like a mower's swath
once the parade had passed
you should have kissed the soldiers' feet
pulled out of their boots and licked the ankles
and climbed as far as the khaki
seven and a half millimeters thick would allow
you should have shaken their belly like a carpet
it was grand illusion day
when they escape their deep knowledge
and pretend to look for handsome successors
but it would be better to look for the heart
and put an alarm clock in its place
that could play reveille like a puppet
but wouldn't serve coffee in bed
you should have rummaged under their false teeth
to hunt for hidden diamonds with lively fingers
hunt for them everywhere not find them
even in the creases of their nakedness.
Joy of being a child of the sovereign people
of lending a hand to institutions
and seeing one's name inscribed on the slate
of urinals in letters of coal tar
for a single flag that one has become
flapping its boredom at the angles of two streets
that the wind stirs unless it's first
the wind of trumpets all love to the winds





Bastille
 

You let your shirt hang down
putting on airs of cuffs
at the edge of ending night
like the end of a java with double ritournelles
or the way the canaries in the cage of still-closed mornings
were singing that it mattered little
to them that their windows were open
the stones the paving stones the door-frames the armatures
the window-frames the sheets of the bed clothes in their colors
were beating the dawn along with us
better drums than your belly
better drumsticks than my fingers
and the trees and the roofs the river and its bridges
the clear distances of the city the factories without smoke
bathed as at their birth stammered
a trial hello
that only ended however
in this word round as a doubloon
placed on the edge of that day
by a considerate friend
the sun on your arms naked against my cheeks
hello I said to you
the day of quatorz'juillet





from Une Histoire de Bleu / From A Story of Blue
 

          
          LE REGARD BLEU  Nous connaissons par ou-dire l'existence de l'amour.  Assis sur un rocher ou sous un parasol rouge, allongs dans le pr bourdonnant d'insectes, les deux mains sous la nuque, agenouills dans la fracheur et l'obscurit d'une glise, ou tasss sur une chaise de paille entre les quatre murs de la chambre, tte basse, les yeux fixs sur un rectangle de papier blanc, nous rvons  des estuaires, des tumultes, des ressacs, des embellies et des mares. Nous coutons monter en nous le chant inpuisable de la mer qui dans nos ttes afflue puis se retire, comme revient puis s'loigne le curieux dsir que nous avons du ciel, de l'amour, et de tout ce que nous ne pourrons jamais toucher des mains.    La mer en nous essaie des phrases.  Depuis des lustres, la mme voix pelle le mme alphabet dans le mme cerveau d'enfant. Elle balbutie des mots vite envols, accrochs aux herbes des plages,  la peau brunie des baigneurs,  la proue des barques, aux mtures. Des mots quelconques, pour rien et pour quiconque. Il n'y est question que de l'amour. C'est pourquoi nous ne savons trop que dire et souffrons que le regard d'autrui s'attarde sur notre visage quand nous voudrions qu'il se pose  mme notre cur. Nos lvres sont si maladroites, notre corps invisible dans la nuit opaque, et nos mains mal-habiles, des clairs ou des ailes pourtant au bout des doigts.   
from A Story of Blue
 THE BLUE LOOK  We know through hearsay that love exists.  Seated on a rock or under a red parasol, lying in the field buzzing with insects, our hands clasped behind our necks, kneeling in the cool darkness of a church, or settled on a straw chair within the four walls of the bedroom, head lowered, eyes fixed on a rectangle of white paper, we dream of estuaries, tumultuous surf, clearing weather and tides. We listen to the inexhaustible chant of the sea within us, as it rises and falls in our heads, like the approach and retreat of the strange desire we have for heaven, for love, and all that we cannot touch with our hands.    Within us the sea tries out sentences.  From time immemorial, the same voice spells the same alphabet in the same child's brain. It mutters words which quickly fly off, snagged on the sea grasses, on the bathers' browned skin, on the bows of boats, on the masts. Ordinary words, for nothing and no one in particular. It is only about love. This is why we hardly know what to say and we suffer when someone's gaze fixes on our face, when we would like it to look into our heart. Our lips are so awkward, our body invisible in the opaque night, and our hands inept, yet lightening flashes or wings are at our fingertips.
        




Un citadin / A City Dweller
 

The street I walk along I often see   
As if I'd long since left the moving surface   
Of the world for the endless other side that disperses   
Us all some day without return but free   

Of care. I apply myself so well to this fragile proceeding   
That very quickly my gaze ceases to be   
Part of the cloudy clump of hope and memory   
I'll have given my name to. But for this to succeed,   

A feeling of absolute happiness has to make   
Itself felt, as if from outside me, so much   
That at that moment the very street has a hunch   
That it, the entire city, and its uncertain space   

Have become one with the mobile but faithful pattern   
Of phrases written by our steps when we move about.   
I no longer know who's walking and marking out   
The ground, bit by bit, to the corner. My gaze then patterns   

Itself on tomorrow's unknown eyes, which will shine   
When from the roofs, posthumous and vague, mine glow,   
And my invisible trace on the asphalt below    
Might guide the lan of hardier passersby.   

Will they know what I sometimes suspect: what appears   
To be the distracted gaze with which we see   
The world is the world itself?--It sees and hears   
Itself through the thin transparency of our screens.





Parmi beaucoup de pomes / Among Many Poems 
 

Parmi beaucoup de pomes 
Il y en avait un 
Dont je ne parvenais pas  me souvenir 
Sinon que je l'avais compos
Autrefois 
En descendant cette rue 
Du ct des numros pairs de cette rue 
Baigne d'une matine limpide 
Une rue de petites boutiques persistantes 
Entre la Seine sinistre et l'hpital 
Un pome crit avec mes pieds 
Comme je compose toujours les pomes
En silence et dans ma tte et en marchant 
Mais je ne me souviens de rien 
Que de la rue de la lumire et du hasard 
Qui avait fait entrer dans ce pome 
Le mot "respect" 
Que je n'ai pas l'habitude de faire vibrer 
Dans les pages mentales de la posie
Au-del   de lui il n'y a rien 
Et ce mot ce mot qui ne bouge pas 
Atteste la cessation de la rue 
Comme un arbre oubli de l'espace 


Among Many Poems 

Among many poems 
There was one 
Which I couldn't remember 
Except having made it up 
Long ago 
While going down that street 
On the even-numbered side of that street 
Bathed in a limpid morning 
A street of little shops still lasting 
Between the hospital and the wounded Seine 
A poem written with my feet 
As I always make up my poems 
In silence and in my head while walking 
But I remember nothing 
Except the street the light and the chance 
That had caused the entry in the poem 
Of the word "respect" 
That I don't usually set resounding 
In poetry's mental pages 
Beyond it there is nothing 
And this word this unmoving word   
Awaits the ending of the street 
Like a tree space has forgotten





No Time
 

In a rush this weekday morning,

I tap the horn as I speed past the cemetery 

where my parents are buried

side by side beneath a slab of smooth   granite. 


Then, all day, I think of him rising up 

to give me that look 

of knowing disapproval 

while my mother calmly tells him to lie back down.





Lullabye for the Second Millennium
 

From the point of view of all time, 
these recent changes signal 
more a return to nature 
than a departure, than degradation. 
In the beginning, after all, 
there was boiling rock. 
Then waters arranging their bodies 
around an era of softer forms: 
lichen, grassland, swaying treetops. 
Then creatures, movingly fleshed, 
treading pathways that hardened. 
Then pavement hardening 
and cities, monumental. 
Soon mostly rock again, 
and radiant. More and more like moon. 
Soon, sooner than is being thought, 
there will be even more light. 
The creatures will have stopped 
being able to move 
or be moved. 
And the rock will boil.





Scavenging the Wall
 

When fall brought the graders to Atlas Road, 
I drove through gray dust thick as a battle 
and saw the ditch freshly scattered with   gravel. 

Leveling, shaving on the bevel, the blade 
and fanged scraper had summoned sleepers-- 
limestone loaves and blue slate, skulls of quartz 

not even early freeze had roused. Some rocks 
were large as buckets, others just a scone 
tumbled up and into light the first time 

in ages. Loose, sharp, they were a hazard 
to anyone passing. So I gathered 
what I could, scooped them into the bed 

and trucked my freight away under birdsong 
in my own life's autumn. I was eager 
to add to the snaggled wall bordering 

my single acre, to be safe, to be still 
and watch the planet's purposeful turning 
behind a cairn of roughly balanced stones. 

Uprooted, scarred, weather-gray of bones, 
I love their old smell, the familiar unknown. 
To be sure this time I know where I belong 

I have brought, at last, the vagrant road home.





How To Be a Poet
 

(to remind myself)
i   

Make a place to sit down.   
Sit down. Be quiet.   
You must depend upon   
affection, reading, knowledge,   
skill--more of each   
than you have--inspiration,   
work, growing older, patience,   
for patience joins time   
to eternity. Any readers   
who like your poems,   
doubt their judgment.   

 ii   

Breathe with unconditional breath   
the unconditioned air.   
Shun electric wire.   
Communicate slowly. Live   
a three-dimensioned life;   
stay away from screens.   
Stay away from anything   
that obscures the place it is in.   
There are no unsacred places;   
there are only sacred places   
and desecrated places.   

 iii   

Accept what comes from silence.   
Make the best you can of it.   
Of the little words that come   
out of the silence, like prayers   
prayed back to the one who prays,   
make a poem that does not disturb   
the silence from which it came.





Stationed
 

It's the other ones, who soon enough return   
to being happy after the funeral, that are nearest   
to their own deaths--in their gaiety   
and everyday distraction, they're so open   

and unguarded . . . anything could enter them;   
could claim them. It's the ones who weep   
incessantly that are saved for now, the ones   
who have taken a little of it   

into their systems: this is how   
inoculation works. And sorrow is difficult,   
a job: it requires time to complete.   
And the tears?--the salt   

of the folk saying,   
that gets sprinkled over the tail feathers   
and keeps a bird from flying;   
keeps it stationed in this world.





Beginnings
 

National Museum of Scotland
On the ground floor called "Beginnings," 
a fertility stone is displayed   
in the diamond-hard blue halogen,   
a line etching of an erection   
with two equal circles, as one sees   
in graffitti in the Underground.   
The stone is attributed to the Picts,   
of whom history says little,   
besides the Latin picti,   
painted people, tattooed.   
When set side by side   
with Latin engravings   
and Roman military hardware,   
the artifact makes them   
seem pitiful. In the museum   
you rise through time,   
the text written in first   
person plural as if all   
who enter are complicitous   
with the articles of defiance,   
Robert the Bruce, the long   
unveering heredity of defeat,   
the room of thumbscrews   
and "The Maiden" for severing   
heretical heads of witches,   
upward to the Reformation,   
then the rout of the Highlanders   
and the exile of the Bonnie Prince,   
until the museum seems   
like a deep well where   
the fertility stone   
of the painted people   
rests at its bottom,   
universal hieroglyph   
on which someone made a wish.





Arrowhead
 

    Where two streams joined, we met 
By accident, sitting upon an outcropping of rock 
With only the intent of watching 
Water flow beneath unwinding water. 
    Facing up-stream, she held a flower 
To the sun as I leaned back and found 
An arrowhead inside a crevice, which lay there 
As if someone had left it by intent 
As an excuse for me to speak above the whirl of water 
Swirling upon stone and thus 
Transform the accident of meeting her--
Ablaze in sunlight with a flower in her hand--
Into stark fact as obdurate as rock. 
    Could I have called, "Look at this arrowhead 
I just found here!" Would she have thought 
"An accident, that's credible,"
Or feared that my intent was sinister, 
And that the implication of the arrowhead, 
Unlike the radiant white flower or 
The two streams merging into faster water, 
Casting up colored spume, 
Had been contrived by me, certain as rock 
That forms by geologic laws? 
    She had to know an arrowhead 
Is humanly designed with the intent to kill, 
Though now it's harmless as a flower 
Decorating someone's hair, 
Or water organized into a garden fountain. 
An arrowhead can now be used 
As an adornment for a necklace 
Like a flower in a painting where a stream 
Leaps past a light-reflecting rock 
With nothing in a brush-stroke left to accident. 
    And so our accidental meeting on the rock 
Flowed by, a flower cast upon the water 
With intent unknown, and all 
That's left now is the arrowhead.





Love Poem for an Enemy
 

I, as sinned against as sinning, 
take small pleasure from the winning 
of our decades-long guerrilla war. 
For from my job I've wanted more 
than victory over one who'd tried 
to punish me before he died, 
and now, neither of us dead, 
we haunt these halls in constant dread 
of drifting past the other's life 
while long-term memory is rife 
with slights that sting like paper cuts. 
We've occupied our separate ruts 
yet simmered in a single rage. 
We've grown absurd in middle age 
together, and should seek wisdom now 
together, by ending this row. 
I therefore decommission you 
as constant flagship of my rue. 
Below the threshold of my hate 
you now my good regard may rate. 
For I have let my anger pass. 
But, while you're down there, kiss my ass.





To the Consolations of Philosophy
 

Thank you but 

not just at the moment 


I know you will say 

I have said that before 

I know you have been 

there all along somewhere 

in another time zone 


I studied once 

those beautiful instructions 

when I was young and 

far from here 

they seemed distant then 

they seem distant now 

from everything I remember 


I hope they stayed with you 

when the noose started to tighten 

and you could say no more 

and after wisdom 

and the days of iron 

the eyes started from your head 


I know the words 

must have been set down 

partly for yourself 

unjustly condemned after 

a good life 


I know the design 

of the world is beyond 

our comprehension 

thank you 

but grief is selfish and in 

the present when 

the stars do not seem to move 

I was not listening 


I know it is not 

sensible to expect 

fortune to grant her 

gifts forever 

I know





Sugar Dada
 

Go home. It's never what you think it is, 
The kiss, the diamond, the slamdance pulse in the wrist. 
Nothing is true, my dear, not even this 

Rumor of passion you'll doubtless insist 
On perceiving in my glance. Please just 
Go. Home is never what you think it is. 

Meaning lies in meaning's absence. The mist 
Is always almost just about to lift. 
Nothing is truer. Dear, not even this 

Candle can explain its searing twist 
Of flame mounted on cool amethyst. 
Go on home--not where you think it is, 

But where you would expect its comfort least, 
In still-black stars our century will miss 
Seeing. Nothingness is not as true as this 

Faith we grind up with denial: grist 
To the midnight mill; morning's catalyst. 
Come, let's go home, wherever you think it is. 
Nothing is true, my dear. Not even this.





Implements from the Tomb of the Poet
 

Piraeus Archeological Museum
On the journey to the mundane afterlife, 
You travel equipped to carry on your trade: 
A bronze, small-toothed saw to make repairs, 
The stylus and the ink pot and the scraper, 
Wax tablets bound into a little book. 

Here is the tortoise shell for the cithara, 
Bored through with holes for strings, natural sound box. 
Here is the harp's wood triangle, all empty--
The sheep-gut having long since decomposed 
Into a pure Pythagorean music. 

The beeswax, frangible with centuries, 
Has puzzled all your lyrics into silence. 
I think you were a poet of perfection 
Who fled still weighing one word with another, 
Since wax forgives and warms beneath revision.





Li Hua's Messenger
 

In a hut far from the village   
Li Hua bends over his canvas   
like an insect.   

He is so deliberate,   
each stroke is a spider's legs   
fighting the current.   

There is a war in his veins,   
a battle of desires.   
He is jealous of Li Po   
whose pictures glide   
like the moon over dark water.   

I do not wish   
to disturb him   
as he tries to make art   
in this time of death,   

so I will wait,   
like a fly on the tip of a stick,   
until he is finished.





Over and Over Tune
 

You could grow into it,   
that sense of living like a dog,   
loyal to being on your own in the fur of your skin,   
able to exist only for the sake of existing.   

Nothing inside your head lasting long enough for you to hold onto,   
you watch your own thoughts leap across your own synapses and disappear-- 
small boats in a wind,   
       fliers in all that blue,   
               the swish of an arm backed with feathers,   
a dress talking in a corner,   
               and then poof,   
       your mind clean as a dog's,   
your body big as the world,   
       important with accident-- 
               blood or a limp, fur and paws.   

You swell into survival,   
       you take up the whole day,   
you're all there is,   
       everything else is   
not you, is every passing glint, is   
       shadows brought to you by wind,   
               passing into a bird's cheep, replaced by a   
                              rabbit skittering across a yard,   
a void you yourself fall into.   

You could make this beautiful,   
       but you don't need to,   
living is this fleshy side of the bone,   
       going on is this medicinal smell of the sun-- 
               no dog ever tires of seeing his life   


keep showing up at the back door   
even as a rotting bone with a bad smell;   
feet tottering, he dreams of it,   
wakes and licks no matter what.





Chord
 

A man steps out of sunlight, 
sunlight that streams like grace, 

still gaping at blue sky 
staked across the emptiness of space, 

into a history where shadows 
assume a human face. 

A man slips into silence 
that began as a cry,

still trailing music 
although reduced to the sigh 

of an accordion 
as it folds into its case.





Military Mind
 

I wanted to go to military school   
and march, I wanted to grow up   
and be composed and expert   
with a rifle, with tactics and fighting,   
to be safe and courageous among men   
in barracks and on the battlefield.   
I wanted to see my arms hairy and   
corded with muscle at the end of rolled up khaki sleeves.   
I wanted to flex my feet in boots and   
look down at the the dust of battles   
dimming the leather surfaces, the blood slick   
on the rim of the soles. I wanted   
the smell of gunpowder in my nostrils, the grime   
on my face, the washed-out hollow   
love for my comrades found in the foxholes,   
the sad understanding, the requiems   
of late afternoons walking away from the burial site   
with the widow as she cradled the triangulated flag   
like a plowblade in her arms.





Music
 

Han-Shan sits on a flat stone 
In his garden and plays the flute, 
Mimicking the birds singing among 
The gourd vines or from the top 
Of the blue pine tree. 

Or he constructs a new trellis 
For the rambling rose over his front 
Gate or works at the great loom in his porch, 
Weaving his own coverlets. 

Sometimes, he paints drinking gourds 
To hang at his cold spring. 

His poems, delicate but strong, 
Paper the ceiling above his bed, 
So he can lie and read 
His own masterpieces. 

No man, he avers, can catch 
Such fish in one basket.





The Poet's Life: From Martial's Epigrams
 

i.110  

"Much too long" you say, Velox, censorious, 
Of my epigrams--that's quite uproarious. 
You write none. Your brevity is glorious. 

 

Scribere me quereris, Velox, epigrammata longa. 
       ipse nihil scribis: tu breviora facis? 

vi.60  

For my small books Rome's gone utterly mad; 
I'm quite ubiquitous--call it a fad. 
Look, there--see that fellow, leafing, curious. 
First he blushes deeply, then he's furious; 
A moment later his eyes glaze over; 
He yawns, flips a page, then reels in horror. 
This mercurial response I thrill to see; 
Why, then my epigrams even please me! 

 

Laudat, amat, cantat nostros mea Roma libellos, 
       meque sinus omnes, me manus omnis habet. 
ecce rubet quidam, pallet, stupet, oscitat, odit. 
       hoc volo: nunc nobis carmina nostra placent. 

vii.90  

Matho's one-word review of my small book: 
"Uneven." I'm supposed to get all shook! 
The scribblings of Calvinus and Umber 
Are very "even". . . yet how they lumber. 
I swear to you, Creticus, I thank God 
My gift is for being quite frankly "odd."

 

Iactat inaequalem Matho me fecisse libellum:

       si verum est, laudat carmina nostra Matho. 
aequales scribit libros Calvinus et Umber: 
       aequalis liber est, Cretice, qui malus est. 

ix.50  

You pontificate my talent is small, 
Gaurus, because my epigrams are all 
Just puny trifles. Yet they seem to please, 
I'll confess. They're a veritable breeze 
Compared to your epic tome, which rattles, 
In twelve mortal books, o'er Priam's battles. 
That makes you big man on campus? Oh no! 
As statuettes of master carvers glow 
With life, so do my tiny dramas boast 
Vital creatures. Your giants? Clay, at most. 

 

Ingenium mihi, Gaure, probas sic esse pusillum, 
       carmina quod faciam quae brevitate placent. 
confiteor. sed tu bis senis grandia libris 
       qui scribis Priami proelia, magnus homo es? 
nos facimus Bruti puerum, nos Langona vivum:

       tu magnus luteum, Gaure, Giganta facis. 

iv.49  

Quite clueless, Flaccus, all these sorry folks 
Who brand short poems mere badinage and jokes. 
Want to know who's more idle? The big boys, 
Our Epic Poets, who rehearse the joys 
Of serving human flesh up  la carte--

Tereus' bloody banquet or the huge tart 
Chez Thyestes ("It's a little gristly!"). 
Or they serve us crap, like how remissly 
Daedalus made--with wax, imagine!--wings 
For his poor doomed son. Then Big Epic sings 
Of arms and the--not "man"--one-eyed giant? 
Polyphemus: his brain was far from pliant, 
So Homer made him watch sheep in Sicily. 
Pardon me for carping so pissily, 
Flaccus, at insults to my epigrams, 
So far from the bloated whimsy that crams 
Our big-assed epics. All men blare in praise 
of these "classics," you say, and bask in their rays. 
I will not disagree, but mark my word: 
Some day, far off, a wise man will be heard 
To say, "Classics we all want to have read, 
Never to read." My books get read instead! 

 

Nescit, crede mihi, quid sint epigrammata, Flacce, 
       qui tantum lusus illa iocosque vocat. 
ille magis ludit qui scribit prandia saevi 
       Tereos aut cenam, crude Thyesta, tuam, 
aut puero liquidas aptantem Daedalon alas, 
       pascentem Siculas aut Polyphemon ovis. 
a nostris procul est omnis vesica libellis, 
       Musa nec insano syrmate nostra tumet. 
"illa tamen laudant omnes, mirantur, adorant."

       confiteor: laudant illa, sed ista legunt. 

ix.81 

Read or recited, my verse is much praised, 
Aulus, yet one poet opines: "Ill-phrased."

I couldn't care less! When I set a table, 
My guests, not the cooks, should say I'm able. 

 

Lector et auditor nostros probat, Aule, libellos, 
       sed quidam exactos esse poeta negat. 
non nimium curo: nam cenae fercula nostrae 
       malim convivis quam placuisse cocis. 

x.59  

A whole damned page crammed with verse--so you yawn! 
If a poem's too long you move swiftly on; 
"Shorter the better!" is your golden rule. 
But markets are scoured to make the tongue drool; 
A groaning board's set--rich sauces for days--

And yet, dear reader, you want canaps? 
But I don't hunger for diners so prude: 
Hail meat and potatoes--screw finger food! 

 

Consumpta est uno si lemmate pagina, transis, 
       et breviora tibi, non meliora placent. 
dives et ex omni posita est instructa macello 
       cena tibi, sed te mattea sola iuvat. 
non opus est nobis nimium lectore guloso; 
       hunc volo, non fiat qui sine pane satur. 

xi.16  

You there, reader, the over-solemn one, 
Take a hike wherever--my verse is spun 
Only for blithe, witty cognoscenti 
"Up" for priapic jeux de spree aplenty 
Or aroused by bells on harlot's fingers. 
He who in these randy pages lingers--

Though more stern than Curius or Fabricius 
Soon gets tingly, and anon lubricious; 
Then, lo, beneath a toga something pokes. 
My little book's salacious whims and jokes 
Will lead even the chastest dames astray; 
Taken with wine, my lines can make 'em bray! 
Lucretia, more proper than whom none such, 
Peeked between my covers, blushed very much, 
And threw me down (but Brutus stood glowering). 
Brutus, "Ciao!"--and back she'll be devouring. 

 

Qui gravis es nimium, potes hinc iam, lector, abire 
       quo libet: urbanae scripsimus ista togae; 
iam mea Lampsacio lascivit pagina versu 
       et Tartesiaca concrepat aera manu. 
o quotiens rigida pulsabis pallia vena, 
       sis gravior Curio Fabricioque licet! 
tu quoque nequitias nostri lususque libelli 
       uda, puella, leges, sis Patavina licet. 
erubuit posuitque meum Lucretia librum, 
       sed coram Bruto; Brute, recede: leget. 

iv.89 

Hey, you're stuffed, little book, give it a rest. 
You've reached the end-papers and still have zest! 
What on earth makes you yet want to let go, 
When "misfire" our verse reeked from the get-go? 
Zip it, my pages, let's call a "time out"; 
We've hit the back cover--and still you'd spout? 
Look, the reader's pissed and quite unimpressed; 
Even our publisher calls you a pest: 
"Hey, you're stuffed, little book, give it a rest!"

 

Ohe, iam satis, ohe, libelle, 
iam pervenimus usque ad umbilicos. 
tu procedere adhuc et ire quaeris, 
nec summa potes in schida teneri, 
sic tamquam tibi res peracta non sit, 
quae prima quoque pagina peracta est. 
iam lector queriturque deficitque, 
iam librarius hoc et ipse dicit 
"ohe, iam satis est, ohe, libelle."





For Laurel and Hardy on My Workroom Wall
 

They're tipping their battered derbies and striding forward 
    In step for a change, chipper, self-assured, 
         Their cardboard suitcases labeled 
Guest of Steerage. They've just arrived at the boot camp 
    Of the good old French Foreign Legion 
         Which they've chosen as their slice of life 
Instead of drowning themselves. Once again 
    They're about to become their own mothers and fathers 
         And their own unknowable children 
Who will rehearse sad laughter and mock tears, 
    Will frown with completely unsuccessful 
         Concentration, and will practice the amazement 
Of suddenly understanding everything 
    That baffles them and will go on baffling them 
         While they pretend they're only one reel away 
From belonging in the world. Their arrival 
    Will mark a new beginning of meaningless 
         Hostilities with a slaphappy ending. In a moment, 
They'll hear music, and as if they'd known all along 
    This was what they'd come for, they'll put down 
         The mops and buckets given them as charms 
With which to cleanse the Sahara and move their feet 
    With a calm, sure, delicate disregard 
         For all close-order drill and begin dancing.







Road
 

This is what poetry is (says the Road), 
a laying down of uniform pattern 
across a land you can't control 
but which you think it best to flatten. 
It's far from vivid. Look at the whole 
flamboyant forest! Look at the paths 
that can't be uttered by a mouth 
and at the scattered arcs of light 
more integral to this wide planet 
than words will ever be. Your lines? 
Like railroad tracks that cut the bracken, 
bring something through, then disappear. 
No one knows what speck was taken 
or where it moved, and no one cares.





Progressive Health
 

We here at Progressive Health would like to thank you   
For being one of the generous few who've promised   
To bequeath your vital organs to whoever needs them.   

Now we'd like to give you the opportunity   
To step out far in front of the other donors   
By acting a little sooner than you expected,   

Tomorrow, to be precise, the day you're scheduled   
To come in for your yearly physical. Six patients   
Are waiting this very minute in intensive care   

Who will likely die before another liver   
And spleen and pairs of lungs and kidneys   
Match theirs as closely as yours do. Twenty years,   

Maybe more, are left you, granted, but the gain   
Of these patients might total more than a century.   
To you, of course, one year of your life means more   

Than six of theirs, but to no one else,   
No one as concerned with the general welfare   
As you've claimed to be. As for your poems-- 

The few you may have it in you to finish-- 
Even if we don't judge them by those you've written,   
Even if we assume you finally stage a breakthrough,   

It's doubtful they'll raise one Lazarus from a grave   
Metaphoric or literal. But your body is guaranteed   
To work six wonders. As for the gaps you'll leave   

As an aging bachelor in the life of friends,   
They'll close far sooner than the open wounds   
Soon to be left in the hearts of husbands and wives,   

Parents and children, by the death of the six   
Who now are failing. Just imagine how grateful   
They'll all be when they hear of your grand gesture.   

Summer and winter they'll visit your grave, in shifts,   
For as long as they live, and stoop to tend it,   
And leave it adorned with flowers or holly wreaths,   

While your friends, who are just as forgetful   
As you are, just as liable to be distracted,   
Will do no more than a makeshift job of upkeep.   

If the people you'll see tomorrow pacing the halls   
Of our crowded facility don't move you enough,   
They'll make you at least uneasy. No happy future   

Is likely in store for a man like you whose conscience   
Will ask him to certify every hour from now on   
Six times as full as it was before, your work   

Six times as strenuous, your walks in the woods   
Six times as restorative as anyone else's.   
Why be a drudge, staggering to the end of your life   

Under this crushing burden when, with a single word,   
You could be a god, one of the few gods   
Who, when called on, really listens?





Planting the Meadow
 

I leave the formal garden of schedules 
where hours hedge me, clip the errant sprigs 
of thought, and day after day, a boxwood 
topiary hunt chases a green fox 
never caught. No voice calls me to order 
as I enter a dream of meadow, kneel 
to earth and, moving east to west, second 
the motion only of the sun. I plant 
frail seedlings in the unplowed field, trusting 
the wildness hidden in their hearts. Spring light 
sprawls across false indigo and hyssop, 
daisies, flax. Clouds form, dissolve, withhold 
or promise rain. In time, outside of time, 
the unkempt afternoons fill up with flowers.





Willowspout
 

Because someone thirsty enough 
to trust Old Testament wisdom 
followed the deepening greens 

and found a spring, silver 
in the shadow of blue ridges, 
I can kneel beneath 

this spill of willow 
limbs a century later 
and drink water 

risen from roots 
to enter the evening 
through a spout, the way 

Cherokee stories say the first 
people were born, 
washing into the world 

of such trees whose bark, 
like the water I cup 
to my parched mouth, 

tastes leafy and sweet 
and has the power, 
the old ones say, to heal.





Layabout
 

Do nothing and everything will be done,   
that's what Mr. Lao Tzu said, who walked   
around talking 2,500 years ago and   

now his books practically grow on trees   
they're so popular and if he were   
alive today beautiful women would 

rush up to him like waves lapping   
at the shores of his wisdom.   
That's the way it is, I guess: humbling. 

But if I could just unclench my fists,   
empty out my eyes, turn my mind into   
a prayer flag for the wind to play with, 

we could be brothers, him the older one   
who's seen and not done it all and me   
still unlearning, both of us slung low 

in our hammocks, our hats tipped   
forwards, hands folded neatly,   
like bamboo huts, above our hearts.





Nine-Panel Yaak River Screen
 

Midmorning like a deserted room, apparition 
Of armoire and table weights, 
Oblongs of flat light, 
                                      the rosy eyelids of lovers 
Raised in their ghostly insurrection, 
Decay in the compassed corners beating its black wings, 
Late June and the lilac just ajar. 

Where the deer trail sinks down through the shadows of blue spruce, 
Reeds rustle and bow their heads, 
Creek waters murmur on like the lamentation of women 
For faded, forgotten things. 
And always the black birds in the trees, 
Always the ancient chambers thudding inside the heart. 

                                           _________ 

Swallow pure as a penknife 
                                                   slick through the insected air. 
Swallow poised on the housepost, beakful of mud and a short straw. 
Swallow dun-orange, swallow blue, 
                                                                 mud purse and middle arch, 
Home sweet home. 
Swallow unceasing, swallow unstill 
At sundown, the mother's shade over silver water. 

At the edge of the forest, no sound in the grey stone, 
No moan from the blue lupin. 
The shadows of afternoon 
                                               begin to gather their dark robes 
And unlid their crystal eyes. 
Minute by minute, step by slow step, 
Like the small hand on a clock, we climb north, toward midnight. 

                                           _________ 

I've made a small hole in the silence, a tiny one, 
Just big enough for a word. 
And when I rise from the dead, whenever that is, I'll say it. 
I can't remember the word right now, 
But it will come back to me when the northwest wind 
                                                                            blows down off Mt. Caribou 
The day that I rise from the dead, whenever that is. 

Sunlight, on one leg, limps out to the meadow and settles in. 
Insects fall back inside their voices, 
Little fanfares and muted repeats, 
Inadequate language of sorrow, 
                                                            inadequate language of silted joy, 
As ours is. 
The birds join in. The sunlight opens her other leg. 

                                           _________ 

At times the world falls away from us 
                                                                     with all its disguises, 
And we are left with ourselves 
As though we were dead, or otherwised, our lips still moving, 
The empty distance, the heart 
Like a votive little-red-wagon on top of a child's grave, 
Nothing touching, nothing close. 

A long afternoon, and a long rain begins to fall. 
In some other poem, angels emerge from their cold rooms, 
Their wings blackened by somebody's dream. 
The rain stops, the robin resumes his post. 
                                                                               A whisper 
Out of the clouds and here comes the sun. 
A long afternoon, the robin flying from post back to post. 

                                           _________ 

The length of vowel sounds, by nature and by position, 
Count out the morning's meters-- 
                                                              bird song and squirrel bark, creek run, 
The housefly's languor and murmurous incantation. 
I put on my lavish robes 
And walk at random among the day's 
                                                                     dactyls and anapests, 
A widening caesura with each step. 

I walk through my life as though I were a bookmark, a holder of place, 
An overnight interruption 
                                                 in somebody else's narrative. 
What is it that causes this? 
What is it that pulls my feet down, and keeps on keeping my eyes 
       fixed to the ground? 
Whatever the answer, it will start 
                                                              the wolf pack down from the mountain, 
The raven down from the tree. 

                                           _________ 

Time gnaws on our necks like a dog 
                                                                  gnaws on a stew bone. 
It whittles us down with its white teeth, 
It sends us packing, leaving no footprints on the dust-dour road. 
That's one way of putting it. 
Time, like a golden coin, lies on our tongue's another. 
We slide it between our teeth on the black water, 
                                                                                        ready for what's next. 

The white eyelids of dead boys, like flushed birds, flutter up 
At the edge of the timber. 
Domestic lupin Crayolas the yard. 
                                                              Slow lopes of tall grasses 
Southbound in the meadow, hurled along by the wind. 
In wingbeats and increments, 
The disappeared come back to us, the soul returns to the tree. 

                                           _________ 

The intermittent fugues of the creek, 
                                                                   saying yes, saying no, 
Master music of sunlight 
And black-green darkness under the spruce and tamaracks, 
Lull us and take our breath away. 
                                                              Our lips form fine words, 
But nothing comes out. 
Our lips are the messengers, but nothing can come out. 

After a day of high winds, how beautiful is the stillness of dusk. 
Enormous silence of stones. 
Illusion, like an empty coffin, that something is missing. 
Monotonous psalm of underbrush 
                                                               and smudged flowers. 
After the twilight, darkness. 
After the darkness, darkness, and then what follows that. 

                                           _________ 

The unborn own all of this, what little we leave them, 
St. Thomas's hand 
                                   returning repeatedly to the wound, 
Their half-formed mouths irrepressible in their half-sleep, 
Asking for everything, and then some. 
Already the melancholy of their arrival 
Swells like a sunrise and daydream 
                                                                 over the eastern ridge line. 

Inside the pyrite corridors of late afternoon, 
Image follows image, clouds 
Reveal themselves, 
                                    and shadows, like angels, lie at the feet of all things. 
Chambers of the afterlife open deep in the woods, 
Their secret hieroglyphics suddenly readable 
With one eye closed, then with the other. 

                                           _________ 

One star and a black voyage, 
                                                     drifting mists to wish on, 
Bullbats and their lullabye-- 
Evening tightens like an elastic around the hills. 
Small sounds and the close of day, 
As if a corpse had risen from somewhere deep in the meadow 
And walked in its shadows quietly. 

The mouth inside me with its gold teeth 
Begins to open. 
No words appear on its lips, 
                                                     no syllables bubble along its tongue. 
Night mouth, silent mouth. 
Like drugged birds in the trees, 
                                                          angels with damp foreheads settle down. 
Wind rises, clouds arrive, another night without stars.





Land
 

For Christopher Merrill
Swear by the olive in the God-kissed land-- 
There is no sugar in the promised land. 

Why must the bars turn neon now when, Love,   
I'm already drunk in your capitalist land? 

If home is found on both sides of the globe, 
home is of course here--and always a missed land. 

The hour's come to redeem the pledge (not wholly?)   
in Fate's "Long years ago we made a tryst" land. 

Clearly, these men were here only to destroy,   
a mosque now the dust of a prejudiced land. 

Will the Doomsayers die, bitten with envy,   
when springtime returns to our dismissed land? 

The prisons fill with the cries of children. 
Then how do you subsist, how do you persist, Land? 

"Is my love nothing for I've borne no children? 
I'm with you, Sappho, in that anarchist land. 

A hurricane is born when the wings flutter ...   
Where will the butterfly, on my wrist, land? 

You made me wait for one who wasn't even there   
though summer had finished in that tourist land. 

Do the blind hold temples close to their eyes   
when we steal their gods for our atheist land? 

Abandoned bride, Night throws down her jewels   
so Rome--on our descent--is an amethyst land. 

At the moment the heart turns terrorist, 
are Shahid's arms broken, O Promised Land?





Zen Living
 

Birdsongs that sound like the steady determined tapping 
of a shoemaker's hammer, 
or of a sculptor making tiny ball-peen dents in a silver plate, 
wake me this morning. Is it possible the world itself can be happy? The calico cat 
stretches her long body out across the top of my computer monitor, 
yawning, its little primitive head a cave of possibility. 
And I'm ready again 
to try and see accidents, the over and over patterns 
of double-slit experiments a billionfold 
repeated before me. If I had great patience, 
I could try to count the poplar, birch and oak 
leaves in their shifting welter outside my bedroom window 
or the almost infinitesimal trails of thought that flash and flash 
everywhere, as if decaying particles inside a bubble chamber,
windshield raindrops, lake ripples. However, 
instead I go to fry some bacon, crack two eggs 
into the cast-iron skillet that's even older than this house, 
and on the calendar (each month another oriental fan 
where the climbing solitary is dwarfed . . . or on dark blue oceans 
minuscular fishing boats bob beneath gigantic waves) 
X out the days, including those I've forgotten.





Self-Inquiry Before the Job Interview
 

Did you sneeze? 
Yes, I rid myself of the imposter inside me. 

Did you iron your shirt? 
Yes, I used the steam of mother's hate. 

Did you wash your hands? 
Yes, I learned my hygiene from a raccoon. 

I prayed on my knees, and my knees answered with pain. 
I gargled. I polished my shoes until I saw who I was. 
I inflated my rsum by employing my middle name. 

I walked to my interview, early, 
The sun like a ring on an electric stove. 
I patted my hair when I entered the wind of a revolving door. 
The guard said, For a guy like you, it's the 19th floor. 

The economy was up. Flags whipped in every city plaza 
In America. This I saw for myself as I rode the elevator, 
Empty because everyone had a job but me. 

Did you clean your ears? 
Yes, I heard my fate in the drinking fountain's idiotic drivel.

Did you slice a banana into your daily mush? 
I added a pinch of salt, two raisins to sweeten my breath. 

Did you remember your pen? 
I remembered my fingers when the elevator opened. 

I shook hands that dripped like a dirty sea. 
I found a chair and desk. My name tag said my name. 
Through the glass ceiling, I saw the heavy rumps of CEOs. 
Outside my window, the sun was a burning stove, 
All of us pushing papers 
To keep it going.





The Parade
 

How exhilarating it was to march 

along the great boulevards 

in the sunflash of trumpets 

and under all the waving flags--

the flag of ambition, the flag of love. 


So many of us streaming along--

all of humanity, really--

moving in perfect step, 

yet each lost in the room of a private dream. 


How stimulating the scenery of the world, 

the rows of roadside trees, 

the huge curtain of the sky. 


How endless it seemed until we veered 

off the broad turnpike 

into a pasture of high grass, 

headed toward the dizzying cliffs of mortality. 


Generation after generation, 

we keep shouldering forward 

until we step off the lip into space. 


And I should not have to remind you 

that little time is given here 

to rest on a wayside bench, 

to stop and bend to the wildflowers, 

or to study a bird on a branch--


not when the young 

are always shoving from behind, 

not when the old keep tugging us forward, 

pulling on our arms with all their feeble strength.





Chamber Thicket
 

As we sat at the feet of the string quartet,   
in their living room, on a winter night,   
through the hardwood floor spurts and gulps   
and tips and shudders came up, and the candle-scent   
air was thick-alive with pearwood,   
ebony, spruce, poplar, and horse   
howled, and cat skreeled, and then,   
when the Grsse Fugue was around us, under us,   
over us, in us, I felt I was hearing   
the genes of my birth-family, pulled, keening   
and grieving and scathing, along each other,   
scraping and craving, I felt myself held in that   
woods of hating longing, and I knew   
and knew myself, and my parents, and their parents,   
there--and then, at a distance, I sensed,   
as if it were thirty years ago,   
a being, far off yet, oblique-approaching,   
straying toward, and then not toward,   
and then toward this place, like a wandering dreaming   
herdsman, my husband. And I almost wanted   
to warn him away, to call out to him   
to go back whence he came, into some calmer life,   
but his beauty was too moving to me,   
and I wanted too much to not be alone, in the   
covert, any more, and so I prayed him   
come to me, I bid him hasten, and good welcome.





Hartley Field
 

And place is always and only place
And what is actual is actual only for one time
And only for one place . . .
                              T. S. Eliot
The wind cooled as it crossed the open pond 
and drove little waves toward us, 
brisk, purposeful waves 
that vanished at our feet, such energy 
thwarted by so little elevation. 
The wind was endless, seamless, 
old as the earth. 
                           Insects came 
to regard us with favor. I felt them alight, 
felt their minute footfalls. 
I was a challenge, an Everest . . . 

And you, whom I have heard breathe all night, 
sigh through the water of sleep 
with vestigial gills . . .

A pair of dragonflies drifted past us, silent, 
while higher up two bullet-shaped jets 
dragged their roars behind them 
on unbreakable chains. It seemed a pity 
we'd given up the sky to them, but I understand so little. 
Perhaps it was necessary.

All our years together--
and not just together. Surely by now 
we have the same blood type, the same myopia. 
Sometimes I think we're the same sex, 
the one in the middle of man and woman, 
born of both as every child is.

The waves came to us, one each heartbeat, 
and lay themselves at our feet. 
The swelling goes down. 
The fever cools. 
There, where the Hartleys grew lettuce eighty years ago 
bear and beaver, fox and partridge 
den and nest and hunt 
and are hunted. I wish I had the means 
to give all the north back to itself, to let the pines 
rise in the hayfield and the lilacs go wild. 
But then where would we live?

I wanted that hour with you all winter--
I thought of it while I worked, 
before I slept and when I woke, 
a time when the tangled would straighten, 
when contrition would become benediction: 
the positive hour, shining like mica. 
At last the wind brought it to us across the pond, 
then took it up again, every last minute.





Mary Shelley in Brigantine
 

Because the ostracized experience the world 
in ways peculiar to themselves, often seeing it 
clearly yet with such anger and longing 
that they sometimes enlarge what they see, 
she at first saw Brigantine as a paradise for gulls. 
She must be a horseshoe crab washed ashore. 

How startling, though, no one knew about her past, 
the scandal with Percy, the tragic early deaths, 
yet sad that her Frankenstein had become 
just a name, like Dracula or Satan, something 
that stood for a kind of scariness, good for a laugh. 
She found herself welcome everywhere. 

People would tell her about Brigantine Castle, 
turned into a house of horror. They thought 
she'd be pleased that her monster roamed 
its dark corridors, making children scream. 
They lamented the day it was razed. 
Thus Mary Shelley found herself accepted 

by those who had no monster in them --
the most frightening people alive, she thought. 
Didn't they know Frankenstein had abandoned 
his creation, set him loose without guidance 
or a name? Didn't they know what it feels like 
to be lost, freaky, forever seeking who you are? 

She was amazed now that people believed 
you could shop for everything you might need. 
She loved that in the dunes you could almost hide. 
At the computer store she asked an expert 
if there was such a thing as too much knowledge, 
or going too far? He directed her to a website 

where he thought the answers were. 
Yet Mary Shelley realized that the pain she felt 
all her life was gone. Could her children, dead so young, 
be alive somewhere, too? She couldn't know 
that only her famous mother had such a chance. 
She was almost ready to praise this awful world.





What Became
 

What became of the dear   
strands of hair pressed   
against the perspiration   
of your lover's brow   
after lovemaking as you gazed   
into the world of those eyes,   
now only yours?   

What became of any afternoon   
that was so vivid you forgot   
the present was up to its old   
trick of pretending   
it would be there   
always?   

What became of the one   
who believed so deeply   
in this moment he memorized   
everything in it and left   
it for you?





The Age of Dinosaurs
 

There are, of course, theories 
about the wide-eyed, drop-jawed 
fascination children have for them, 
about how, before he's learned 
his own phone number or address, 
a five-year-old can carry 
like a few small stones 
the Latin tonnage of those names, 
the prefixes and preferences 
for leaf or meat. 

My son recites the syllables 
I stumble over now, 
sets up figures as I did 
years ago in his prehistory. 
Here is the green ski slope 
of a brontosaur's back, 
there a triceratops in full 
gladiator gear. From the arm 
of a chair a pterodactyl 
surveys the dark primeval carpet. 

Each has disappeared from time 
to time, excavated finally 
from beneath a cabinet 
or the sofa cushions, only 
to be buried again among its kind 
in the deep toy chest, 
the closed lid snug as earth. 
The next time they're brought out 
to roam the living room 
another bone's been found 

somewhere, a tooth or fragment 
of an eggshell dusted off, 
brushing away some long-held notion 
about their life-span 
or intelligence, warm blood 
or cold. On the floor 
they face off as if debating 
the latest find, what part 
of which one of them 
has been discovered this time. 

Or else they stand abreast 
in one long row, side 
by scaly side, waiting to fall 
like dominoes, my son's 
tossed tennis ball a neon yellow 
asteroid, his shadow a dark cloud 
when he stands, his fervor for them 
cooling so slowly he can't feel it-- 
the speed of glaciers, maybe, 
how one age slides into the next.





The Vision of Saint Augustine
 

        Carpaccio, San Giorgio degli Schiavoni, Venice
You are amazed to find trees in Venice --
To turn a corner into a campo
Where two or three rustling acacias
Spread their halo of leaves
Over two or three red-slatted benches.
It's as if you had slipped through a curtained doorway
Into a hall full of dull gold scenes
By Carpaccio -- a miraculous light --
Though the rio's still shrouded in a mist
Compounded of water vapour and smog
So it's not that the sun has come out, it's
Something to do with the leaves and painting

In the realm of echoes where footsteps
Reverberate endlessly between two walls
And dawn is the chink of a stonemason
At his reparations, disembodied
Voices irresistible as bird calls.
Yes, you're amazed to find trees in Venice
Shedding their gold leaf onto the pavement
Outside a secondhand bookstore.
It's like Carpaccio's little white dog
Wagging his tail at the feet of Saint Augustine
Who is staring out of the window
Looking for the voice of Saint Jerome.





Lacemakers
 

Santa Maria Assunta, Torcello
Mater dolorosa, here I am hungry
And ill-disposed on worn flags at your feet.
Through high windows wintry sun seeps in
And floods the six-tiered polychrome Apocalypse,
This Sunday's text in comic strip.

That's my son over by the door, impatient
To be off somewhere. Other boys pose
On attila's Throne while their fathers snap pictures
And mothers price lace - clotheslines of lace
Strung from trucks selling pizzas.

Around the lagoon, your fields have grown wild;
Vines redden on half-fallen fences
That no longer keep the allotments apart.
On some islands the women make lace, punti in aria - stitches in air -  
Materializing the spaces between things.





During the Service
 

How strange my lack of faith must seem to you. 
I see the way your god provides a cradle for your grief; 
how lovely to be certain that the ancient story's true. 

You sang the hymns as if each word were new--
At last, you sang, at last in Your / Eternal arms I'll find relief 
(how strange my lack of faith must seem to you)--

while I kept drifting, lost in the refrains and in the blue 
fragility the tinted glass provided us to bow beneath 
(how lovely to be certain that the ancient story's true). 

Beneath that moderated sky we rose and sang and cried on cue; 
familiar words were read to keep our sorrow brief 
(how sad my lack of faith must seem to you); 

the book upon the altar and the hymnals in each pew 
held pages edged in fine gold leaf--
how lovely seeing that the ancient story's true--

and I was wondering just what it cost to see this vaulting through: 
the ceilings, windows, ornament; the engineering of belief . . . 

But let my lack of faith seem strange to you! 
You're lovely certain that the ancient story's true.





The Key to the Kingdom
 

It's not exile, homes and families behind 
us, where we meet. It happens anywhere, 
               now: a stateless 
state of no name, quietly seceding 
from the crumbling empires round us, 

without stamps or Eurovision entries. 
No-one does it with a rough guide in a week. 
               You inhabit it 
or nothing. Like this: in a pavement cafe 
you blink and you seem to surprise them, 

the crowd, all its separate faces at once, 
coming out of solution like crystals, 
               like a rush of starlings 
or the breeze that lifts the canvas awning 
now and dents your cappuccino froth 

with a crisp little sound. And that's it: 
between breaths, just between you and me 
               as if; yes, 
QED. You are received. This is 
the freedom of the city, and the key 

to the kingdom, and its borders ripple 
outwards like a frill of breaking wave 
               onto flat sand, 
a wavering line already fading leaving 
spume-flecks high and dry, 

a prickling on your palm; you're five 
years old, looking up at the whole sea, 
               unsure: 
                            will you laugh or cry?





Torcello
 

Offshore, the Apocalypse   
stays contained   
to one island and its church.   

Venice's ruler's out wedding   
himself to the ocean   

while I'm ankle deep   
in the Adriatic,   
eyes raised to a book   

unencumbered by words: A Bible   
that reads from East to West. Guidebooks   
want only   

to see it as ceiling--the Basilica   
San Marco,   

where Christ's hands open on wounds   
embedded with rubies, and priests   

hold back the sea with brooms.   
I'm taking on incense,   

bowing at altars dragged out   
of Constantinople,   
sloshing across marble   
sacked from Jerusalem.   

Offshore, the sea's a bride bought   
with a fist full of diamonds   
the Doge throws into the deep-- 

a sign of his true and perpetual dominion.   

Then why does walking into this church   
mean stepping into the ocean?   
The sea is a dog-- 
Priests throw in bones just to placate it.   

The year's nearly 2000,   
but the millennium already hit once   

on the island Torcello,   
a kind of plague the Venetians contained.   
999 years,   

and the dead still crawl from dirt   
towards their radiant bodies,   
they still gather up   

missing limbs: arms, legs, hands   
sharks and beasts keep regurgitating.   

We do what we know-- 
But Christ never wanted to manage   
resurrections in Venice.   

Underdressed in the flesh   
from dead civilizations,   
he moves among us in Byzantine skin.   

I'm getting close to this God   
worshiped only by tourists.   

He picks at the wounds   
on his crucified body, the injury   
scabbed over with jewels.





In Time
 

As far as clocks--and it is time to think of them--
I have one on my kitchen shelf and it is 
flat, with a machine-made flair, a perfect 
machine from 1948, at the latest, 
and made of shining plastic with the numbers 
sharp and clear and slightly magnified in 
that heartbreaking post-war style, the cord 
too short, though what does it matter, since the mechanism 
is broken and it sits unplugged alongside a 
cheap ceramic rooster, his head insanely 
small and yet his tiny brain alert for 
he is the one who will crow and not that broken 
buzzing relic, though time is different now 
and dawn is different too, you were up all night 
and it is dark when he crows and you are waiting 
to see what direction you should face and if 
you were born in time or was it wasted and what 
the day looks like and is the rooster loyal.





Box of Cigars
 

I tried one or two but they were stale 
and broke like sticks or crumbled when I rolled them 
and lighting a match was useless nor could I 
put them back in the refrigerator-- 
it was too late for that--even licking them 
filled my mouth with ground-up outer leaf, 
product of Lancaster or eastern Virginia, 
so schooled I am with cigars, it comes in the blood, 
and I threw handfuls of them into the street 
from three floors up and, to my horror, sitting 
on my stoop were four or five street people 
who ran to catch them as if they were suddenly rich, 
and I apologize for that, no one should 
be degraded that way, my hands were crazy, 
and I ran down to explain but they were smoking 
already nor did I have anything to give them 
since we were living on beans ourselves, I sat 
and smoked too, and once in a while we looked 
up at the open window, and one of us spit 
into his empty can. We were visionaries.





How We Made a New Art on Old Ground
 

A famous battle happened in this valley.   
                     You never understood the nature poem.   
Till now. Till this moment--if these statements   
                     seem separate, unrelated, follow this   

silence to its edge and you will hear   
                     the history of air: the crispness of a fern   
or the upward cut and turn around of   
                     a fieldfare or thrush written on it.   

The other history is silent: The estuary   
                     is over there. The issue was decided here:   
Two kings prepared to give no quarter.   
                     Then one king and one dead tradition.   

Now the humid dusk, the old wounds   
                     wait for language, for a different truth:   
When you see the silk of the willow   
                     and the wider edge of the river turn   

and grow dark and then darker, then   
                     you will know that the nature poem   
is not the action nor its end: it is   
                     this rust on the gate beside the trees, on 

the cattle grid underneath our feet,   
                     on the steering wheel shaft: it is   
an aftermath, an overlay and even in   
                     its own modest way, an art of peace: 

I try the word distance and it fills with   
                     sycamores, a summer's worth of pollen   
And as I write valley straw, metal   
                     blood, oaths, armour are unwritten.   

Silence spreads slowly from these words   
                     to those ilex trees half in, half out   
of shadows falling on the shallow ford   
                     of the south bank beside Yellow Island   

as twilight shows how this sweet corrosion   
                     begins to be complete: what we see   
is what the poem says:   
                     evening coming--cattle, cattle-shadows-- 

and whin bushes and a change of weather   
                     about to change them all: what we see is how 
the place and the torment of the place are   
                     for this moment free of one another.





My Century
 

The year I was born the atomic bomb went off. 
Here I'd just begun, and someone 
found the switch to turn off the world. 

In the furnace-light, in the central solar fire 
of that heat lamp, the future got very finite, 
and it was possible to imagine time-travelers 

failing to arrive, because there was no future. 
Inside the great dark clock in the hall, 
heavy brass cylinders descended. 

Tick-tock, the chimes changed their tune 
one phrase at a time. The bomb became 
a film star, its glamorous globe of smoke 

searing the faces of men in beach chairs. 
Someone threw up every day at school. 
No time to worry about collective death, 

when life itself was permeated by ordeals. 
And so we grew up, beneath an umbrella of acceptance. 
In bio we learned there were particles 

cruising through us like whales through archipelagoes, 
and in civics that if Hitler had gotten the bomb 
he'd have used it on the inferior races, 

and all this time love was etching its scars 
on our skins like maps. The heavens 
remained pure, except for little white slits 

on the perfect blue skin that planes cut 
in the icy upper air, like needles sewing. 
From one, a tiny seed might fall 

that would make a sun on earth. 
And so the century passed, with me still in it, 
books waiting on the shelves to become cinders, 

what we felt locked up inside, waiting to be read, 
down the long corridor of time. I was born 
the year the bomb exploded. Twice 

whole cities were charred like cities in the Bible, 
but we didn't look back. We went on thinking 
we could go on, our shapes the same, 

darkened now against a background lit by fire. 
Forgive me for doubting you're there, 
Citizens, on your holodecks with earth wallpaper--

a shadow-toned ancestor with poorly pressed pants, 
protected like a child from knowing the future.





Shy Boy
 

I wait for my shadow to forget me, 
to take that one phantom step that I keep 
from taking. I wait for the simple flash 
of a dancer's spat upon this one moon 
of stage-light, the mind's lonely oval 
illuminated on the surface of some 
windless pond or slew. And the old soft-shoe 
practices to get it right, husha-husha-hush 
in its constant audition of sawdust. 
Even this choreography of useless 
wishing is not enough to keep tonight 
from becoming nothing more than some floor's 
forgotten routine where faded, numbered 
dance-steps silently waltz themselves away. 
The orchestra's now ready to Faur
into the evening's last song while I try 
to convince myself to cross this room 
for the first time all night and rinse 
what's left in some dbutante's silver 
sequined waterfall, hope keeling hopelessly 
ever closer to the edge. Across the floor 
other couples sashay on. A tin flask empties 
itself from asking, the shadow's last chance 
now wasted in some chandelier's dim lust.





Market Forecast
 

Adjectives continue 
their downward spiral, 
with adverbs likely to follow. 

Wisdom, grace, and beauty 
can be had three for a dollar, 
as they head for a recession. 

Diaphanous, filigree, 
pearlescent, and love 
are now available 
at wholesale prices. 

Verbs are still blue-chip investments, 
but not many are willing to sell. 

The image market is still strong, 
but only for those rated AA or higher. 
Beware of cheap imitations 
sold by the side of the road. 

Only the most conservative 
consider rhyme a good option, 
but its success in certain circles 
warrants a brief mention. 

The ongoing search for fresh 
metaphor has caused concern 
among environmental activists, 

who warn that both the moon and the sea 
have measurably diminished 
since the dawn of the Romantic era. 

Latter-day prosodists are having to settle 
for menial positions in poultry plants, 
where an aptitude for repetitive rhythms 
is considered a valuable trait. 

The outlook for the future remains uncertain, 
and troubled times may lie ahead. 
Supply will continue to outpace demand, 
and the best of the lot will remain unread.





Ode to a Blizzard
 

O! wonderful for weight and whiteness! 
       Ideolog whose absolutes 
               Are always proven right 
                      By white and then 
               More white and white again, 
       Winning the same argument year 
After year by making the opposition 
                            Disappear! 

O! dear miniature of infinity with no 
       End in sight and no snow- 
             Flake exactly like 
                      Another, all 
             A little different no 
       Matter how many may fall, 
Just like our own DNA or the human face 
                              Eternal! 

O! still keep covering the street 
       And sidewalks, cemeteries, even 
               Our twice-shoveled drive, 
                      And all that is alive, 
               With geometries that sleet 
       Will freeze into Death's 
Impromptu vision of a heaven 
                              Wholly white! 

For we know who your sponsor is, whose will 
       You so immensely serve, 
               Whose chill is more severe 
                      Than any here. 
               Though his name may be unspoken, 
       His commandments are unbroken, 
And every monument that you erect 
                              Belongs to him!





[Over a cup of coffee]
 

          
          Over a cup of coffee or sitting on a park bench or 
walking the dog, he would recall some incident 
from his youth--nothing significant--climbing a tree 
in his backyard, waiting in left field for a batter's 
swing, sitting in a parked car with a girl whose face 
he no longer remembered, his hand on her breast 
and his body electric; memories to look at with 
curiosity, the harmless behavior of a stranger, with 
nothing to regret or elicit particular joy. And 
although he had no sense of being on a journey, 
such memories made him realize how far he had 
traveled, which, in turn, made him ask how he 
would look back on the person he was now, this 
person who seemed so substantial. These images, it 
was like looking at a book of old photographs, 
recognizing a forehead, the narrow chin, and 
perhaps recalling the story of an older second 
cousin, how he had left long ago to try his luck in 
Argentina or Australia. And he saw that he was 
becoming like such a person, that the day might 
arrive when he would look back on his present self 
as on a distant relative who had drifted off into 
uncharted lands.
        




Christmas Tree Lots
 

Christmas trees lined like war refugees, 
a fallen army made to stand in their greens. 
Cut down at the foot, on their last leg, 

they pull themselves up, arms raised. 
We drop them like wood; 
tied, they are driven through the streets, 

dragged through the door, cornered 
in a room, given a single blanket, 
only water to drink, surrounded by joy. 

Forced to wear a gaudy gold star, 
to surrender their pride, 
they do their best to look alive.





To Luck
 

In the cards and at the bend in the road   
we never saw you   
in the womb and in the crossfire   
in the numbers   
whatever you had your hand in   
which was everything   
we were told never to put   
our faith in you   
to bow to you humbly after all   
because in the end there was nothing   
else we could do   
but not to believe in you   

still we might coax you with pebbles   
kept warm in the hand   
or coins or the relics   
of vanished animals   
observances rituals   
not binding upon you   
who make no promises   
we might do such things only   
not to neglect you   
and risk your disfavor   
oh you who are never the same   
who are secret as the day when it comes   
you whom we explain   
as often as we can   
without understanding





My Dog Practices Geometry
 

I do not understand the poets who tell me 
that I should not personify. Every morning 
the willow auditions for a new role 

outside my bedroom window--today she is 
Clytemnestra; yesterday a Southern Belle, 
lost in her own melodrama, sinking on her skirts. 

Nor do I like the mathematicians who tell me 
I cannot say, "The zinnias are counting on their 
fingers," or "The dog is practicing her geometry," 

even though every day I watch her using 
the yard's big maple as the apex of a triangle 
from which she bisects the circumference 

of the lawn until she finds the place where 
the rabbit has escaped, or the squirrel upped 
the ante by climbing into a new Euclidian plane. 

She stumbles across the lawn, eyes pulling 
her feet along, gaze fixed on a rodent working 
the maze of the oak as if it were his own invention, 

her feet tangling in the roots of trees, and tripping, 
yes, even over themselves, until I go out to assist, 
by pointing at the squirrel, and repeating, "There! 

There!" But instead of following my outstretched 
arm to the crown of the tree, where the animal is 
now lounging under a canopy of leaves, 

catching its breath, charting its next escape, 
she looks to my mouth, eager to read my lips, 
confident that I--who can bring her home 

from across the field with a word, who 
can speak for the willow and the zinnia-- 
can surely charm a squirrel down from a tree.





The Dignity of Ushers
 

Their authority did not unfold 
from ironed white shirts and thin ties 
or from the funereal seriousness that struck 
their acne-splashed faces but because 
they stood heir to our native faith in light. 

So we followed the thin white waver 
of beams they pointed down aisles 
to seats we never thought of refusing. 
It was the first job I wanted, 
especially after birthday outings 

far from home showed me the glowing 
outfits worn by big-city ushers, their get-ups 
a blend of doorman and military dictator, 
as gaudy and fine as the plots 
of movies my Saturdays were swallowed by. 

None of us knew, as they took us 
into the artificial light of the cinema, 
that they walked the path of the pin setter, 
the blacksmith or elevator operator, 
professions reduced to curiosity 

by wandering time. Only in the quick steps 
of floor salesmen, the slim backs of hostesses 
bringing us to our tables, do they remain, 
the artful flutters of their flashlights lost 
in dark we are left to find our own way through.





Tenderness and Rot
 

Tenderness and rot   
share a border.   
And rot is an   
aggressive neighbor   
whose iridescence   
keeps creeping over.   

No lessons   
can be drawn   
from this however.   

One is not   
two countries.   
One is not meat   
corrupting.   

It is important   
to stay sweet   
and loving.





Dream of the Huntress
 

It is always the same: 
she is standing over me 

in the forest clearing, 
a dab of blood on her cheek 

from a rabbit or a deer. 
I am aware of nothing 

but my mutinous flesh, 
and the traps of desire 

sent to test it-- 
her bare arms, bare 

shoulders, her loosened hair, 
the hard, high breasts, 

and under a belt 
of knives and fish-lures, 

her undressed wound. 
Every night the same: 

the slashed fetlock, 
the buckling under; 

I wake in her body 
broken, like a gun.





Royalty
 

"I gave birth to a princess," her mother 
once told me, and I thought of my son pouring 
his Grape-Nuts in the garage so as not to wake her, 

of the moment her baby, seeing her 
now a separate entity, seemed not to breathe, 
refused to blink her sapphire eyes. 

I remembered again last night as she 
and I crossed a Florida street, the caution 
light running gold streamers 

over the dark sweep of her hair, 
when a young man coming toward us halted 
midway a moment, stunned, before moving on. 

So what is this Divine Right--less 
than bloodlines, or more? More than symmetry 
of face or a silver necklace nestled 

at a flawless throat, the nerve to send back 
bad food in restaurants, more than the big, 
loopy handwriting of the generous spirit? 

Call it bravery, that eager readiness 
in the eyes, the quality of the light shining 
there. Call it blessed assurance. 

Today, pony-tailed, she luxuriates in sun, 
opulent in a hot pink bikini. In deference 
the ocean leans away, a backdrop. 

I find myself bent, studying the shore for perfect 
shells to lay at her feet--cat's paw, prickly 
cockle, angel wing. Call it homage, more or less.





Bel Canto
 

The sun is high, the seaside air is sharp, 
And salty light reveals the Mayan School. 
The Irish hope their names are on the harp, 
We see the sheep's advertisement for wool, 
Boulders are here, to throw against a tarp, 
From which comes bursting forth a puzzled mule. 
Perceval seizes it and mounts it, then 
The blood-dimmed tide recedes and then comes in again. 

Fateful connections that we make to things 
Whose functioning's oblivious to our lives! 
How sidewise news of light from darkness springs, 
How blue bees buzz from big blooms back to hives 
And make the honey while the queen bee sings 
Leadbelly in arrangements by Burl Ives-- 
How long ago I saw the misted pine trees 
And hoped, no matter how, to get them into poetry! 

Stendhal, at fifty, gazing as it happened 
On Rome from the Janiculum, decided 
That one way he could give his life a stipend 
Was to suspend his being Amour's fighter 
And get to know himself. Here he had ripened 
Accomplished, loved, and lived, was a great writer 
But never had explored in true detail 
His childhood and his growing up. So he set sail 

Composing La Vie de Henry Brulard 
But in five hundred pages scarcely got 
Beyond his seventeenth year, for it is hard 
To take into account what happens here 
And fit it all onto an index card. 
Even one moment of it is too hot, 
Complex and cannibalistically connected 
To every other, which is what might be expected. 

Sterne's hero has a greater problem, never 
Getting much past his birth. I've had a third one. 
My autobiography, if I should ever 
Start out to write it, quickly seems a burden 
An I-will-do-that-the-next-time endeavor. 
Whatever life I do write's an absurd one 
As if some crazy person with a knife 
Cut up and made a jigsaw puzzle of a life. 

In any case a life that's hardly possible 
In the conditions that we really live in, 
Where easy flying leaps to inaccessible 
Mountainy places where love is a given 
And misery, if there, infinitesimal, 
Are quite the norm. Here none by pain is driven 
That is not curable by the romanza 
That's kept in readiness to finish any stanza. 

Whatever, then, I see at this late stage of 
My life I may or may not have stayed ignorant 
Of that great book I've strained to write one page of 
Yet always hoping my page was significant. 
Be it or not, for me and for the ages 
I leave it as it is. Yet as a figurant 
Who has not stopped, I'm writing in addition 
More lines to clarify my present disposition. 

One person in a million finds out something 
Perhaps each fifty years and that is knowledge. 
Newton, Copernicus, Einstein are cunning. 
The rest of us just rise and go to college 
With no more hope to come home with the bunting 
Than a stray dachshund going through the village. 
However, what a treat our small successes 
Of present and of past, at various addresses! 

To be in all those places where I tarried 
Too little or too late or bright and early 
To love again the first woman I married 
To marvel at such things as melancholy, 
Sophistication, drums, a baby carriage, 
A John Cage concert heard at Alice Tully-- 
How my desire when young to be a poet 
Made me attentive and oblivious every moment! 

Do you remember Oceanview the Fair? 
The heights above the river? The canoes? 
The place we beached them and the grass was bare? 
Those days the sandbars gave our knees a truce? 
The crooked line of pantry shelves, with pear 
And cherry jam? And Pancho, with his noose? 
Do you remember Full and Half and Empty? 
Do you remember sorrow standing in the entry? 

Do you remember thought, and talking plainly? 
Michel and I went walking after Chartres 
Cathedral had engaged our spirits mainly 
By giving us an insight into Barthes. 
Michel said he was capable of feigning 
Renewed intentions of the soul's deep part, 
Like this cathedral's artificial forces 
That press a kind of artless thought into our faces. 

And yet--    The moor is dark beneath the moon. 
The porcupine turns over on its belly 
And new conceptions rap at the cocoon. 
Civilization, dealing with us fairly, 
For once, releases its Erectheion 
Of understanding, which consoles us, nearly. 
Later we study certain characteristics 
That may give us a better chance with the statistics. 

How much I'd like to live the whole thing over, 
But making some corrections as I go! 
To be a better husband and a father, 
Be with my babies on a sled in snow. 
By twenty I'd have understood my mother 
And by compassion found a way to know 
What separates the what-I-started-out-as 
From what-I-sometimes-wished-I-was-when-in-the-mountains. 

To be once more the one who what was worthy 
Of courtship courted--it was quite as stressful 
As trying to, er, as they say, give birth to 
A poem and as often unsuccessful, 
But it was nice to be sublime and flirty 
With radiant girls, and, in some strange way, restful. 
I could be everything I wasn't usually-- 
And then to get somebody else to feel it mutually! 

In poems the same problem or a similar. 
Desire of course not only to do old things 
But things unheard of yet by nuns or visitors 
And of the melancholy finch be co-finch 
In singing songs with such a broad parameter 
That seamstresses would stare, forget to sew things, 
Astronauts quit the sky, athletes the stadium 
To hear them, and the rest of what they hear be tedium. 

Such wild desires, I think it's recognizable 
Are part and parcel of the Human Image 
And in a way, I'd say, no less predictable 
Than Popeye's feelings for a can of spinach. 
Yet if we're set on course by the Invisible, 
All pre-determined, what about the language 
That teases me each morning with its leanings 
Toward the Unprogrammed Altitudes beyond its meanings? 

Are you, O particles, O atoms, nominatives 
Like Percevals and Stendhals, set in motion 
By some Ordaining Will that is definitive? 
Is this invading chill and high emotion, 
This tendency to know one is regenerative, 
Is this, all, tidal take-home like the ocean? 
Be what you may, my thanks for your society 
Through the long life I've had, your jokes and your variety, 

The warmth you've shown in giving me a temperature 
That I can live with, and the strength you've shared with me 
In arms and legs--and for your part in literature, 
What can I say? It is as if life stared at me 
And kissed my lips and left it as a signature. 
Thank you for that, and thank you for preparing me 
For love itself, and friendship, its co-agent. 
Thank you for being this, and for its inspiration.





Sequestrienne
 

Don't look at me   
for answers. Who am I but   
a sobriquet,   
a teeth-grinder,   
grinder of color,   
and vanishing point?   

There was a time   
of middle distance, unforgettable,   
a sort of lace-cut   
flame-green filament   
to ravish my   
skin-tight eyes.   

I take that back--   
it was forgettable but not   
entirely if you   
consider my   
heavenly bodies . . .   
I loved them so.   

Heaven's motes sift   
to salt-white--paint is ground   
to silence; and I,   
I am bound, unquiet,   
a shade of blue   
in the studio.   

If it isn't too late   
let me waste one day away   
from my history.   
Let me see without   
looking inside   
at broken glass.





Candles
 

If on your grandmother's birthday you burn a candle   
To honor her memory, you might think of burning an extra   
To honor the memory of someone who never met her,   
A man who may have come to the town she lived in   
Looking for work and never found it.   
Picture him taking a stroll one morning,   
After a month of grief with the want ads,   
To refresh himself in the park before moving on.   
Suppose he notices on the gravel path the shards   
Of a green glass bottle that your grandmother,   
Then still a girl, will be destined to step on   
When she wanders barefoot away from her school picnic   
If he doesn't stoop down and scoop the mess up   
With the want-ad section and carry it to a trash can.   

For you to burn a candle for him   
You needn't suppose the cut would be a deep one,   
Just deep enough to keep her at home   
The night of the hay ride when she meets Helen,   
Who is soon to become her dearest friend,   
Whose brother George, thirty years later,   
Helps your grandfather with a loan so his shoe store   
Doesn't go under in the Great Depression   
And his son, your father, is able to stay in school   
Where his love of learning is fanned into flames,   
A love he labors, later, to kindle in you.   

How grateful you are for your father's efforts   
Is shown by the candles you've burned for him.   
But today, for a change, why not a candle   
For the man whose name is unknown to you?   
Take a moment to wonder whether he died at home   
With friends and family or alone on the road,   
On the look-out for no one to sit at his bedside   
And hold his hand, the very hand   
It's time for you to imagine holding.





I Ask My Grandmother If We Can Make Lahmajoun
 

Sure, she says, why not,   
we buy the ground lamb from the market   
we buy parsley, fresh tomatoes, garlic   
we cut, press, dice, mix   

make the yeasty dough   
the night before, kneading it   
until our knuckles feel the hardness   
of river beds or rocks in the desert   

we tell Tante Lola to come   
with her rolling pins we tell   
Zaven and Maroush, Hagop and Arpin   
to bring their baking sheets   

we sprinkle the flour on the kitchen table   
and it is snowing on Ararat   
we sprinkle the flour and the memory   
of winter is in our eyes   

we roll the dough out   
into small circles   
pale moons over   
every empty village   

Kevork is standing on a chair   
and singing   
O my Armenian girl  
my spirit longs to be nearer  

Nevrig is warming the oven   
and a dry desert breeze   
is skimming over the rooftops   
toward the sea   

we are spreading the lahma 
on the ajoun with our fingers   
whispering into it the histories   
of those who have none   

we are baking them   
under the heat of the sun   
the dough crispening   
so thin and delicate   

you would swear   
it is valuable parchment   
we are taking out   
and rolling up in our hands   

and eating and tasting again   
everything that has already   
been written   
into the body.





Arrowhead Hunting
 

The land is full of what was lost. What's hidden 
Rises to the surface after rain 
In new-ploughed fields, and fields stubbled again: 
The clay shards, foot and lip, that heaped the midden, 

And here and there a blade or flakes of blade, 
A patient art, knapped from a core of flint, 
Most broken, few as coins new from the mint, 
Perfect, shot through time as through a glade. 

You cannot help but think how they were lost: 
The quarry, fletched shaft in its flank, the blood 
Whose trail soon vanished in the antlered wood, 
Not just the meat, but what the weapon cost-- 

O hapless hunter, though your aim was true-- 
The wounded hart, spooked, fleeting in its fear-- 
And the sharpness honed with longing, year by year 
Buried deeper, found someday, but not by you.





Fiduciary
 

the relationship between   
       blackbird and fencepost, between   
the cow and its egret, the field   
       and wildflowers overrunning the field--   
so little depends upon their trust.   

       Here, in God we trust   
to keep our cash and thoughts in line--   
       in the sky, an unexplained white line   
could be the first of many omens.   
       But this is no country for omens,   

the line as chalky as the moon,   
       bleak and useless as the moon   
now rising like a breath of cold air . . .   
       There is gullibility in the air.





Nomadology
 

In the beginning, a word, move; 
then a plan and then the reasons, 
which I do not remember exactly. 
I remember clearly only the clothes 
we were given for the journey 
and the last, silent meal we ate. 
We left the place as lightly as we 
had come, so many years before. 

From a sunlit state of innocence 
where white sheets were hung 
to dry like clouds over paradise; 
from eucalyptus-scented earth, 
a red house with a yard swung 
between dreaming hills, pillaged 
by raccoons, framed with lilies 
like trumpets of the archangels, 

we moved: into history, a river 
slowed by many bends, a village 
of peacocks with a hundred eyes; 
a low house among fields, with 
an iron stove, a winter shrine; 
a fireplace blackened by time, 
the fragile bones of a sparrow 
frozen in the shape of its flight. 

When father played his trombone 
in the attic, schoolchildren tittered 
in the street. In the late afternoon, 
the cows assembled at the gate, 
witless, waiting for a farmer's son. 
Home, the children conjugated 
verbs, found variables and drew 
diagrams of the human heart. 

Evenings, the round kitchen table, 
lit by a low Dutch lamp, summoned 
poets, players, horsethieves, to glasses 
of jenever. An incense of gossip rose 
slowly, blackening the walls. Outside, 
horses pawed the darkness, breathing 
delicate feathers of ice. We courted 
the favors of spiders, mice and moles. 

Our words grew small and porous as 
fossiled bones, our gestures groaned 
with the cold. The will-less world of 
water, wood and stone taught us when 
to yield. When it came time to move 
along again, we were four strangers 
waving at each other, in slow motion, 
across a deafening expanse of ocean.





Casanova's Bossa Nova
 

The dance shoes, seduction 
and coercion, owned by male feet, 
roam floors that beg for chandeliers. 
In search of flat-footed beauty 

and a bed, where ever they might be, 
the handsome conversation attracts 
female followers trading on the smiles 
of curves. The next steps are dizzying 

and leave dresses dipped and hung over 
with a purse and heart opened at 
their tops. The wallflowers can't say 
when the tango with the rag doll began, 

but witnesses toasted a conga line 
of would-be brides that transcend 
a retirement community in Florida, 
each giving up their precious moments 

on Earth to fandango's flimflam.





Dear Mr. Merrill,
 

I hope you'll pardon the informality   
of this letter, postmarked Olympia   
(Greece, not Washington), its task not simple:   
crossing lines you've crossed, time, mortality,   
to find you, who spent a lifetime crossing lines   
out, twisting, polishing them to shine   

cool and lustrous as the statue I fell in   
love with yesterday. I'm sure you saw him   
too, that perfect Hermes by Praxitelis,   
full lips, hips contrapposto. I wished to draw him   
down, latter-day Pygmalion, and embrace   
him. Or barring Eros (and the guards) I'd trace   

his face, the supple muscle of the marble.   
I had a student who resembled him--   
yes, Angelos--arrogant and beautiful.   
I never touched him though he touches me in dreams.   
Eros dangles his perfection in our faces   
like one-armed Hermes with his promise of the grapes.   

I was certain I'd dream of him last night.   
Instead I dreamed another in the growing chain   
of others with whom it ended not quite   
right. But the thirst was perfect, if its price pain   
and shattered crystal, spilling wine, all part   
and parcel of our imperfect lives. Then Art   

startles out of heartache, marble or page.   
You learned this long ago. Now I too see   
the wildest things require the strongest cages,   
the panther's double bars, or the seeds,   
bloodysweet and bitter, in the pomegranate's   
rind. Love held tight in a sonnet.





For Micha's Mother, Who Signs
 

It is not poetry you fear, but poets, 
their indelible brand 
of words. How will your daughter 
escape the mark men hanged 
young women for in Salem? 
I am nothing more than a teacher, 
like you. See, I have removed 
my shoes and socks. I am rolling 
my trousers above my ankles. 
No cloven hooves. Long feet and toes 
like you and your beautiful daughter. 

It is language that has won 
her over, earth-bound words 
walking orderly across the page 
like children holding to 
the rope attached to your wrist, 
teacher and students 
traversing the noisy street 
at the crosswalk, with the light 
of your fingers composing 
the line your children read, 
each syllable's afterimage trailing 
your quick passage of hands 
conducting the boys and girls 
safely from one curb to the other.





Silent Film
 

Doors opened and shut,   
the director shouted orders   
through a bullhorn,   
or babbled just   
                              out of the frame.   
A carpenter hammered flats nearby   
for the next production.   
All of this, and more,   
while the actors blocked it out,   
already living   
in that small square of light   
where silence reigned   
like a tiny theatre for the deaf.   

Now, almost a century later,   
it's peaceful, far   
from the center of action,   
the last voice on the street   
reduced to a whisper,   
                              then gone.   
Not even birdsong   
as evening's opening credits   
begin to roll.   

Only the film,   
shimmering out of a disc   
thinner than sound,   
characters moving   
like fish in their gray element--   
less than fish--   
not a hiss, not a bubble,   
not even a cry   
from that dim world of silence   
doubled by time.





Memorial Service
 

Forgiving the living is hard 
enough, shrugging away all the wounds 
delivered with kisses and curses, 
the thousand and one petty slights 
that bled me to an albino shade, 
that shadow me even in dreams. 

But the dead are altogether 
another matter, not easily to be 
enlightened and quite beyond regretting 
anything (as far as we can tell) 
and most likely indifferent to 
our common currency of tears. 

And so it is that pissing on your grave 
doesn't please me as much as it ought to. 
Now that you have passed beyond 
all blaming and shaming, what can I do 
but rise and proclaim sincere admiration 
when my turn comes around to speak?





Body and Soul
 

They grow up together 
but they aren't even fraternal 

twins, they quarrel a lot 
about where to go and what 

to do, the body complains 
about having to carry 

the soul everywhere as if 
it were some helpless cripple, 

and the soul snipes that it can go 
places the body never dreamed of, 

then they quarrel over which one of them 
does the dreaming, but the truth is, 

they can't live without each other and 
they both know it, anima, animosity, 

the diaphragm pumps like a bellows 
and the soul pulls out all the stops-- 

sings at the top of its lungs, laughs 
at its little jokes, it would like 

to think it has the upper hand 
and can leave whenever it wants-- 

but only as long as it knows 
the door will be unlocked 

when it sneaks back home before 
the sun comes up, and when the body 

says where have you been, the soul 
says, with a smirk, I was at the end 

of my tether, and it was, like a diver 
on the ocean floor or an astronaut 

admiring the view from outside 
the mother ship, and like them 

it would be lost without its air 
supply and protective clothing, 

the body knows that and begins 
to hum, I get along without you 

very well, and   the soul says, Listen 
to that, you can't sing worth a lick 

without me, they'll go on bickering 
like this until death do them part-- 

and then, even if the soul seems to float 
above the body for a moment, 

like a flame above a candle, pinch 
the wick and it disappears.





Subject To Change
 

A reflection on my students
They are so beautiful, and so very young 
they seem almost to glitter with perfection, 
these creatures that I briefly move among. 

I never get to stay with them for long, 
but even so, I view them with affection: 
they are so beautiful, and so very young. 

Poised or clumsy, placid or high-strung, 
they're expert in the art of   introspection, 
these creatures that I briefly move among-- 

And if their words don't quite trip   off the tongue 
consistently, with just the right inflection, 
they remain beautiful. And very young. 

Still, I have to tell myself it's   wrong 
to think of them as anything but fiction, 
these creatures that I briefly move   among-- 

Because, like me, they're traveling   headlong 
in that familiar, vertical direction 
that coarsens beautiful, blackmails young-- 
the two delusions we all move among.





Rogue Russets
 

Surprised by a frill of white flower 
where I'd never planted an eye, 
I decided to fence it with sticks 

and let the renegade live 
in undoctored soil where the garden 
gave way to volunteer poplars 

and acidic white pine. Why not? 
After all, away from the tribe, 
in clay where beetles drill 

and weeds emerge inspired, 
it might grow eccentric, proliferate 
and thrive. 
                When autumn air 

said disinter, to fill the bin 
for winter, I troweled under 
and pulled the stem 

until a rabble of rough spuds 
red as Etruscan urns emerged 
as if to prove 

that whatever urge drove 
the rogue to sow itself and strive 
beyond all cultivation 

might offer a vital lesson 
to any apostate instinct 
aspiring to survive.





Searchers
 

We gave our dogs a button to sniff,   
or a tissue, and they bounded off   
confident in their training,   
in the power of their senses   
to recreate the body,   

but after eighteen hours in rubble   
where even steel was pulverized   
they curled on themselves   
and stared up at us   
and in their soft huge eyes   
we saw mirrored the longing for death:   

then we had to beg a stranger   
to be a victim and crouch   
behind a girder, and let the dogs   
discover him and tug him   
proudly, with suppressed yaps,   
back to Command and the rows   
of empty triage tables.   

But who will hide from us?   
Who will keep digging for us   
here in the cloud of ashes?





In Rubble
 

Right after the bomb, even before the ceiling 
   And walls and floor are rearranging 
      You and themselves into a different world, 
You must hold still, must wait for them 
   To settle down in unpredictable ways, 
      To bring their wars, shuddering, 
To an end, and only then should you begin 
   Numbly to feel what freedom may be left 
      To your feet or knees, to your elbows 
Or clenched fingers. Where you used to walk 
   Or lean or lie down or fix your attention 
      At a whim or stomp your foot 
Or slump in a chair, you'll find a new 
   Architecturally unsound floor-plan 
      To contend with, if you can move 
At all. Now you may remember others 
   Who were somewhere near you before 
      This breakdown of circumstances. Caught by surprise 
Like you, they may be waiting separately 
   At their own levels, inside their own portions 
      Of your incoherent flat. They may be thinking 
Of you, as you are of them, and wondering 
   Whether some common passageway, no matter 
      How crooked or narrow, might still exist 
Between you, through which you might share the absence 
   Of food and water and the cold comfort 
      Of daylight. They may be expecting you 
To arrive at any moment, to crawl through dust 
   And fire to their rescue as they find their bodies 
      Growing more stiff, assuming even more 
Unusual attitudes at every turn 
   Of a second hand, at every sound 
      Of a bell or an alarm, at every pounding 
Of a door or a heart, so if you can't reach them 
   Now and they can't reach you, remember, please 
      Remember, whatever you say, 
Whatever you hear or keep to yourself, whatever 
   You scream or whisper, will need to make 
      Some kind of sense, perhaps for days and days.





Thinking About the Enemy
 

In the beginning we could hear their swords cutting jewels 
From the protected orchard while our children heard fine teeth 
Dragging along empty granary floors. Between us and them 
Stands the great wound, swallowing all tears, all voices. 

Transfixed or transformed by this pain? We never know because 
Who can slip through the gate without throwing a shadow 
Toward both the past and present? Fire, flood, famine-- 
All we've wished upon them a thousand times, still they inch 

Back and taunt us with their persistence. We track them down 
To a quick end. More come. And the old memories grow new. 
The future seems already written with a pen of iron. The book 
Unreadable, immense. The enemy has become our masterpiece.





Judged Worth Evacuating
 

d





Update on the Last Judgment
 

          
          There will be no deafening noise. No hornblow of thunder. 
 The small plants of the earth will not tremble on the hillside as grace is prepared. 
 The sky will neither drown us in its plenty, nor the ground crack and consume feet in its hunger. 
 No, bodies will not, in their last rags of flesh, creep from under the earth, and with breath once torn from them, choke and expel the old mud of the world. 
 Adam and Eve, incredulous, will not embrace again in their poverty, not knowing whether to shield themselves, or to emerge shameless from the past's shadow, astonished to again greet Terra Firma. 
 The book of the world, encrusted with deep-sea pearls and the blood of the lamb, will not open up its pages in which all deeds have been inscribed. 
 And the totality of history will not roll back together, all events fusing, once and for all, into the great blazing sphere of time. 
 None will sit on the right hand. There will be no right hand. 
 And the figure of sorrow and grace, with his staff upright, its purple pennant caught in that final wind, will not be there to greet us, with the mercy of justice in his eyes. 
 No, never judgment. Just the abyss into which all acts are thrown down, and the terrible white silence in which judgment either endures or burns.
        




Writing in the Afterlife
 

I imagined the atmosphere would be clear, 

shot with pristine light, 

not this sulphurous haze, 

the air ionized as before a thunderstorm. 


Many have pictured a river here, 

but no one mentioned all the boats, 

their benches crowded with naked passengers, 

each bent over a writing tablet. 


I knew I would not always be a child 

with a model train and a model tunnel, 

and I knew I would not live forever, 

jumping all day through the hoop of myself. 


I had heard about the journey to the other side 

and the clink of the final coin 

in the leather purse of the man holding the oar, 

but how could anyone have guessed 


that as soon as we arrived 

we would be asked to describe this place 

and to include as much detail as possible-- 

not just the water, he insists, 


rather the oily, fathomless, rat-happy water, 

not simply the shackles, but the rusty, 

iron, ankle-shredding shackles-- 

and that our next assignment would be 


to jot down, off the tops of our heads, 

our thoughts and feelings about being dead, 

not really an assignment, 

the man rotating the oar keeps telling us-- 


think of it more as an exercise, he groans, 

think of writing as a process, 

a never-ending, infernal process, 

and now the boats have become jammed together, 


bow against stern, stern locked to bow, 

and not a thing is moving, only our diligent pens.





"I have been a stranger in a strange land
 

Life's spell is so exquisite, everything conspires to break it.   Emily Dickinson
It wasn't bliss. What was bliss   
but the ordinary life? She'd spend hours   
in patter, moving through whole days   
touching, sniffing, tasting . . . exquisite   
housekeeping in a charmed world.   
And yet there was always   

more of the same, all that happiness,   
the aimless Being There.   
So she wandered for a while, bush to arbor,   
lingered to look through a pond's restive mirror.   
He was off cataloging the universe, probably,   
pretending he could organize   
what was clearly someone else's chaos.   

That's when she found the tree,   
the dark, crabbed branches   
bearing up such speechless bounty,   
she knew without being told   
this was forbidden. It wasn't   
a question of ownership--   
who could lay claim to   
such maddening perfection?   

And there was no voice in her head,   
no whispered intelligence lurking   
in the leaves--just an ache that grew   
until she knew she'd already lost everything   
except desire, the red heft of it   
warming her outstretched palm.





A Momentary Longing To Hear Sad Advice from One Long Dead
 

Who was my teacher at Harvard. Did not wear overcoat 
Saying to me as we walked across the Yard 
Cold brittle autumn is you should be wearing overcoat. I said 
You are not wearing overcoat. He said, 
You should do as I say not do as I do. 
Just how American it was and how late Forties it was 
Delmore, but not I, was probably aware. He quoted Finnegans Wake to me 
In his New York apartment sitting on chair 
Table directly in front of him. There did he write? I am wondering. 
Look at this photograph said of his mother and father. 
Coney Island. Do they look happy? He couldn't figure it out. 
Believed Pogo to be at the limits of our culture. 
Pogo. Walt Kelly must have read Joyce Delmore said. 
Why don't you ask him? 
Why don't you ask Walt Kelly if he read Finnegans Wake or not. 
Your parents don't look happy but it is just a photograph. 
Maybe they felt awkward posing for photographs. 
Maybe it is just a bad photograph. Delmore is not listening 
I want to hear him tell me something sad but however true. 
Delmore in his tomb is sitting. People say yes everyone is dying 
But here read this happy book on the subject. Not Delmore. Not that rueful man.





Last Days
 

We visit by phone as the morphine haze   
retreats, late afternoon, most days.   
Our mingled past is set against the pin-   
hole lights of cars cruising the blacked-out streets:   

we four in the college smoker popping No-Doz,   
honors students carrying heavy course loads   
tipped sideways by sex, one by one discarding   
our virginities on the altar of inverse pride,   

ironing our blouses with Peter Pan collars   
to wear on dates with those 90-day Wonders,   
ensigns in training for the Second World War   
in the Business School across the Charles River. 

We called ourselves the Unholy Four.   
Whenever any three of us met on campus   
we huddled to bray Austria! Russia! Prussia! 
in unison. It came out sounding like Horseshit! 

Post graduation one year, look at us:   
my new husband atop your even newer   
one's car singing the bawdy verses   
of "Roll Me Over" in a drunken tenor   

while the scandalized uncles and aunties   
--it wasn't enough that you'd wed a Chinese--   
wrung their hands. You drove off   
trailing Just Married in two languages.   

Now BJ is gone, and Hettie. You have, they say,   
only days. It is my plan to go with you   
as far as the border. I've been that far--   
Did I come back from there morally improved?   

Somehow better equipped to support you   
this side of the douane and wave,   
your two cats curled like commas beside you   
as the barrier lifts and you drive on through?





To the Blank Spaces
 

For longer than by now I can believe 

I assumed that you had nothing to do 

with each other I thought you had arrived 

                  whenever that had been 


more solitary than single snowflakes 

with no acquaintance or understanding 

running among you guiding your footsteps 

                  somewhere ahead of me 


in your own time oh white lakes on the maps 

that I copied and gaps on the paper 

for the names that were to appear in them 

                  sometimes a doorway or 


window sometimes an eye sometimes waking 

without knowing the place in the whole night 

I might have guessed from the order in which 

                  you turned up before me 


and from the way I kept looking at you 

as though I recognized something in you 

that you were all words out of one language 

                  tracks of the same creature





White-Eyes
 

In winter 
    all the singing is in 
         the tops of the trees 
             where the wind-bird 

with its white eyes 
    shoves and pushes 
         among the branches. 
             Like any of us 

he wants to go to sleep, 
    but he's restless-- 
         he has an idea, 
             and slowly it unfolds 

from under his beating wings 
    as long as he stays awake. 
         But his big, round music, after all, 
             is too breathy to last. 

So, it's over. 
    In the pine-crown 
         he makes his nest, 
             he's done all he can. 

I don't know the name of this bird, 
    I only imagine his glittering beak 
         tucked in a white wing 
             while the clouds-- 

which he has summoned 
    from the north-- 
         which he has taught 
             to be mild, and silent-- 

thicken, and begin to fall 
    into the world below 
         like stars, or the feathers 
               of some unimaginable bird 

that loves us, 
    that is asleep now, and silent-- 
         that has turned itself 
             into snow.





Paschal
 

Easter was the old North   
Goddess of the dawn.   
She rises daily in the East   
And yearly in spring for the great   

Paschal candle of the sun.   
Her name lingers like a spot   
Of gravy in the figured vestment   
Of the language of the Britains.   

Her totem the randy bunny.   
Our very Thursdays and Wednesdays   
Are stained by syllables of thunder   
And Woden's frenzy.   

O my fellow-patriots loyal to this   
Our modern world of high heels,   
Vaccination, brain surgery--   
May they pass over us, the old   

Jovial raptors, Apollonian flayers,   
Embodiments. Egg-hunt,   
Crucifixion. Supper of encrypted   
Dishes: bitter, unrisen, a platter   

Compass of martyrdom,   
Ground-up apples and walnuts   
In sweet wine to embody mortar   
Of affliction, babies for bricks.   

Legible traces of the species   
That devises the angel of death   
Sailing over our doorpost   
Smeared with sacrifice.





Autumn Sky
 

In my great grandmother's time,   
All one needed was a broom   
To get to see places   
And give the geese a chase in the sky.   

                

The stars know everything,   
So we try to read their minds.   
As distant as they are,   
We choose to whisper in their presence.   

                

Oh Cynthia,   
Take a clock that has lost its hands   
For a ride.   
Get me a room at Hotel Eternity   
Where Time likes to stop now and then.   

                

Come, lovers of dark corners,   
The sky says,   
And sit in one of my dark corners.   
There are tasty little zeroes   
In the peanut dish tonight.





Pacemaker
 

I   

"One Snodgrass, two Snodgrass, three Snodgrass, four . . . 
       I took my own rollcall when I counted seconds;   
"One two three, Two two three, Three . . .," the drum score   
       Showed only long rests to the tympani's entrance.   

"Oh-oh-oh leff; leff; leff-toh-righ-toh-leff,"   
       The sergeant cadenced us footsore recruits;   
The heart, poor drummer, gone lame, deaf,   
       Then AWOL, gets frogmarched to the noose.   

II   

Old coots, at the Veterans', might catch breath   
       If their cheeks got slapped by a nurse's aide,   
Then come back to life; just so, at their birth,   
       Young rumps had been tendered warm accolades.   

The kick-ass rude attitude, smart-assed insult,   
       The acid-fueled book review just might shock   
Us back to the brawl like smelling salts,   
       Might sting the lulled heart up off its blocks.   

III   

I thought I'd always favor rubato   
       Or syncopation, scorning fixed rhythms;   
               Thought my old heartthrobs could stand up to stress;   
Believed one's bloodpump should skip a few beats   
       If it fell into company with sleek young women;   
               Believed my own bruit could beat with the best.   

Wrong again, Snodgrass! This new gold gadget,   
       Snug as the watch on my wife's warm wrist,   
               Drives my pulsetempo near twice its old pace--   
Go, nonstop startwatch! Go, clockwork rabbit,   
       Keeping this lame old dog synchronized,   
               Steady, sparked up, still in the race.





For a Student Sleeping in a Poetry Workshop
 

I've watched his eyelids sag, spring open 
   Vaguely and gradually go sliding 
      Shut again, fly up 
With a kind of drunken surprise, then wobble 
   Peacefully together to send him 
      Home from one school early. Soon his lashes 
Flutter in REM sleep. I suppose he's dreaming 
   What all of us kings and poets and peasants 
      Have dreamed: of not making the grade, 
Of draining the inexhaustible horn cup 
   Of the cerebral cortex where ganglions 
      Are ganging up on us with more connections 
Than atoms in heaven, but coming up once more 
   Empty. I see a clear stillness 
      Settle over his face, a calming of the surface 
Of water when the wind dies. Somewhere 
   Down there, he's taking another course 
      Whose resonance (let's hope) resembles 
The muttered thunder, the gutter bowling, the lightning 
   Of minor minions of Thor, the groans and gurgling 
      Of feral lovers and preliterate Mowglis, the songs 
Of shamans whistled through bird bones. A worried neighbor 
   Gives him the elbow, and he shudders 
      Awake, recollects himself, brings back 
His hands from aboriginal outposts, 
   Takes in new light, reorganizes his shoes, 
      Stands up in them at the buzzer, barely recalls 
His books and notebooks, meets my eyes 
   And wonders what to say and whether to say it, 
      Then keeps it to himself as today's lesson.





Scrabble with Matthews
 

Jerboa on a triple: I was in for it,   
my zither on a double looking feeble   

as a "promising" first book. Oedipal & reckless,   
my scheme would fail: keep him a couple drinks   

ahead, & perhaps the muse would smile   
upon me with some ses or some blanks.   

January, Vermont: snowflakes teased the windows   
of the Burlington airport bar. The waitress   

tallied tips & channel-surfed above the amber   
stutter of the snowplow's light: it couldn't   

keep up, either. Visibility to zero, nothing taking off   
& his dulcimer before me (50 bonus points   

for "bingos") like a cautionary tale. The night   
before I'd been his warm up act,   

the audience of expensive preppies   
doubling to twenty when he shambled   

to the podium to give them Martial   
& his then-new poems. "Why do you write   

something nobody reads anymore?" queried one   
little trust fund in a blazer. "Because   

I'm willing to be honestly confused   
& honestly fearful." Il miglior fabbro,   

a.k.a. Prez: sweet & fitting honorifics he has left   
upon the living's lips. Sweet & fitting too   

that I could know the poems much better than   
the man, flawed as I am told he was. Connoisseur   

of word-root & amphibrach, of Coltrane   
solo & of California reds, of box score & Horatian loss,   

his garrulousness formidable & masking   
a shyness I could never penetrate, meeting him   

would always find me tongue-tied,   
minding my ps & qs, the latter of which   

I could not play, failing three times to draw a u.   
The dead care nothing for our eulogies:   

he wrote this many times & well.   
& yet I pray his rumpled daimonion 

shall guide our letters forward   
as they wend the snow-white notebook leaves,   

the stanzas scrolling down the laptop screens.   
Game after game & the snow labored on.   

Phalanx, bourboned whiteout & the board aglow   
as he'd best me again & again. Qintar 

& prosody, the runway lights enshrouded   
& the wind, endquote, shook the panes.





Your Luck Is About To Change
 

(A fortune cookie) 
Ominous inscrutable Chinese news 
to get just before Christmas, 
considering my reasonable health, 
marriage spicy as moo-goo-gai-pan, 
career running like a not-too-old Chevrolet. 
Not bad, considering what can go wrong: 
the bony finger of Uncle Sam 
might point out my husband, 
my own national guard, 
and set him in Afghanistan; 
my boss could take a personal interest; 
the pain in my left knee could spread to my right. 
Still, as the old year tips into the new, 
I insist on the infant hope, gooing and kicking 
his legs in the air. I won't give in 
to the dark, the sub-zero weather, the fog,
or even the neighbors' Nativity. 
Their four-year-old has arranged 
his whole legion of dinosaurs 
so they, too, worship the child, 
joining the cow and sheep. Or else, 
ultimate mortals, they've come to eat 
ox and camel, Mary and Joseph, 
then savor the newborn babe.





Body
 

Map of terror and pleasure, 
ardent junk, passionate congress 
filled with the arguments of chemicals, 

Echo chamber for the fanatical cries 
of stubborn generations, all the quaint invisibles 
death has grown a beard on, 

labyrinth of desire, playing field of impulse, 
factory where decay's silent armies clock in, 
philosopher-clown blowing a horn at each epiphany. 

Washed by the rough nurse of morning, 
wheeled into the ward of the afternoon, 
feeds, grateful, on the rich broth of dusk. 

Reads the erratic cards of dreams, 
turns on the rack of insomnia, 
steals the two-bit grace of sleep. 

Loses its name in foreign embraces, 
forges a passport to the country of   tenderness, 
gestures like a child at the thing that it   wants, 
opaque from its own breath on the glass.





Faith
 

For Ira
With the seal of science 

emblazoned 

on your forehead, 

like the old Good Housekeeping 

Seal of Approval, 

I believe what you tell me 

about cells and molecules, 

though I can't see them. 


And though the language you speak 

is full of numbers and symbols 

I'll never understand; 

though your tie is askew 

and your hair unruly, still I believe 

what you say about the size of the universe, 

which is either expanding or contracting, 

I've forgotten which already. 


So if tomorrow you tell me 

you made a small miscalculation, 

that God indeed created the world 

in 6 short days, then rested on the 7th, 

that it was Eve who landed us 

in all this trouble, I would believe you. 

I would believe you 

as I've always done before.





Crossing the Days
 

My son's been learning time: big hand 
and little, powers of sixty 
and of twenty-four, the slow semaphore 
of days. He's brought home paper plates 
from kindergarten, arrows pointing 
at his favorite hours. So far 
the face of every clock has smiled. 

And before we read to sleep each night 
he crosses off another square 
on the calendar above his bed, 
counting down to Christmas or to nothing 
in particular, sometimes just a line 
he draws uphill or down, check marks 
like the ones his teacher leaves 

on sheets he's filled with capitals 
and lower cases, other times a pair 
of thick lines like the crossed bones 
on a pirate's flag, an X 
as if to mark the treasure buried 
in some ordinary week, 
no day yet a cross to bear.





The Lake
 

Day and night, the lake dreams of sky. 
A privacy as old as the mountains 
And her up there, stuck among peaks. The   whole eye 

Fastened on hawk, gatherings of cloud or stars, 
So little trespass. An airplane once 
Crossed her brow; she searched but could not find 

A face. Having lived with such strict beauty 
She comes to know how the sun is nothing 
But itself and the path it throws; the moon 

A riddled stone. If only a hand 
Would tremble along her cheek, would disturb. Even the elk 
Pass by, drawn to the spill of creeks below-- 

How she cannot help abundance, even as it leaves 
Her, as it sings all the way down the mountain.





0
 

Philosophic 
in its complex, ovoid emptiness, 
a skillful pundit coined it as a sort 
       of stopgap doorstop for those 
                     quaint equations 

                     Romans never 
dreamt of. In form completely clever 
and discrete--a mirror come unsilvered, 
       loose watch face without the works, 
                     a hollowed globe 

                     from tip to toe 
unbroken, it evades the grappling 
hooks of mass, tilts the thin rim of no thing, 
      remains embryonic sum, 
                   non-cogito.





My Brother, the Artist, at Seven
 

As a boy he played alone in the fields   
behind our block, six frame houses   
holding six immigrant families,   
the parents speaking only gibberish   
to their neighbors. Without the kids   
they couldn't say "Good morning" and be   
understood. Little wonder   
he learned early to speak to himself,   
to tell no one what truly mattered.   
How much can matter to a kid   
of seven? Everything. The whole world   
can be his. Just after dawn he sneaks   
out to hide in the wild, bleached grasses   
of August and pretends he's grown up,   
someone complete in himself without   
the need for anyone, a warrior   
from the ancient places our fathers   
fled years before, those magic places:   
Kiev, Odessa, the Crimea,   
Port Said, Alexandria, Lisbon,   
the Canaries, Caracas, Galveston.   
In the damp grass he recites the names   
over and over in a hushed voice   
while the sun climbs into the locust tree   
to waken the houses. The husbands leave   
for work, the women return to bed, the kids   
bend to porridge and milk. He advances   
slowly, eyes fixed, an animal or a god,   
while beneath him the earth holds its breath.





Knots & Splices
 

Take hold of the bitter end; 
pass carefully around 
the standing part, 
being mindful of the bight. 
Finish with a round turn, 
make the knot up tight 
and it will not slip under load. 

But you'll find it not 
so easily undone; 
dangerous in the dark and cold 
and wet, when it matters most. 
These knots command allegiances. 

The Turk's head and midshipman's bend, 
the lighterman's hitch and 
the hangman's noose. 
See what names mean: 
Knots are men. 

Facing page--a simple eye-splice. 
Apply a whipping at the end 
so no strands come loose 
in the braid. The knot will hold 
Anything you care to bind.





Dio ed Io
 

There is a heaviness between us,   
Nameless, raised from the void, that counts out the sprung hours.   
What ash has it come to purify?   
What disappearance, like water, does it lift up to the clouds?   

God of my fathers, but not of mine,   
You are a part, it is said, an afterthought, a scattered one.   
There is a disappearance between us as heavy as dirt.   
What figure of earth and clay would it have me become?   

Sunday again, January thaw back big time.   
The knock-kneed, overweight boys and girls   
Sit on the sun-warmed concrete sidewalk outside the pharmacy   
Smoking their dun-filtered cigarettes.   

Nothing is bothering them--and their nicotine dreams--   
This afternoon. Everything's weightless,   
As insubstantial as smoke.   
Nothing is disappearing in their world. Arrival is all.   

There is a picture of Yves Klein leaping out of a window   
Above a cobblestone Paris street.   
A man on a bicycle peddles away toward the distance.   
One of them's you, the other is me.   

Cut out of the doctored photograph, however, the mesh net   
Right under the swan-diving body.   
Cut out of another print, the black-capped, ever-distancing cyclist, as well as the mesh net.   
Hmm . . . And there you have it, two-fingered sleight-of-hand man.   

One loses one's center in the air, trying to stay afloat,   
Doesn't one? Snowfalling metaphors.   
Unbidden tears, the off-size of small apples. Unshed.   
And unshedable.   

Such heaviness. The world has come and lies between us.   
Such distance. Ungraspable.   
Ash and its disappearance--   
Unbearable absence of being,   
                                           Tonto, then taken back.





Dismantling the House
 

Rent a flatbed with a winch. 
With the right leverage 
anything can be hoisted, driven off. 

Or the man with a Bobcat comes in, 
then the hauler with his enormous truck. 
A leveler or a lawyer does the rest; 

experts always are willing to help. 
The structure was old, rotten in spots. 
Hadn't it already begun to implode? 

Believe you've just sped the process up. 
Photographs, toys, the things that break 
your heart--let's trust 

they would have been removed, 
perhaps are safe with the children 
who soon will have children of their own. 

It's over. It's time for loss to build 
its tower in the yard where you 
are merely a spectator now. 

Admit you'd like to find something 
discarded or damaged, even gone, 
and lift it back into the world.





Ever After
 

What am I to you now that you are no   
longer what you used to be to me?   

Who are we to each other now that   
there is no us, now that what we once   

were is divided into me and you   
who are not one but two separate and   

unrelated persons except for that ex-   
that goes in front of the words   

that used to mean me, used to mean   
you, words we rarely used (husband, wife)   

as when we once posed (so young and helpless)   
with our hands (yours, mine) clasped on the knife   

that was sinking into the tall white cake.   
All that sweetness, the layers of one thing

and then another, and then one thing again.





Shell
 

I found it in the wash, the orange 
shell I picked up on the beach 
that last time. One of my girls-- 
the one named after you-- 

must have found it in my room 
and wanted it. Clean calcareous 
curve, a palm open to nothing, 
reeking of sunshine 

and your death. For years 
I didn't know what to do with it. 
You would have liked 
this story: how a child 

slips grief into a careless pocket. 
Breaks it to pieces. Lets it go.





Reverie in Open Air
 

I acknowledge my status as a stranger:   
Inappropriate clothes, odd habits   
Out of sync with wasp and wren.   
I admit I don't know how   
To sit still or move without purpose.   
I prefer books to moonlight, statuary to trees.   

But this lawn has been leveled for looking,   
So I kick off my sandals and walk its cool green.   
Who claims we're mere muscle and fluids?   
My feet are the primitives here.   
As for the rest--ah, the air now   
Is a tonic of absence, bearing nothing   
But news of a breeze.





The Other Place
 

The leaves had fallen in that sullen place, 
but none around him knew just where they were. 
The sky revealed no sun. A ragged blur 
remained where each man's face had been a face. 

Two angels soon crept forth with trays of bread, 
circling among the lost like prison guards. 
Love is not love, unless its will affords 
forgiveness for the words that are not said. 

Still he could not believe that this was Hell, 
that others sent before him did not know; 
yet, once his name and memory grew faint, 
it was no worse, perhaps, than a cheap motel. 
It is the love of failure makes a saint. 
He stood up then, but did not try to go.





Kindness
 

For Carol Rigolot
  
        When deeds splay before us 
precious as gold & unused chances 
stripped from the whine-bone, 
we know the moment kindheartedness 
walks in. Each praise be 
echoes us back as the years uncount 
themselves, eating salt. Though blood 
first shaped us on the climbing wheel, 
the human mind lit by the savanna's 
ice star & thistle rose, 
your knowing gaze enters a room 
& opens the day, 
saying we were made for fun. 
Even the bedazzled brute knows 
when sunlight falls through leaves 
across honed knives on the table. 
If we can see it push shadows 
aside, growing closer, are we less 
broken? A barometer, temperature 
gauge, a ruler in minus fractions 
& pedigrees, a thingmajig, 
a probe with an all-seeing eye, 
what do we need to measure 
kindness, every unheld breath, 
every unkind leapyear? 
Sometimes a sober voice is enough 
to calm the waters & drive away 
the false witnesses, saying, Look, 
here are the broken treaties Beauty 
brought to us earthbound sentinels.





Glory
 

Pindar, poet of the victories, fitted names   
And legends into verses for the chorus to sing:   
Names recalled now only in the poems of Pindar:   

O nearly unpronounceable immortals,   
In the dash, Oionos was champion:   
Oionos, Likmynios's son, who came from Midea.   
In wrestling, Echemos won--the name   
Of his home city, Tegea, proclaimed to the crowds.   
Doryklos of Tiryns won the prize in boxing,   
And the record for a four-horse team was set   
By Samos from Mantinea, Halirothios's son.   

And Pindar, poet of the Olympian and Isthmian   
And Pythian games, wrote also of the boundless   
And forgetful savannas of time. What is someone? 
The chorus sing in a victory ode--What is a nobody? 

Creatures of a day, they chant in answer, Creatures   
Of a day. So where is the godgiven glory Pindar says   
Settles on mortals?--Bright as gold among the substances,   
Say the chorus, paramount as water among the elements.   

Not in the victory itself, petty or great,   
Of rich young Greeks contending in games.   
Not in the poetry itself, with its forgotten dances   
And Pindar spinning among tiresome or stirring   
Myths and genealogies, the chanted names   
Of cities and invoked gods and dignitaries--   

Striving, O nearly unpronounceable athletes,   
To animate the air with dancing feet raising   
A golden pollen of dust: a pervasive blur   
Of seedlets in the sunlight, whirling--beyond mere   
Victory or applause or performance,   
As victory is beyond defeat.   

The one who threw the javelin furthest   
Sang the chorus, chanting Pindar's incantation   
Against envy and oblivion, was Phrastor.   
And when Nikeus grunting whirled the stone   
Into the air and it flew past the marks   
Of all the competitors, Nikeus's countrymen   
Shouted his name after it, Nikeus,   
Nikeus, and the syllables so say the lines Pindar   
Composed for the sweating chorus to chant--radiated   
For a spell like the silvery mirror of the moon.





Who Steals My Good Name
 

For the person who obtained my debit card number and spent $11,000 in five days
My pale stepdaughter, just off the school bus,   
Scowled, "Well, that's the last time I say my name's   
Snodgrass!" Just so, may that anonymous   
Mexican male who prodigally claims   

My clan lines, identity and the sixteen   
Digits that unlock my bank account,   
Think twice. That less than proper name's been   
Taken by three ex-wives, each for an amount   

Past all you've squandered, each more than pleased   
To change it back. That surname you affect   
May have more consequence than getting teased   
By dumb kids or tracked down by bank detectives.   

Don't underrate its history: one of ours played   
Piano on his prison's weekly broadcast;   
One got rich on a scammed quiz show; one made   
A bungle costing the World Series. My own past   

Could subject you to guilt by association:   
If you write anything more than false checks,   
Abandon all hope of large press publication   
Or prizes--critics shun the name like sex 

Without a condom. Whoever steals my purse   
Helps chain me to my writing desk again   
For fun and profit. So take thanks with my curse:   
May your pen name help send you to your pen.





What I Know About Epistemology
 

As the light goes, go. 
Be the rustling in the grass, the fall from 
convention's good graces: learn, or someone 
will have you filing files or writing writs, 
demonstrating cutlery or selling knowledge 

door to door; someone might even drop 
your lovely life into a factory and have you 
derusting rings on the coolant-spouting 
turntable of a vertical lathe. 
It's best for everyone that what you know 

is generally thought of as general knowledge. 
You can find it in pool rooms and roadside bars, 
in meadows as inviting as beds, in bedrooms 
where it whispers like a ribbon untying; 
you can even find it in schools. But be careful: 

it's dangerous, inescapable and exact 
down to every atom of everything there is, 
to every name each thing goes by and every 
law each thing obeys. And the best part is, 
you always know more than you know.





Worms
 

Aren't you glad at least that the earthworms   
Under the grass are ignorant, as they eat the earth,   
Of the good they confer on us, that their silence   
Isn't a silent reproof for our bad manners,   
Our never casting earthward a crumb of thanks   
For their keeping the soil from packing so tight   
That no root, however determined, could pierce it?   

Imagine if they suspected how much we owe them,   
How the weight of our debt would crush us   
Even if they enjoyed keeping the grass alive,   
The garden flowers and vegetables, the clover,   
And wanted nothing that we could give them,   
Not even the merest nod of acknowledgment.   
A debt to angels would be easy in comparison,   
Bright, weightless creatures of cloud, who serve   
An even brighter and lighter master.   

Lucky for us they don't know what they're doing,   
These puny anonymous creatures of dark and damp   
Who eat simply to live, with no more sense of mission   
Than nature feels in providing for our survival.   
Better save our gratitude for a friend   
Who gives us more than we can give in return   
And never hints she's waiting for reciprocity.   

"If I had nickel, I'd give it to you,"   
The lover says, who, having nothing available   
In the solid, indicative world, scrapes up   
A coin or two in the world of the subjunctive.   
"A nickel with a hole drilled in the top   
So you can fasten it to your bracelet, a charm   
To protect you against your enemies."   

For his sake, she'd wear it, not for her own,   
So he might believe she's safe as she saunters   
Home across the field at night, the moon above her,   
Below her the loam, compressed by the soles of her loafers,   
And the tunneling earthworms, tireless, silent,   
As they persist, oblivious, in their service.





A Dog's Life
 

A stay of execution: one last day, 
your day, old Everydog, then, as they say, 
or as we say (a new trick to avoid 
finalities implicit in destroyed), 
you have to be put down, or put to sleep-- 
the very dog who, once, would fight to keep 
from putting down, despite our shouts, a shoe 
until he gnawed it to the sole, and who 
would sit up, through our sleepless nights, to bark 
away some menace looming in the dark. 

Can you pick up the sense of all this talk? 
Or do you still just listen for a walk, 
or else, the ultimate reward, a car?-- 
My God, tomorrow's ride . . . Well, here we are, 
right now. You stare at me and wag your tail. 
I stare back, dog-like, big and dumb. Words fail. 
No more commands, ignore my monologue, 
go wander off. Good dog. You're a good dog. 
And you could never master, anyway, 
the execution, as it were, of Stay





Actaeon
 

The hounds, you know them all by name. 
You fostered them from purblind whelps 
At their dam's teats, and you have come 
To know the music of their yelps: 

High-strung Anthee, the brindled bitch, 
The blue-tick coated Philomel, 
And freckled Chloe, who would fetch 
A pretty price if you would sell-- 

All fleet of foot, and swift to scent, 
Inexorable once on the track, 
Like angry words you might have meant, 
But do not mean, and can't take back. 

There was a time when you would brag 
How they would bay and rend apart 
The hopeless belling from a stag. 
You falter now for the foundered hart. 

Desires you nursed of a winter night-- 
Did you know then why you bred them-- 
Whose needling milk-teeth used to bite 
The master's hand that leashed and fed them?





Eating Together
 

I know my friend is going, 
though she still sits there 
across from me in the restaurant,   
and leans over the table to dip 
her bread in the oil on my plate; I know   
how thick her hair used to be,   
and what it takes for her to discard 
her man's cap partway through our meal,   
to look straight at the young waiter   
and smile when he asks 
how we are liking it. She eats 
as though starving--chicken, dolmata,   
the buttery flakes of filo-- 
and what's killing her 
eats, too. I watch her lift 
a glistening black olive and peel   
the meat from the pit, watch 
her fine long fingers, and her face,   
puffy from medication. She lowers   
her eyes to the food, pretending 
not to know what I know. She's going.   
And we go on eating.





Draft of a Dream
 

The message I found on the Post-it note 
went thus: love truth; expect to be found out. 
Kid-style capitals proved I wrote it, but 
left no clue why I'd swelled into a fat 

clause no editor could edit; then, an entry 
on a shrink's list of patient slang for sex-- 
her desk Norwegian teak, the mug of tea 
on which she had affixed her Post-it notes 

hot against her knuckle, their lips of stickum 
loosening . . . And yet, I knew the note 
to peel away at hour's end would terminate 
our sessions--cool as the draft her linen 

skirt was lifting to: Love, just stay benighted,  
given everything I know you've got to hide. 





Cozy Apologia
 

For Fred
I could pick anything and think of you--   
This lamp, the wind-still rain, the glossy blue   
My pen exudes, drying matte, upon the page.   
I could choose any hero, any cause or age   
And, sure as shooting arrows to the heart,   
Astride a dappled mare, legs braced as far apart   
As standing in silver stirrups will allow--   
There you'll be, with furrowed brow   
And chain mail glinting, to set me free:   
One eye smiling, the other firm upon the enemy.   

This post-postmodern age is all business: compact disks   
And faxes, a do-it-now-and-take-no-risks   
Event. Today a hurricane is nudging up the coast,   
Oddly male: Big Bad Floyd, who brings a host   
Of daydreams: awkward reminiscences   
Of teenage crushes on worthless boys   
Whose only talent was to kiss you senseless.   
They all had sissy names--Marcel, Percy, Dewey;   
Were thin as licorice and as chewy,   
Sweet with a dark and hollow center. Floyd's   

Cussing up a storm. You're bunkered in your   
Aerie, I'm perched in mine   
(Twin desks, computers, hardwood floors):   
We're content, but fall short of the Divine.   
Still, it's embarrassing, this happiness--   
Who's satisfied simply with what's good for us,   
When has the ordinary ever been news?   
And yet, because nothing else will do   
To keep me from melancholy (call it blues),   
I fill this stolen time with you.





An Equation for My Children
 

It may be esoteric and perverse 
 That I consult Pythagoras to hear 
 A music tuning in the universe. 
 My interest in his math of star and sphere 
 Has triggered theorems too far-fetched to solve. 
 They don't add up. But if I rack and toil 
 More in ether than a mortal coil, 
 It is to comprehend how you revolve, 
 By formulas of orbit, ellipse, and ring. 

 Dear son and daughter, if I seem to range 
 It is to chart the numbers spiraling 
 Between my life and yours until the strange 
 And seamless beauty of equations click 
 Solutions for the heart's arithmetic.





Mapping the Genome
 

Geneticist as driver, down the gene 
codes in, let's say, a topless coupe 
and you keep expecting bends, 

real tyre-testers on tight 
mountain passes, but instead it's dead 
straight, highway as runway, 

helix unravelled as vista, 
as vanishing point. Keep your foot 
down. This is a finite desert. 

You move too fast to read it, 
the order of the rocks, the cacti, 
roadside weeds, a blur to you. 

Every hour or so, you pass a shack 
which passes for a motel here: 
tidy faded rooms with TVs on 

for company, the owner pacing out 
his empty parking lot. And after 
each motel you hit a sandstorm 

thick as fog, but agony. 
Somewhere out there are remnants 
of our evolution, genes for how 

to fly south, sense a storm, 
hunt at night, how to harden 
your flesh into hide or scales. 

These are the miles of dead code. 
Every desert has them. 
You are on a mission to discover 

why the human heart still slows 
when divers break the surface, 
why mermaids still swim in our dreams.





Frame, An Epistle
 

Most of the things you made for me--blanket- 
chest, lapdesk, the armless rocker--I gave 
away to friends who could use them and not 
be reminded of the hours lost there, 
not having been witness to those designs, 
the tedious finishes. But I did keep 
the mirror, perhaps because like all mirrors, 
most of these years it has been invisible, 
part of the wall, or defined by reflection-- 
safe--because reflection, after all, does change. 
I hung it here in the front, dark hallway 
of this house you will never see, so that 
it might magnify the meager light, 
become a lesser, backward window. No one 
pauses long before it. But this morning, 
as I put on my overcoat, then straightened 
my hair, I saw outside my face its frame 
you made for me, admiring for the first 
time the way the cherry you cut and planed 
yourself had darkened, just as you said it would.





Beside the Broad Dordogne
 

I wake to the sound of water, and think, 
"Mother has died and gone to France," 
She is at un autre htel, speaking French 
better than ever, while I stare at the fog 
that has a river in it--the broad Dordogne, 
making its river noise, as if all the faucets 
have been left on all night. The river 
rushing in one direction only, so different 
from Blackfish Creek, where the sea floods in 
and back, scrubbing the sand both ways. 

Well, one travels so things are different. 
American actors speak French on TV here. 
Last night they showed Accident Catastrophe 
about two babies switched in the hospital at birth. 
One dies. The parents discover the dead child 
was someone else's and their child is alive 
in Florida with son pre, though sa mre 
est morte de some disease, who knows? 

Anyway, Ed Asner, who plays the lawyer, 
speaks gravelly French, but people have 
an American demeanor, they pull their hair 
on the edge of violence. Then each family 
gives up a piece, and the child ends up more 
loved than ever, as if it's inevitable. 
Or so the river is telling me 
with its one-way simplicity, 
like gravity. "Alive in the eternal 
heart of France"--that's Mother 
I'm thinking about, for some reason, 

maybe the journal my wife's been keeping, 
so like the daily letters Mother wrote 
to sa mre et son pre, when her life 
was flowing through her like the broad 
Dordogne. And where is she now? 
Does she wish my father were with her, 
one of him alive, and one with her? 
A bell is ringing wildly, each of its peals 
like a round boat rolling downstream 
where the river divides around an island 
only to sweep back into itself 
somewhere in the fog.





A Book on a Shelf
 

A history of some sort, one that made us, 
a war and what the war had meant, or since 
meaning eludes war, what it did to the look 
of the trees and the sides of the buildings, 
most of which survived, only to be torn down 
later to widen the street or put up a new 
office complex. There it was on the shelf. 
I was there only a moment, but still, 
I wanted to know what happened to the man 
in the photograph wearing a flat cap 
standing outside the important building 
cheering. He was there. He was part of that 
moment, one of the first into the streets 
when the turn of events came, the declaration 
or pronouncement, words that would change 
the look of everything he smiled on, words 
that may have cost him his life. Here it is 
in a book I found on a shelf. The person 
who lives here bought it at a library 
stock reduction sale. No one had read it. 
It looked interesting thirty years ago. 
It was practically new, the back uncracked. 
But the person did what those before her had, 
put it up on a shelf and never found 
a way back to it. The history sits there, 
unread, unbelievable, somebody else's. 
Even I have only looked at the pictures, 
at the man smiling between the cold pages. 
Maybe ending the world as he knew it 
was ok. Maybe it was the only way. 
Maybe the world has to come to an end 
in the first place to be the world. And the man? 
He has to smile, though he knows so little 
of what's coming, even looking right at it. 
As we do, who still haven't read the book.





Just Another Paradigm Shift
 

Just a shadow. Hardly that. But audible. 
Coming out of the woods, whispering 
Happily Ever After. 
                          Even in that light-- 
stars with the skeletons of animals 
and old friends-- 
                       visible 
to the eye behind the one always 
left open on the east side of the house, 
downhill. Where the coffee trees 
and hemp and the graves of old dogs lie, 
buried themselves in leaves and left 
to the sputtering wind of memory. 

& if that's not enough (he says 
to himself in the voice of a black-and-white 
actor whose name is a moth that keeps 
avoiding the tip of his flaming tongue) 
to bring you home, well, there 
it is again, 
              already exhausted 
by your efforts to make it 
comfortable 
enough to stay. Impatient, 
                                   already headed 
back down into the woods, whispering 
Once Upon A Time . . . 





Breakage
 

I go down to the edge of the sea. 
How everything shines in the morning light! 
The cusp of the whelk, 
the broken cupboard of the clam, 
the opened, blue mussels, 
moon snails, pale pink and barnacle scarred-- 
and nothing at all whole or shut, but tattered, split, 
dropped by the gulls onto the gray rocks and all the moisture gone. 
It's like a schoolhouse 
of little words, 
thousands of words. 
First you figure out what each one means by itself, 
the jingle, the periwinkle, the scallop 
       full of moonlight. 

Then you begin, slowly, to read the whole story.





Why Are Your Poems So Dark?
 

Isn't the moon dark too,   
most of the time?   

And doesn't the white page   
seem unfinished   

without the dark stain   
of alphabets?   

When God demanded light,   
he didn't banish darkness.   

Instead he invented   
ebony and crows   

and that small mole   
on your left cheekbone.   

Or did you mean to ask   
"Why are you sad so often?"   

Ask the moon.   
Ask what it has witnessed.





To the Light of September
 

When you are already here 

you appear to be only 

a name that tells of you 

whether you are present or not 


and for now it seems as though 

you are still summer 

still the high familiar 

endless summer 

yet with a glint 

of bronze in the chill mornings 

and the late yellow petals 

of the mullein fluttering 

on the stalks that lean 

over their broken 

shadows across the cracked ground 


but they all know 

that you have come 

the seed heads of the sage 

the whispering birds 

with nowhere to hide you 

to keep you for later 


you 

who fly with them 


you who are neither 

before nor after 

you who arrive 

with blue plums 

that have fallen through the night 


perfect in the dew





Anagrammer
 

If you believe in the magic of language, 
then Elvis really Lives 
and Princess Diana foretold I end as car spin. 

If you believe the letters themselves 
contain a power within them, 
then you understand 
what makes outside tedious, 
how desperation becomes a rope ends it. 

The circular logic that allows senator to become treason, 
and treason to become atoners. 

That eleven plus two is twelve plus one, 
and an admirer is also married. 

That if you could just rearrange things the right way 
you'd find your true life, 
the right path, the answer to your questions: 
you'd understand how the Titanic 
turns into that ice tin, 
and debit card becomes bad credit. 

How listen is the same as silent, 
and not one letter separates stained from sainted.





Elegy on Toy Piano
 

For Kenneth Koch
You don't need a pony   
to connect you to the unseeable   
or an airplane to connect you to the sky.   

Necessary it is to love to live   
and there are many manuals   
but in all important ways   
one is on one's own.   

You need not cut off your hand.   
No need to eat a bouquet.   
Your head becomes a peach pit.   
Your tongue a honeycomb.   

Necessary it is to live to love,   
to charge into the burning tower   
then charge back out   
and necessary it is to die.   
Even for the trees, even for the pony   
connecting you to what can't be grasped.   

The injured gazelle falls behind the   
herd. One last wild enjambment.   

Because of the sores in his mouth,   
the great poet struggles with a dumpling.   
His work has enlarged the world   
but the world is about to stop including him.   
He is the tower the world runs out of.   

When something becomes ash,   
there's nothing you can do to turn it back.   
About this, even diamonds do not lie.





Funny Strange
 

We are tender and our lives are sweet 

and they are already over and we are 
visiting them in some kind of endless 
reprieve from oblivion, we are walking 
around in them and after we shatter 
with love for everything we settle in. 

Thou tiger on television chowing, 
thou very fact of dreams, thou majestical 
roof fretted with golden fire. Thou wisdom 
of the inner parts. Thou tintinnabulation. 

Is it not sweet to hand over the ocean's 
harvest in a single wave of fish? To bounce 
a vineyard of grapes from one's apron 
and into the mouth of the crowd? To scoop up 
bread and offer up one's armful to the throng? 
Let us live as if we were still among 

the living, let our days be patterned after 
theirs. Is it not marvelous to be forgetful?





The Larger
 

I don't know how it happened, but I fell--   
and I was immense, one dislocated arm   
wedged between two buildings. I felt some ribs   
had broken, perhaps a broken neck, too;   
I couldn't speak. My dress caught bunched   
about my thighs, and where my glasses shattered   
there'd spread something like a seacoast, or maybe   
it was a port. Where my hair tangled with power lines   
I felt a hot puddle of blood.   
                                                   I must have passed out,   
but when I woke, a crew of about fifty   
was building a winding stairway beside my breast   
and buttressing a platform on my sternum.   
I heard, as through cotton, the noise of hammers,   
circular saws, laughter, and some radio   
droning songs about love. Out the corner   
of one eye (I could open one eye a bit) I saw   
my pocketbook, its contents scattered, my lipstick's   
toppled silo glinting out of reach.   
And then, waving a tiny flashlight, a man   
entered my ear. I felt his boots sloshing   
the blood trickling there. He never came out.   
So some went looking, with flares, dogs, dynamite   
even: they burst my middle ear and found   
my skull, its cavern crammed with dark matter   
like a cross between a fungus and a cloud.   
They never found his body, though. And they never   
found or tried to find an explanation,   
I think, for me; they didn't seem to need one.   
Even now my legs subdue that dangerous   
sea, the water bright enough to cut   
the skin, where a lighthouse, perched on the tip   
of my great toe, each eight seconds rolls   
another flawless pearl across the waves.   
It keeps most ships from wrecking against my feet.   
On clear days, people stand beside the light;   
they watch the waves' blue heads slip up and down   
and scan for landmarks on the facing shore.





Nightwatchman's Song
 

After Heinrich I. F. Biber
I 

What's unseen may not exist--   
Or so those secret powers insist   
            That prowl past nightfall,   
Enabled by the brain's blacklist   
            To fester out of sight,   

So we streak from bad to worse,   
Through an expanding universe   
            And see no evil.   
On my rounds like a night nurse   
            Or sentry on qui vive,   

I make, through murkier hours, my way   
Where the sun patrolled all day   
            Toward stone-blind midnight   
To poke this flickering flashlamp's ray   
            At what's hushed up and hidden.   

Lacking all leave or protocol,   
Things, one by one, hear my footfall,   
            Blank out their faces,   
Dodge between trees, find cracks in walls   
            Or lock down offices.   

Still, though scuttling forces flee   
Just as far stars recede from me   
            To outmost boundaries,   
I stalk through ruins and debris,   
            Graveyard and underground.   

Led by their helmetlantern's light   
Miners inch through anthracite;   
            I'm the unblinking mole   
That sniffs out what gets lost or might   
            Slip down the world's black hole.   

II 

(ending his rounds, the watchman, somewhat tipsy, returns) 

What's obscene?--just our obsessed,   
Incessant itch and interest   
      In things found frightful:   
In bestial tortures, rape, incest;   
      In ripe forbidden fruit   

Dangling, lush, just out of reach;   
Dim cellars nailed up under each   
      Towering success,   
The loser's envy that will teach   
      A fierce vindictiveness,   

The victors' high court that insures   
Pardon for winners and procures   
      Little that's needed   
But all we lust for. What endures?--   
      Exponential greed   

And trash containers overflowing   
With shredded memos, records showing   
      What, who, when, why   
'Til there's no sure way of knowing   
      What's clear to every eye:   

The heart's delight in hatred, runny   
As the gold drip from combs of honey;   
      The rectal intercourse   
Of power politics and money   
      That slimes both goal and source.   

What's obscured?--what's abscessed.   
After inspection, I'd suggest   
      It's time we got our head   
Rewired. I plan to just get pissed,   
      Shitfaced and brain-dead.





Better Days
 

Never anymore in a wash of sweetness and awe   
does the summer when I was seventeen come back   
to mind against my will, like a bird crossing   

my vision. Summer of moist nights full of girls   
and boys ripened, holy drunkenness and violation   
of the comic boundaries, defiances that never   

failed or brought disaster. Days on the backs   
and in the breath of horses, between rivers   
and pools that reflected the cicadas' whine,   

enervation and strength creeping in smooth waves   
over muscular water. All those things accepted,   
once, with unnoticing hunger, as an infant   

accepts the nipple, never come back to mind   
against the will. What comes unsummoned now,   
blotting out every other thought and image,   

is a part of the past not so deep or far away:   
the time of poverty, of struggle to find means   
not hateful--the muddy seedtime of early manhood.   

What returns are those moments in the diner   
night after night with each night's one cup of coffee,   
watching an old man, who always at the same hour   

came in and smiled, ordered his tea and opened   
his drawing pad. What did he fill it with?   
And where's he gone? Those days, that studious worker,   

hand moving and eyes eager in the sour light,   
that artist always in the same worn-out suit,   
are my nostalgia now. That old man comes back,   

the friend I saw each day and never spoke to,   
because I hoped soon to disappear from there,   
as I have disappeared, into the heaven of better days.





Little Blessing for My Floater
 

After George Herbert 
This tiny ruin in my eye, small 
flaw in the fabric, little speck 
of blood in the egg, deep chip 
in the windshield, north star, 
polestar, floater that doesn't 
float, spot where my hand is not, 
even when I'm looking at my hand, 
little piton that nails every rock 
I see, no matter if the picture 
turns to sand, or sand to sea, 
I embrace you, piece of absence 
that reminds me what I will be, 
all dark some day unless God 
rescues me, oh speck 
that might teach me yet to see.





Repulsive Theory
 

Little has been made   
of the soft, skirting action   
of magnets reversed,   
while much has been   
made of attraction.   
But is it not this pillowy   
principle of repulsion   
that produces the   
doily edges of oceans   
or the arabesques of thought?   
And do these cutout coasts   
and incurved rhetorical beaches   
not baffle the onslaught   
of the sea or objectionable people   
and give private life   
what small protection it's got?   
Praise then the oiled motions   
of avoidance, the pearly   
convolutions of all that   
slides off or takes a   
wide berth; praise every   
eddying vacancy of Earth,   
all the dimpled depths   
of pooling space, the whole   
swirl set up by fending-off--   
extending far beyond the personal,   
I'm convinced--   
immense and good   
in a cosmological sense:   
unpressing us against   
each other, lending   
the necessary never 
to never-ending.





A Cave of Angelfish Huddle Against the Moon
 

Put an ear to the light at fall 
of dark and you will hear 
nothing. This pale luminescence 
that drifts in upon them 
makes a blue bole of their caves, 
a scare of their scything 
tails. They tell 
in the bubbling dark of images 
that come in upon them 
when light spreads like an oil slick 
and sea fans 
that once were their refuge 
turn away. 
Now there is no dark 
dark enough for their silver tails, 
scatter of color 
(like coins massively 
piling in the lap of a miser) 
that was, in the day, their pride. 
How hugely here we belong. 
This is their song 
in the silting 
drift of the reef. 
They have never seen the moon 
nor the black scut of night, stars 
spread like plankton 
in their beastly infinities.





The Sun
 

There is one mind in all of us, one soul, 
    who parches the soil in some nations 

but in others hides perpetually behind a veil; 
    he spills light everywhere, here he spilled 

some on my tie, but it dried before dinner ended. 
    He is in charge of darkness also, also 

in charge of crime, in charge of the imagination. 
    People fucking do so by flicking him 

off and on, off and on, with their eyelids 
    as they ascertain their love's sincerity. 

He makes the stars disappear, but he makes 
    small stars everywhere, on the hoods of cars, 

in the ommatea of skyscrapers or in the eyes 
    of sighing lovers bored with one another. 

Onto the surface of the world he stamps 
    all plants and animals. They are not gods 

but it is he who made us worshippers of every   
    bramble toad, black chive we find. 

In Idaho there is a desert cricket that makes 
    a clock-like tick-tick when he flies, but he 

is not a god. The only god is the sun, 
    our mind, master of all crickets and clocks.





To Judgment: An Assay
 

You change a life 
as eating an artichoke changes the taste 
of whatever is eaten after. 
Yet you are not an artichoke, not a piano or cat--
not objectively present at all--
and what of you a cat possesses is essential but narrow: 
to know if the distance between two things can be leapt. 
The piano, that good servant, 
has none of you in her at all, she lends herself 
to what asks; this has been my ambition as well. 
Yet a person who has you is like an iron spigot 
whose water comes from far-off mountain springs. 
Inexhaustible, your confident pronouncements flow, 
coldly delicious. 
For if judgment hurts the teeth, it doesn't mind, 
not judgment. Teeth pass. Pain passes. 
Judgment decrees what remains--
the serene judgments of evolution or the judgment 
of a boy-king entering Persia: Burn it, he says, 
and it burns. And if a small tear swells the corner 
of one eye, it is only the smoke, it is no more to him than a beetle 
fleeing the flames of the village with her six-legged children. 
The biologist Haldane--in one of his tenderer moments--
judged beetles especially loved by God, 
because He had made so many. For judgment can be tender: 
I have seen you carry a fate to its end as softly as a retriever 
carries the quail. Yet however much 
I admire you at such moments, I cannot love you:
you are too much in me, weighing without pity your own worth. 
When I have erased you from me entirely, 
disrobed of your measuring adjectives, 
stripped from my shoulders and hips each of your nouns, 
when the world is horsefly, coal barge, and dawn the color of winter butter--
not beautiful, not cold, only the color of butter--
then perhaps I will love you. Helpless to not. 
As a newborn wolf is helpless: no choice but hunt the wolf milk, 
find it sweet.





N
 

has crawled out of the ocean   
to carry us from sleep, like sleep,   

the gray of outer Sunset portending   
the gray of inner Sunset. And so on.   

On the N, one should invent   
intricate fictions for the lives   

of the passengers: time is a game.   
Soon we will be underground.   

But first, the long lush green   
of Duboce Park, the happiness of dogs!   

Good-bye now to their owners   
eyeing one another. Good-bye   

to the park's locked men's room,   
where once a man was found dead,   

his penis shoved into his own mouth.   
The world continues, the engine   

of the world the letter N.





Confession
 

Down in the blue-green water   
       at nightfall some selving shapes   
float fluorescing, trance-dancing,   
       trembling to the rhythm of   
theodoxical marching-   
       music that they hear over   
the mere noise of the breaking   
       tide. Above, stars in certain   
places; along the shore roads,   
       cars carrying people on   
uncertain errands, sordid   
       and sacred and all the kinds   
in between. Halogen-lit,   
       a woman gets down from her   
all-wheel-drive velocipede,   
       enters through an obeying   
door a cyclopean store   
       to buy unintelligent   
fresh fish and other objects   
       whether formerly alive   
or formerly dead, she comes   
       out again, a poor man calls   
to her, selling his no-news-   
       paper; the disastrous head-   
lines smile and nod, they announce   
       the plans of steel patriots   
and undertakers, ad-men   
       and fallen vice-generals,   
doping their stolen crusades.   
       But the woman has learned, as   
I have learned, as all of us   
       must keep learning if we are   
to be good subjects, how to   
       make of a newspaper the   
mask of a locust, calmly   
       put it on, and begin once   
more to eat everything up.





Habeas Corpus
 

Knots, a thousand lights, in   
   sheer dark, aimed at my window,   
tinny crystals, so mother dies   
   in my sleep. The snow turns   
coarse, goes out. An axe sounds   
   where I'd never heard an axe before.   
Breathing becomes dangerous. I can't   
   help it, making me her, even   
before I was born, her brain burning   
   out patterns I follow like will   
o' the wisps, sparks popping.   
   I put on heels and find I can balance,   
twist my spine, bend to get my seams   
   straight on my own, no one to   
call on, like she called me, sheer nylon   
   turning on sheer skin under my palms.   
I pull on the ratty musquash coat.   
   I have the body. I move off in it,   
eddying, trying to see who I am now.   
   I totter down the street thinking,   
one day he'll be sorry. And here I am.   
   Sorry. I watch her getting smaller   
up the road. I watch us both, till   
   nothing's all there is. 





School of Flesh
 

And blush for a cheek of stone.   

      Blush for the lips sewn tight with thread, no speech for the dead   
      maker--   

       
      You've got the razor. You can make each suture snap.   

       
      And watch the mouth    
bloom up with foam,   
      as if he'd drowned himself in soap--   

      You lift the neck and let the head drop back.   
The mouth yawns wide its prize--   

       
      White thrive.   
The larval joy.   
      Hot in their gorge on the stew of balms,   
a moist exhale--   
      as if there were a last breath, a taunt   
coiling   
      into your inner ear, Good Dog, you dig your hands in,   
up-cupping   
      the glossal   
bed--   

       
      saying, Graduate   
of the School of Flesh,   
      Father Conspirator--   


      I will learn it.   
      I will bite the tongue from the corpse.





Disgraceland
 

Before my first communion, I clung to doubt 
         as Satan spider-like stalked 
                the orb of dark surrounding Eden 

for a wormhole into paradise. 
       God had formed me from gel in my mother's womb, 
                injected by my dad's smart shoot. 

They swapped sighs until 
         I came, smaller than a bite of burger. 
                Quietly, I grew till my lungs were done 

then the Lord sailed a soul 
         like a lit arrow to inhabit me. 
                Maybe that piercing 

made me howl at birth, 
         or the masked creatures whose scalpel 
                cut a lightning bolt to free me. 

I was hoisted by the heels and swatted, fed 
         and hauled around. Time-lapse photos show 
                my fingers grow past crayon outlines, 

my feet come to fill spike heels. 
         Eventually, I lurched out 
                to kiss the wrong mouths, get stewed, 

and sulk around. Christ always stood 
         to one side with a glass of water. 
                I swatted the sap away. 

When my thirst got great enough to ask, 
         a clear stream welled up inside, 
                some jade wave buoyed me forward, 

and I found myself upright 
         in the instant, with a garden 
                inside my own ribs aflourish. 

There, the arbor leafs. 
         The vines push out plump grapes. 
                You are loved, someone said. Take that 

                and eat it.





Cabezn
 

I see you shuffle up Washington Street   
whenever I am driving much too fast:   
you, chub & bug-eyed, jaw like a loaf   
hands in your pockets, a smoke dangling slack   
from the slit of your pumpkin mouth,   
humped over like the eel-man or geek,   
the dummy paid to sweep out gutters,   

drown the cats. Where are you going now?   
Though someday you'll turn your gaze    
upon my shadow in this tinted glass   
I know for now you only look ahead   
at sidewalks cracked & paved with trash 
but what are you slouching toward--knee-locked,   
hippity, a hitch in your zombie walk, Bighead?





Lions Are Interesting
 

Each morning in the little white cabin   
by the river they woke to a raccoon   
clawing under the floorboards or banging   
in the wood stove. They did not discuss this.   
Instead they said it was a perfect day   
to pick blueberries on the hill, or that   
a hike to the old glassworks sounded good.   
They were beginning to speak not in meat   
but in the brown paper the butcher wraps   
around it. Brown paper around dirty   
magazines. Like dirty magazines, they   
only traced the contour of substance: silk   
over skin, skin over muscle, muscle over   
bone. What's under bone? Marrow? Their forks so   
small and dull. As if for dolls. You can tell   
dolls from animals because the latter   
are made of meat. Many eat it, also.   
Lions are interesting. Lions don't eat   
the flesh of their kills right away, but first   
lap up the blood, until the meat is blanched   
nearly white. White as the little cabin   
by the river they stayed in that summer.   
White as the raccoon covered in ashes,   
his black eyes bottomless and bright with hate.





Map
 

          
          Daddy goes.          Trolling and trawling and crawfishing and crabbing and bass-boating and trestle-jumping bare into rust-brackish water and cane-poling for bream and shallow-gigging too with a nail-pointy broomstick and creek-shrimping and cooler-dragging and coon-chasing and dove-dogging and duck-bagging and squirrel-tailing and tail-hankering and hard-cranking and -shifting and backfiring like a gun in his tittie-tan El Camino and parking it at The House of Ham and Dawn's Busy Hands and Betty's pink house and Mrs. Sweatman's brick house and Linda's dock-facing double-wide and spine-leaning Vicki against her WIDE-GLIDE Pontiac and pumping for pay at Ray Wade's Esso and snuff-dipping and plug-sucking and tar-weeping pore-wise and LuckyStrike-smoking and Kool only sometimes and penny-pitching and dog-racing and bet-losing cocksuckmotherfuck and pool-shooting and bottle-shooting over behind Tas-T-O's Donuts and shootin' the shit and chewin' the fat and just jawin' who asked you and blank-blinking quick back at me and whose young are you no-how and hounddog-digging buried half-pints from the woods.
        




Poem: Octopus floating . . .
 

Octopus floating
in earth's ink-ore core 
whose arms extend 
up here as trees
may your branches squirt 
their black across 
my pages please






Merry-No-Round
 

The wooden horses
are tired of their courses

and plead from head to hoof 
to be fed to a stove--

In leaping lunging flames 
they'd rise again, flared manes

snapping like chains behind them. 
The smoke would not blind them

as do these children's hands: 
beyond our cruel commands

the fire will free them then 
as once the artisan when

out of the tree they
were nagged to this neigh.






Bedtime Story
 

The generator hums like a distant ding an sich.   
It's early evening, and time, like the dog it is,   
                                                                                 is hungry for food,   
And will be fed, don't doubt it, will be fed, my small one.   
The forest begins to gather its silences in.   
The meadow regroups and hunkers down   
                                                                            for its cleft feet.   

Something is wringing the rag of sunlight   
                                                                  inexorably out and hanging.   
Something is making the reeds bend and cover their heads.   
Something is licking the shadows up,   
And stringing the blank spaces along, filling them in.   
Something is inching its way into our hearts,   
                              scratching its blue nails against the wall there.   

Should we let it in?   
                                       Should we greet it as it deserves,   
Hands on our ears, mouths open?   
Or should we bring it a chair to sit on, and offer it meat?   
Should we turn on the radio,   
                                                     should we clap our hands and dance   
The Something Dance, the welcoming Something Dance?   
                               I think we should, love, I think we should.





Then Too There Is This
 

joy in the day's being done, however    
clumsily, and in the ticked-off lists,    
the packages nestling together,    
no one home waiting for dinner, for    
you, no one impatient for your touch    
or kind words to salve what nightly    
rises like heartburn, the ghost-lump feeling    
that one is really as alone as one had feared.    
One isn't, not really. Not really. Joy    
to see over the strip mall darkening    
right on schedule a neon-proof pink    
sunset flaring like the roof of a cat's mouth,    
cleanly ribbed, the clouds laddering up    
and lit as if by a match struck somewhere    
in the throat much deeper down.





Country Love Song
 

I try to think of the cup of a hand,   
of legs in a tangle, and not the thistle   

though even it, purpled, spiking away,   
wants to be admired, wants to say, whistle   

a little for me. O every little thing wants 
to be loved, wants to be marked by the cry   

that brings desire to it, even blue-eyed fly   
to the bloated hiss of death. To love is to be remiss:   

the horse alone in the wide flat field nods 
its head as if the bridle and bit were missed   

or mocked; the cow slung with the unmilked weight   
of her tremendous teats shoots a look back over her shoulder   

at O lonesome me. I want to say to her need                  
as if crooning could be enough,   

sweet, sweet mama . . . truth be told,   
the thousand lisping bees to the milkweeds' honey   

terrifies me. When the stink of slurry season   
is over and the greened fields are slathered, fecund,   

overtall foxgloves tip with the weight of their fruit.   
Then I dream a little dream of you   

and me, curled like two grubs on the top of a leaf   
wind-driven and scudding along the lake's surface.   

All night we glide to its blue harbor   
and back again. The fattened slack of us   

singing O darlin' darlin'   darlin'.





Another Lullaby for Insomniacs
 

Sleep, she will not linger:
She turns her moon-cold shoulder.
With no ring on her finger,
You cannot hope to hold her.

She turns her moon-cold shoulder
And tosses off the cover.
You cannot hope to hold her:
She has another lover.

She tosses off the cover
And lays the darkness bare.
She has another lover.
Her heart is otherwhere.

She lays the darkness bare.
You slowly realize
Her heart is otherwhere.
There's distance in her eyes.

You slowly realize
That she will never linger,
With distance in her eyes
And no ring on her finger.





Sharks' Teeth
 

Everything contains some   
silence. Noise gets 
its zest from the 
small shark's-tooth 
shaped fragments 
of rest angled 
in it. An hour   
of city holds maybe   
a minute of these   
remnants of a time   
when silence reigned,   
compact and dangerous   
as a shark. Sometimes   
a bit of a tail   
or fin can still   
be sensed in parks.





Obbligato
 

Late August was a pressure drop,   
rain, a sob in the body,   

a handful of air    
with a dream in it,    

summer was desperate    
to paradise itself with blackberry   

drupelets and swarms, everything   
polychromed, glazed, sprinkler caps    

gushing, the stars like sweat   
on a boxer's skin. A voice   

from the day says   
Tax cuts    

for the rich or scratch   
what itches or it's a sax   

from Bitches Brew,   
and I'm a fool    

for these horns   
and hues, this maudlin    

light. It's a currency of feeling    
in unremembered March.   

There's a war on and snow in the 
                        city   
where we've made our desire stop   

and start. In the dying school of Bruce   
I'm the student who still believes   

in the bad taste of the beautiful   
and the sadness of songs   

made in the ratio   
of bruise for bruise.





Tutelary
 

What a fuckup you are.    
What dumbshit you do.    
Your father's voice    
still whispers in you,    
    
despite the joys    
that sweeten each day.    
Your Genius it isn't    
until, dying away,    
    
it worms back through    
the sparkling dream    
where you drown him    
in an inch-deep stream:    
    
your knee in his back,    
your strength on his skull,    
it begins singing    
praise for your skill.





Here
 

Ghost I house   
In this old flat--   
Your outpost--   
My aftermath





Indiscriminate Kisses
 

Foreplay of obscene graffiti carved   
into trees--foot-long boners   
gouge the bark. Beaks and snouts   
on a restroom mirror. Slick lips.   
Succulent lips. I go out among them   
sometimes. So sweet how they pucker up   
out of pity. A practiced pathos   
in a saloon of woodsmen whose axes   
wait in trucks out back. Lips full of yawn   

or yes. Lips thick with God-spit   
and God-suck. Chapped lips, bloody lips.   
Pierced or tattooed, they pout 
into view--here to give, willy-nilly, 
what's been too long held in the body. 
Something passes across tongues. It sayeth not   
a name; it taketh everyone's turn. Mute lips   
of a swift unbuttoner. Mouths fording   
frothy streams, vaporous bogs.   
I stumble forth in their midst. Maybe   
I am out of bread or in a bad place   
with a book. The streets have an attendant 
caress. Moon lapping rumor. Fat lip   
approaches hare lip. There go pasty 
lips. All are readied as if for a race   
or to be plucked like rare moths   
by bright wings from the air. Betty's lips   
and Bobby's and Bucky's just before the collision 
and the siren's red wail. Laddy, keep 

a light on. I may have to come ashore 
some distance from where I set in. 





The God of Inattention
 

After the trumpets, after the incense    
There were nights insomnia fathered gods    
I then rejected as too angry or distracted,    
Or whose appetite for submission revealed    
Their own lack of faith.   Say our names,    
All synonyms for trust. Others spoke    
In sugared paradox:  To know is to know    
All. To not know all is not to know. To know    
All requires that you know very little,    
But to know that little you have to know    
All . And for a while, it's true,    
I burned in the dark fires of ambivalence,    
My attention consumed like oxygen.    
I'd wake up tired, as I had with the married man    
Whose strictures and caprice begat,    
And begat, and begat, and begat    
My love for him, harvesting the same      
Silence from my bed. Who listens    
To my penitential tune? Who accepts    
My petitions for convenient parking,    
For spring, for the self illuminated    
Across a kitchen table, for . . . for    
Fortitude? I've heard a voice, I'm sure,    
Advising me to drop this sentimental farce.    
Only to hold the smoke of their names    
Again in my mouth I'd resurrect    
The dead, or adopt the gods orphaned    
By atheists, except the gods they've made    
From disbelief no one's faith could tolerate.    
Refusing to make the same mistake    
Just once, I've cried out to the dark    
Many names, most given up as routinely    
As the secrets of friends. If you're a cup      
Will my lips profane your own? If a comb      
Will I feel your teeth against my neck?      
If a wall I will be darker than your shadow.    
And if a door I will unlatch you, letting in    
All the little foxes from the vineyard.





Staying Power
 

In appreciation of Maxim Gorky at the International Convention of Atheists, 1929
Like Gorky, I sometimes follow my doubts   
outside to the yard and question the sky,   
longing to have the fight settled, thinking   
I can't go on like this, and finally I say   

all right, it is improbable, all right, there   
is no God. And then as if I'm focusing   
a magnifying glass on dry leaves, God blazes up.   
It's the attention, maybe, to what isn't there   

that makes the emptiness flare like a forest fire   
until I have to spend the afternoon dragging   
the hose to put the smoldering thing out.   
Even on an ordinary day when a friend calls,   

tells me they've found melanoma,   
complains that the hospital is cold, I say God.   
God, I say as my heart turns inside out.   
Pick up any language by the scruff of its neck,   

wipe its face, set it down on the lawn,   
and I bet it will toddle right into the godfire   
again, which--though they say it doesn't   
exist--can send you straight to the burn unit.   

Oh, we have only so many words to think with.   
Say God's not fire, say anything, say God's   
a phone, maybe. You know you didn't order a phone,   
but there it is. It rings. You don't know who it could be.   

You don't want to talk, so you pull out   
the plug. It rings. You smash it with a hammer   
till it bleeds springs and coils and clobbery   
metal bits. It rings again. You pick it up   

and a voice you love whispers hello.





Kind of Blue
 

Not Delft or   
delphinium, not Wedgewood 
among the knickknacks, not wide-eyed chicory   
evangelizing in the devil strip-- 

But way on down in the moonless   
octave below midnight, honey, 
way down where you can't tell cerulean   
from teal. 

Not Mason jars of moonshine, not   
waverings of silk, not the long-legged hunger   
of a heron or the peacock's   
iridescent id-- 

But Delilahs of darkness, darling, 
and the muscle of the mind 
giving in. 

Not sullen snow slumped   
against the garden, not the first instinct of flame,   
not small, stoic ponds, or the cold derangement 
of a jealous sea-- 

But bluer than the lips of Lazarus, baby,   
before Sweet Jesus himself could figure out 
what else in the world to do but weep.





Cold Calls: War Music, Continued
 

Many believe in the stars.   


   Take Quinamid   
The son of a Dardanian astrologer   
Who disregarded what his father said   
And came to Troy in a taxi.   

Gone.   



    Odysseus to Greece:   

    "Hector has never fought this far from Troy.   
We want him further out. Beyond King Ilus' tower.   
So walk him to the centre of the plain and, having killed him,   
Massacre the Trojans there.   

"Ave!   



    Immediately beyond the ridge is Primrose Hill   
Where Paris favoured Aphrodit.   

"Take it, said Hector.   

    Greece shouted: "Hurry up!   
Troy shouted: "Wait for us!   



    See,   
Far off,   
Masts behind the half-built palisade.   
    Then   
Nearer to yourselves   
Scamnder's ford   
From which the land ascends   
Then merges with the centre of the plain--   
The tower (a ruin) its highest point.   



    Heaven.   
Bad music.   
Queen Hera is examining her gums.   
Looking in through a window   
Teenaged Athena says:   
"Trouble for Greece.   

      They leave.   



      Sea.   
      Sky.   
      The sunlit snow.   

      Two armies on the plain.   
Hector, driven by Lutie,   
His godchild and his nephew,   
Going from lord to Trojan lord:   

"The ships by dark.   



    The ruined tower.   

      In front of it--   
Their banners rising one by one.   
One after one, and then another one--   
50,000 Greeks.   

      And on a rise in front of Greece   
Two hero lords:   

      Ajax the Great of Salamis   
Behind his shield--   
                        
            As fifty Trojan shields   
Topped with blue plumes, swivelling their points,   
Come up the rise--   
      Lord Teucer (five feet high and five feet wide)   
Loading his bow,   
Peering round Ajax' shield,   
Dropping this Trojan plume or that,   
Ordering his archers to lie flat,   
Promising God as many sheep as there are sheep to count   
If he can put a shaft through Hector's neck.   

      Prosperity!   
Beneath the blue, between the sea, the snow, there   
    Hector is   
Surrendering the urn of one he has just killed   
To one who thought that he had killed the same.   
      Lord Teucer's eye/Prince Hector's throat. 
But God would not. The bowstring snaps.   



      Outside God's inner court.   
Queen Hera and Athena still in line.   
Hera so angry she can hardly speak.   
      A voice:   
"The Wife, the Daughter.   
"You go. His face will make me   
    heave.   



"Serene and Dignified Grandee.   
"Papa to you.   

"Papa--His hand--   
"I know you do not want the Holy Family   
    visiting the plain.   
But some of us would like to help the Greeks.   
They lost their champion she.   
    Thousands of them have died. Now they are in retreat.   
    Please look. 
      
      The plain.   

"You will come back the moment that I call?   
"Of course, Papa.   
"Then . . . yes. Encourage Greece.   
But voices only.   
    Words. Shouts. That sort of thing. A move--and home you come.   
"Of course, Papa.   

      The plain.   

      Lord Teucer's archers hidden in its grass.   

    Chylbborak, Lord Hector's brother-in-law, to his blue plumes: 
"Move!   
"Move!   
      And on their flanks, between the sea and snow,   
Led by Telspiax' silver yard   
All Ilium's masks   

"Down came their points. Out came their battle cry.   
And our cool Mr 5 x 5 called: Up.' And up we got   
And sent our arrows into them,   
That made them pirouette,   
Topple back down the rise, leaving their dead   
For some of us to strip, and some, the most,   
To pause, to point, to plant, a third, a fourth   
Volley into their naked backs. Pure joy!   



      Chylbborak,   
Holding his ground:   
"Centre on me.   
More die in broken than in standing ranks.   
Apollo! Aphrodit! Our gods are here!   
You taste the air, you taste their breath!   
The Greek fleet, ours, by dark!   

      Then he is ringed.   

      See an imperial pig harassed by dogs.   
      How, like a masterchef his crpes,   
      He tosses them; and on their way back down   
      Eviscerates, then flips them back into the pack.   
Likewise Chylbborak the Greeks who rushed.   

      Hector has seen it. As--   
Beneath the blue, the miles of empty air,   
Him just one glitter in that glittering   mass--   
The hosts begin to merge.   



      Fine dust clouds mixed with beams of light.   
The Prince, down from his plate.   
Either sides' arrows whingeing by:   
"Cover my back.   
Finding a gap   
Dismissing blows as gales do slates,   
Then at a run, leaping into the ring,   
Taking Chylbborak's hand:   
"If you don't mind?   



      Agamemnon:   
"Our time has come. God keeps his word.   
Fight now as you have never fought.   
We will be at Troy's gates by dusk,   
Through them by dark,   
By dawn, across our oars,   
As we begin our journey home,   
Watching the windmills on its Wall   
Turn their sails in flames.   



    Heaven. The Wife. The Daughter.   

    Hands release black lacquer clasps inlaid with particles of gold.   
Silk sheaths--with crashing waves and fishscales woven on a    
            navy ground--   
Flow on the pavement.   

      Hands take their hands   

      While other hands supply   

      Warwear,   

      Their car,   

      And put the reins into Athena's hands.   



". . . Troy's gates by dusk,   
      Through them by dark . . .   



      The Hours, the undeniable,   
Open the gates of Paradise.   

      Beyond   

      The wastes of space.   

      Before   

      The blue.   

      Below   

      Now near   

      The sea, the snow.   



      All time experts in hand-to-hand action--   
Friecourt, Okinawa, Stalingrad West--   
Could not believe the battle would gain.   
But it did.   

      Chylbborak's ring is ringed. And then no ring at all.   
Some Trojans raise their hands in prayer;   
      Some Panachans shout for joy and wait to drag the corpses off. 


      Lutie, alone, the reins in one, his other hand   
Hacking away the hands that grab his chariot's bodywork,   
Rearing his horses, Starlight and Bertie, through,   
      To,   
      Yes,   
      Chylbborak up; rescued;   
Prince Hector covering. Then:   

"Zoo-born wolf! Front for a family of thieves!   
Lord Diomed, on foot, with Sethynos.   
      My Lutie answering:   
"Be proud Prince Hector is your Fate.   
(Which will be so,   
Though Lutie will not see it.)   
      Chylbborak and Hector do not want to disappoint this oily pair:   
"Here come the Sisters Karamazof, Spark,   
Chylbborak said. "Let's send them home in halves.   
And jumped back down.   



      Around the tower, 1000 Greeks, 1000 Ilians, amid their swirl,   
His green hair dressed in braids, each braid   
Tipped with a little silver bell, note   
Nyro of Simi--the handsomest of all the Greeks, save A.   
                  The trouble was, he had no fight. He dashed from fight to fight, 
Struck a quick blow, then dashed straight out again.   
Save that this time he caught,   
As Prince Aenas caught his breath,   
That Prince's eye; who blocked his dash,   
And as Lord Panda waved and walked away,   
Took his head off his spine with a backhand slice--   
Beautiful stuff . . . straight from the blade . . .   
      Still, as it was a special head,   
Mowgag, Aenas' minder--   
Bright as a box of rocks, but musical--   
Spiked it, then hoisted it, and twizzling the pole   
Beneath the blue, the miles of empty air,   
Marched to the chingaling of its tinklers,   
A knees high majorette   
Towards the Greeks, the tower.   



      A roar of wind across the battlefield.   

      A pause.   

      And then   

      Scattering light,   
The plain turned crystal where their glidepath stopped,   
The Queen of Heaven shrills: "Typhoid for Troy!   
And through poor Nyro's wobbling mouth   
Athena yells:   

"Slew of assiduous mediocrities!   
Meek Greeks!   



      It is enough.   

      Centre-plain wide,   
Lit everywhere by rays of glorious light,   
They rushed their standards into Ilium,   
      Diomed (for once) swept forward;   
Converting shame to exaltation with his cry:   

"Never--to Helen's gold without her self!   
      Never--to Helen's self   
    without her gold!   

      Mowgag well slain.   
Hewn through his teeth, his jaw slashed off,   
And Nyro's head beside him in the grass.   

      When Nyro's mother heard of this   
She shaved her head; she tore her frock; she went outside   
Ripping her fingernails through her cheeks:   
Then down her neck; her chest; her breasts;   
And bleeding to her waist ran round the shops,   
Sobbing:   
"God, kill Troy.   
Console me with its death.   
Revenge is all I have.   
My boy was kind. He had his life to live.   
I will not have the chance to dance in Hector's blood,   
But let me hear some have before I die.   

"I saw her running round.   
      I took the photograph.   
      It summed the situation up.   
      He was her son.   
      They put it out in colour. Right?   
      My picture went around the   
    world.   



      Down the shaft of the shot in his short-staved bow   
      Lord Panda has been follow-spotting Diomed.   

      Between "her self  / "her gold he shoots.   
It hits. And as its barbs protrude through Dio's back   
Aenas hears Lord Panda shout:   
"He bleeds! The totem Greek! Right-shoulder-front! 
How wise of Artemis to make   
Panda her matador! Her numero uno! Moi!   

      Diomed hit,   
The heart went out of those who followed him   
And they fell back.   



    Shields all round   

Diomed on his knees   

Lifting his hands:   

"Sister and wife of God   

As Sethynos breaks off the arrowhead   

"Eliminate my pain.   

Settles his knee beneath his hero's shoulderblades   

"Let me kill that oaf who claims my death   

Bridges his nape with one hand   

"Before it comes with honour to my name.   

    Then with his other hand   
In one long strong slow pull   
Drew the shank back, and out.   



    She heard his prayer.   

    Before their breathless eyes   
His blood ran back into the pout the shank had left,   
And to complete her miracle   
Lord Diomed rose up between them, stood in the air,   
Then hovered down onto his toes   
Brimming with homicidal joy,   
Imparting it to Greece.   

    Then Troy was driven back,   
Trampling the half-stripped still-masked carcasses   
Hatching the centre of the plain.   



      Aenas / Panda.   
      

"Get him.   

"Get him! I got him. He is dead. But there he is.   

      And Diomed has spotted them.   

"Calm down, Aenas said. "Perhaps he is possessed.   

"What god would visit him?   

"So pray to yours--and try another shot.   

"Huntress, Lord Panda prays,   
      Bright-ankled   god of nets and lines,  
      Of tangled mountains, ilex groves and dark cascades . . .   

      But Artemis was bored with him   
And let him rise, still praying hard,   
Into the downflight of the javelin   
Diomed aired at Prince Aenas.   

    Sunlit, it went through Panda's lips, out through his neck, and then 
Through Biblock's neck.   
      And so they fell; the lord, face up; the friend, face down   
Gripping the blood-smeared barb between his teeth,   
Between the sea and snow.   

      Aenas covers them.   

      Eyeing his plate   
--Technology you can enjoy--   
Diomed found, and threw, a stone   
As heavy as a cabbage made of lead,   
That hit, and split, Aenas' hip.   
Who went down on one knee   
And put his shield hand on the grass   
And with his other hand covered his eyes.   
Dido might have become a grandmother   
And Rome not had its day, except   
As Diomed came on to lop his top   
Aenas' mama, Aphrodit (dressed   
In grey silk lounge pyjamas piped with gold   
And snake-skin flip-flops) stepped   
Between him and the Greek.   
A glow came from her throat, and from her hair   
A fragrance that betokened the divine.   
Stooping, she kissed him better, as   
Queen Hera whispered: "Greek, cut that bitch.   
And, Diomed, you did; nicking Love's wrist.   



    Studying the ichor as   
It seeped across her pulse into her palm   
Our Lady of the Thong lifted her other hand   
Removed a baby cobra from her hair   
And dropped it, Diomed, onto your neck,   
And saw its bite release its bane into your blood.   
      Then nobody could say   
Who Diomed fought for, or for what he fought.   

      Rapt through the mass   
      Now shouting at the sky, now stomping on the plain,   
      He killed and killed and killed, Greek, Trojan, Greek, 
Lord/less, shame/fame, both gone; and gone   
Loyalty nurtured in the face of death,   
The duty of revenge, the right to kill,   
To jeer, to strip, to gloat, to be the first   
To rally but the last to run, all gone--   
And gone, our Lady Aphrodit, giggling.   

      While everywhere,   

Driving your fellow Greeks   
    Back down the long incline that leads to the Scamnder's ford, 
Surely as when   
Lit from the dark part of the sky by sudden beams,   
A bitter wind   
Detonates line by line of waves against the shore.   

    No mind. Even as Teucer backed away   
He kept his eyes on you.   
"You feel the stress? You feel the fear?   
Behold your enemy! the Prince God loves!   
    See   Teucer's bow. Hear Teucer's: "This time lucky.   
    His--   
But this time it was not our Father, God,   
Who saved your life, my Prince.   
    As Agamemnon cried:   
"The ships are safe.   
Stand at the riverside's far bank.   
Telspiax heard the rustle of Lord Teucer's shot   
And stood between yourself and it.   

    His head was opened, egglike, at the back,   
Mucked with thick blood, blood trickling from his mouth.   
His last words were:   
"Prince, your trumpeter has lost his breath.   

    "Our worst fear was his face would fade,   
    Telspiax's father said. 
"But it did not. We will remember it until we die.   

    "Give his instrument to Hogem, Hector said, and went--   
Lutie on reins--between the sea and snow,   
Throwing his chariots wide, Scamnderwards,   
As easily as others might a cloak.   



    Diomed among this traffic, on his own,   
Among his dead,   
Their pools of blood, their cut-off body-parts,   
Their cut-off heads,   
Ashamed as his head cleared   
To see Odysseus, Idomeneo, the Ajax--Big and Small--   
Whipping away downslope, shouting towards Odysseus:   
"Where are you going with your back to the battle?   
Who shouted back, although he did not turn:   
"Look left!   
And there was Lutie driving Hector onto him,   

Sure they would trample him, for sure   
Queen Hera's human, Diomed,   
Would stand and die, except:   
"Arms up, young king-- Nestor, full tilt,   
Reins round his tummy, leaning out "--and   
Jump . . . wrists locked ". . . You young are just . . .   
Swinging him up onto the plate ". . . too much.   

"With your permission, Da?   
Nod. Drew. Then threw the chariot's javelin   
As Lutie spun his wheels, and Hector threw--    
Those skewers trading brilliance as they passed--   
And missed--both vehicles slither-straightening,   
Regaining speed, close, close, then driven apart   
By empty cars careering off the incline,   
Or stationary cars, their horses cropping grass.   

"Daddy, go slow. Hector will say I   ran.   
"But not the widows you have made.   

    And slow   
    And low   
Cruising the blue above this mix   
Heaven's Queen and Ringsight-eyed Athena   
Trumpeting down huge worms of sound   
As Hector's car rereached king Nestor's,   and:   
"What kept you, Prince? Diomed offered as they came abreast:   
"You went for a refreshing towel?   
And threw his axe, that toppled through the air, and, oh,   
Hector, my Hector, as you thought:   
"If Heaven helps me Heaven shows it loves the best,   
Parted your Lutie's mesh and smashed into his heart.   

    What did you say as God called you to death   
Dear Lutie?   

"King Prince, I leave you   driverless.   

    And put the reins into his hands, and fled   
Into oblivion   

      As Hector with his other hand   
Held what his Lutie was, upright, face forwards, in between   
The chariot's basket and himself,   
Shouting as he drove after them:   

"Loathsome Greek,   
Your loathsome hair, your loathsome blood,   
Your loathsome breath, your loathsome heart,   
Jump in your loathsome ships,   
I will come after you,   
Come over the Aegean after you,   
And find you though you hide inside   
Your loathsome father's grave   
And with my bare hands twist your loathsome head   
Off your loathsome neck.   

      There was a Greek called Themion.   
Mad about armour. If not armour, cars.   
Of course he went to Troy. And Troy   
Saw a stray spear transfix him as he drove.   
      Companionably, his horses galloped up   
On Starlight's side, and muddled Starlight down,   
And Bertie down, and brought the Prince   
(Still holding Lutie) down, as all the world   
Hurried, as if by windheads, on towards   Scamnder's ford.   


hether you reach it from the palisade   
Or through the trees that dot the incline's last stretch 
You hear Scamnder's voice before you see   
What one may talk across on quiet days   
Its rippling sunspangled breadth   
Streaming across the bars of pebbly sand   
That form its ford   
--Though on the Fleet's side deeper, darkly bright.   

      And here   
Tiptoeing from this bar to that,   
Settling the cloudy sunshine of her hair,   
Her towel retained by nothing save herself,   
The god of Tops and Thongs   
Our Lady Aphrodit came,   
Her eyes brimfull with tears.   



    Scamnder is astonished by his luck.   

"Beauty of Beauties, why are you weeping?   
"I have been hurt, Scamnder.   
"No . . .   
"Humiliated.   
"No . . .   
"Me. A god. Just like yourself. Touched . .   .   
"Touched!   
"By a man.   
"A man!   
"A Greek.   
"Death to all Greeks!   
"He cut me!   
"Sacrilege!   
. . . But where?   
"I need your healing touch.   
"How can I help you if you do not show me where?   
"Moisten its lips and my wound will be healed.   
"You must say where!   
"Well . . .   
    The towel has slipped an inch.   
"I am afraid you will be disappointed.   
"Never.   
"Are you sure?   
"Yes!   
"You will not criticize me?   
"No!   
    Her wrist upturned.   
    Out-turned.   
    Her opened palm.   
    Fanning the fingers of her other hand,   
Stroking his spangles with her fingertips.   
"Goddess, I love you.   
I have always loved you.   
Say that you love me. Even a little.   
I beg you. God grant it.   
"I need your help, Scamnder.   
"Take pity on me. Come into me.   
"You have your nymphs.   
"Bores! Bores!   
"I might be nibbled by an eel!   
"Death to all eels!   
    The towel is down.   
"Step into me . . .   
I love your toes . . . please let me kiss your toes . . .   
Your little dinkum-inkum toes . . .   
"No one has kissed them so nicely, Scamnder.   
"And now your knees . . .   
"You tickle me . . .   
"And now your thighs!   
"Oh, oh, go on . . .   
"And now your bum!   
    Your Holy Bum! Your Sacred Bum!   
    The Bum of Paradise!   
"Oh, my Scamnder, I must have your help . . .   
"Anything!   
    The towel goes curling off,   
And as she floated on his stream   
Our Lady Aphrodit said:   
"At any moment now the Greeks will reach your    
         Troy-side bank . . .   

    Recall those sequences   
    When horsemen ride out of the trees and down into a   stream   
Somewhere in Kansas or Missouri, say.   
    So--save they were   thousands--Greece   
Into Scamnder's ford.   



    Coming downstream,   
A smallish wave   

    That passes   

    But   

    Scamnder's flow does not relapse.   

    Indeed   

    Almost without a sound   
Its murmuring radiance rose   
Into a dark, torrential surge,   
Clouded with boulders, crammed with trees, as clamorous    
         as if it were a sea,   
That lifted Greece, then pulled Greece down,   
Cars gone, masks gone, gone under, reappearing, gone:   

"Onto your knees! Praise Hector for this flood!   
The Prince God loves! Prince Hector claims   
As he comes through the trees.   

    They do.   
Then up and run, run, thousands of them,   
To hold those Greeks who got back out   
Under until their bubbles stopped; while those swept off   
Turned somersaults amid Scamnder's undertow.   



    The flat--   

    1000 yards of it between the river and the palisade.   

    The King:   

"The Lord has not abandoned us.   
To cross will be as bad for them.   



    But it was not to be as bad for them.   

    Indeed,   
As Hector drove towards Scamnder's brink,   
And as--their banners rising one by one,   
One after one and then another one--   
He and all Ilium began to enter it,   
    The river reassumed its softly-spoken, smooth, sunspangled way.   

    And Agamemnon cried:   

"God, what are You for?   
What use are You to me?   

    As Hector cries:   

"Two miracles!   
Your Prince is close to God!   

    And Hera to Athena:   

"Fog?   

    And fog came down.   

    And most of Greece got out.   



    Troy holding hands midstream.   
An army peering through its masks.   



    Miss Tops and Thongs to God:   

"Your Hera has . . .   

    And with a wish He turned the fog to light   

    And with a word He called them back to Heaven.   



    Sky.   
    Snow.   
    The 1000 yards.   
    The palisade.   

    Hector:   
"I am your Prince.   
My name means He-Who-Holds.   
Troy. And the plain. And now the ships.   
    For Troy! his battle cry,   
Rising into a common cry, that cry   
Into a clamour, and that clamour to   
Bayings of hatred.   

    800 yards.   

    The Child:   
"We are the Greeks. We fight to win. If one is lost,   
Close his eyes, step over him, and kill his enemy.   

    800 yards.   

    The Greeks are tiring.   
    Nestor is on his knees:   

"God of all Gods, Most Holy and Most High,  
      If Greece has ever sacrificed fresh blood to you,  
      Protect our ships.   



    Heaven.   
Soft music. Summertime. Queen Hera and Athena? Yes . . .   

    Some lesser gods   
Observing their approach, approach,   
Salaam, and then   
Lead them--   
Now both in black wraparound tops--   
To God:   

"Darling Daddy, here we are.   
"And (Hera) "here we stay   
Until you stop that worthless Hector killing Greeks.   
    Up steps Love.   
    Hera: "Why is she wearing a tent?   
    Love: "Father, see this. (Her wrist.)   
"Human strikes god! Communism! The end of everything!   

"Darlings, He said,   
"You know that being a god means being blamed.   
Do this--no good. Do that--the same. The answer is:   
Avoid humanity.   
    Remember--I am God.   
I see the bigger picture.   

"And I am Hera, Heaven's Queen,   
Greece worships me.   

"Stuff Greece, Love said.   
"Your blubber-bummed wife with her gobstopper nipples   
Hates Troy because Troy's Paris put her last   
When we stripped off for him.   
    As for the Ithacan boat-boy's undercurved preceptatrix,   
She hates Troy because my statue stands on its acropolis.   

      Hera: "The cities' whores were taxed to pay for it.   
      Love (Dropping onto her knees before Himself):   
"Please . . . stop them harming Troy. The greatest city   
                in the world.   

      While Hera and Athena sang:   

"Cleavage! Cleavage!   
      Queen of the Foaming Hole.   
      Mammoth or man or midge   
      She sucks from pole to pole.   

      And God has had enough of it.   

      Lifting His scales He said:   

"Hector will have his day of victory.   
Then crashed them to the ground.   



      700 yards.   

      The palisade.   

      Its gate.   

      Late sunlight on gilt beaks.   

"There's no escape from Troy.   
"Or from the plain at Troy.   

      Begging for ransom, Trojan Hoti,   
His arms around King Menelaos' knees.   

      King Agamemnon: "Off.   

      Then he punched Hoti in the face.   
Then punched him in the face again.   
And then again. And when he fell   
King Agamemnon kicked him in the groin.   
Kicking him in the groin with so much force   
It took a step to follow up each kick.   
Then pulled him up,   
Then dragged him by his hair   
This way and that,    
Then left him, calling:   
"Finish him off.   
And someone did.   



"I was sixteen. I said: Where is Achilles?'   
Hard as it is to share another's troubles when your own are pressing   
Great Ajax took my hands in his and said:   
He loves us. He is with us. He will come.'   

      But he did not.   

      Then Ajax to himself:   
"Dear Lord, you made me straight.   
Give me the strength to last till dark.   

      The Prince: "I get past   everything I see.   
Their war is lost.   

      It was.   

      Aenas, bassee, Sarpdon, Gray,   
Calling to one another down the line.   
      Then, with a mighty wall of sound,   
As if a slope of stones   
Rolled down into a lake of broken glass   
We ran at them.   



    And now the light of evening has begun   
To shawl across the plain:   
Blue gray, gold gray, blue gold,   
Translucent nothingnesses   
Readying our space,   
Within the deep, unchanging sea of space,   
For Hesper's entrance, and the silver wrap.   

    Covered with blood, mostly their own,   
Loyal to death, reckoning to die   
Odysseus, Ajax, Diomed,   
Idomeneo, Nestor, Menelaos   
And the King:   

"Do not die because others have died.   
"Do not show them the palms of your hands.   

"Achil!   
"Achil!   
"If he won't help us, Heaven help us.   

"Stand still and fight.   
"Feel shame in one another's eyes.   
"I curse you, God. You are a liar, God.   
Troy will be yours by dark--immortal lies.   
"Home!   
"Home!   
"There's no such place.   
"You can't launch burning ships.   
"More men survive if no one runs.   

    But that is what Greece did.   

    Dropping their wounded,   
Throwing down their dead,   
Their shields, their spears, their swords,   
They ran.   

    Leaving their heroes tattered, filthy, torn   

    And ran   

    And ran   

    Above their cries:   

"I am the Prince! The victory is mine!   

    Chylbborak:   

"Do not take cowardice for granted.   

    Scarce had he said it, when   
His son, Kykon, standing next to him   
Took Ajax' final spear cast in his chest.   

"I shall not wear your armour, Sir, he said.   
And died.   

"My son is dead.   

    The Prince:   

"Hector is loved by God.   

    And Greece, a wall of walking swords,   
But walking backwards,   
Leaving the plain in silence   
And in tears.   



    Idomeneo,   
Running back out at those Trojans who came too close:   
      

"You know my name. Come look for me. And boy,   
The day you do will be the day you die.   



    Hector to Troy:   
"Soldiers!--   
Unmatched my force, unconquerable my will.   
After ten years of days, in one long day   
To be remembered for as many days   
As there are days to come, this is my day,   
Your Hector's day. Troy given back to Troy.   
My day of victory!   
      And when the cheering died:   
"Some say: destroy Greece now. But I say no.   
Out of your cars. Eat by your fires.   
Two hundred fires! Around each fire   
Five hundred men!   
"The sound of grindstones turning through the night,   
The firelight that stands between our blades,   
So let King Agamemnon's Own hold hands   
And look into each other's frightened eyes.   
"True God! Great Master of the Widespread Sky!   
If only you would turn   
Me into a god,   
As you, through me,   
Tomorrow by their ships   
Will see Greece die.   



    Silence.   



    A ring of lights.   

    Within   

    Immaculate   

    In boat-cloaks lined with red   

    King Agamemnon's lords--   

    The depression of retreat.   
The depression of returning to camp.   
Him at the centre of their circle   
Sobbing,   
Then shouting:   

"We must run for it!   

    Dark glasses in parked cars.   



"King Agamemnon of Mycenae,   
God called, God raised, God recognized,   
You are a piece of shit, Diomed said.   

    Silence again.   

"Let us praise God, Lord Ajax said,   
"That Hector stopped before he reached the ships.   

    Silence again.   

    Then   

    Nestor   
(Putting his knee back in):   

"Paramount Agamemnon, King of Kings,   
Lord of the Shore, the Islands and the Sea   
I shall begin, and end, with you.   
    Greece needs good words. Like them or not, the credit    
            will be yours.   
Determined. Keen to fight, that is our Diomed--   
As I should know. When just a boy of ten I fought   
Blowback of Missolonghi, a cannibal, drank blood,   
He captured you, he buggered you, you never walked again.   
But Diomed lacks experience.   
    God has saved us, momentarily.   
God loves Achilles.   
You took, and you have kept, Achilles' ribband she.   

"I was a fool!   

"And now you must appease him, Agamemnon.   
Humble words. Hands shaken. Gifts.   

    The King--wiping his eyes:   

"As usual,   
Pylos has said the only things worth hearing.   
I was mad to take the she.   
I shall pay fitting damages.   
Plus her, I offer him   
The Corfiot armour that my father wore.   

    Silence.   

    The sea.   

    Its whispering.   

"To which I add: a set of shields.   
Posy, standard, ceremonial.   
The last, cut from the hide of a one ton Lesbian bull.   

    Silence.   

    The sea.   

"And . . . a chariot!   
From my own quipe!   
They smoke along the ground . . .   
They ride its undulations like a breeze . . .   

    The sea.   

"Plus: six horses--saddled, bridled and caparisoned,   
Their grooms and veterinarians . . .   

    . . . And six tall shes:   
Two good dancers, two good stitchers, two good cooks.   
All capable of bearing boys . . .   

"Oh, very well then: twenty loaves of gold,   
The same of silver, and the same of iron.   

    Masks. Lights.   
Behind the lords   
Some hundreds from the army have walked up.   
    Lord Nestor smiles.   
Lord Menelaos smiles.   

"Plus--   
Though it may well reduce your King to destitution:   
    A'kimi'kriex,   
My summer palace by the Argive sea,   
Its lawns, its terraces, its curtains in whose depths   
Larks dive above a field of waving lilies   
And fishscale-breakers shatter on blue rocks.   
Then, as he draws their silky heights aside,   
Standing among huge chests of looted booty,   
Long necked, with lowered lids, but candid eyes,   
My living daughter, phaniss, a diamond   
Big as a cheeseball for her belly stud.   
His wife to be! minus--I need not say--her otherwise huge    
          bride-price.   

"More!   
"More!   
"More!   

    Lord Ajax almost has to hold him up.   

"The whole of eastern Pel'po'nesia--   
An area of outstanding natural beauty--   
Its cities, Epi'dvros, Trw''zen,   
Their fortresses, their harbours and their fleets,   
Their taxpayers--glad to accept his modest ways--   
All this, the greatest benefaction ever known,   
If he agrees to fight. And he admits I am his King.   

    Instantly, Nestor:   

"An offer God himself could not refuse.   
All that remains to say is:   
Who shall take it to Achilles?   

    Agamemnon: "You will.   



    Starlight.   

    The starlight on the sea.   



    The sea.   

    Its whispering   

    Mixed with the prayers   
Of Ajax and of Nestor as they walk   
Along the shore towards Achilles' gate.   



"My lords?   

"Your lord.   

"This way.   



    They find him, with guitar,   
Singing of Gilgamesh.   

"Take my hands. Here they are.   

    You cannot take your eyes away from him.   
His own so bright they slow you down.   
His voice so low, and yet so clear.   
You know that he is dangerous.   



"Patroclus?    
Friends in need.   
    Still,   
Friends.   
    That has not changed,   
I think.   
    Autmedon? Wine.   



"Dear Lord and Master of the Widespread Sky,  
      Accept ourselves, accept our prayers.   



    Their cups are taken.   

"Father friend?   

    King Nestor (for his life):   

"You know why we are here.   
    We face death.   
The mass choose slavery.   
Mycenae has admitted he was wrong to wrong yourself.   
In recompense he offers you   
The greatest benefaction ever known.   
Take it, and fight. Or else Hector will burn the ships   
Then kill us randomly.   
    Remember what your Father said   
The day when Ajax and myself drove up to ask   
If you could come with us to Troy?   
That you should stand among the blades where honour grows.   
And secondly, to let your anger go.   
    Spirit, and strength, and beauty have combined   
Such awesome power in you   
A vacant Heaven would offer you its throne.   
Think of what those who will come after us will say.   
    Save us from Hector's god, from Hector, and from Hector's force.   
I go down on my knees to you, Achilles.   

"I must admire your courage, father friend,   
For treating me as if I was a fool.   
I shall deal with Hector as I want to.   
You and your fellow countrymen will die   
For how your King has treated me.   

    I have spent five years fighting for your King.   
My record is: ten coastal and ten inland cities   
Burnt to the ground. Their males, massacred.   
Their cattle, and their women, given to him.   
Among the rest, Briseis the Beautiful, my ribband she.   
Not that I got her courtesy of him.   
She joined my stock in recognition of   
My strength, my courage, my superiority,   
Courtesy of yourselves, my lords.   
    I will not fight for him.   
He aims to personalise my loss.   
Briseis taken from Achilles--standard practice:   
Helen from Menelaos--war.   
    Lord Busy Busy, building his palisade, mounting my she,   
One that I might have picked to run my house,   
Raising her to the status of a wife.   
    Do I hate him? Yes, I hate him. Hate him.   
And should he be afraid of me? He should.   
I want to harm him. I want him to feel pain.   
In his body, and between his ears.   
    I must admit,   
Some of the things that you have said are true.   
But look what he has done to me! To me!   
The king on whom his kingliness depends!   
I will not fight for him.   
    Hearing your steps, I thought: at last,   
My friends have come to visit me.   
They took their time about it, true--   
After he took my she none of you came--   
Now, though--admittedly they are in trouble,   
Serious trouble--they have arrived as friends,   
And of their own accord.   
    But you have not come here as friends.   
And you have not come of your own accord.   
You came because your King told you to come.   
You came because I am his last resort.   
And, incidentally, your last resort.   

    At least he offers stuff.   
All you have offered is advice:   
Keep your temper . . .   
    Mind your tongue . . .   
    Think what the world will say . . .'   
No mention of your King's treatment of me.   
No sign of love for me behind your tears.   
    I will not fight for him.   
    I can remember very well indeed   
The day you two grand lords came visiting my father's house, 
How I ran out to you, and took your hands--   
The greatest men that I had ever seen:   
Ajax, my fighting cousin, strong, brave, unafraid to   die;   
Nestor, the King of Sandy Pylos, wisdom's sword.   
And then, when all had had enough to eat and drink   
And it was sealed that I should come to Troy,   
Then my dear father said that lordship knows   
Not only how to fight, and when to hold its tongue,   
But of the difference between a child enraged   
And honour bound lords.   
    I will not fight for him.   
    There is a King to be maintained. You are his lords.   
My fighting powers prove my inferiority.   
Whatever he, through you, may grant,   
I must receive it as a favour, not of right,   
Go back to him with downcast looks, a suppliant tone,   
Acknowledge my transgressions--I did not   
Applaud his sticky fingers on my she's meek flesh.   
    My mother says I have a choice:   
Live as a happy backwood king for aye   
Or give the world an everlasting murmur of my name,   
And die.   
    Be up tomorrow sharp   
To see me sacrifice to Lord Poseidon and set sail.   
    Oh, yes, his gifts:   
The greatest benefaction ever known.'   
    If he put Heaven in my hand I would not want it.   
His offers magnify himself.   
    Likewise his child.   
I do not want to trash the girl.   
She is like me. Bad luck to have poor friends.   
Bad luck to have his Kingship as your sire.   
    My father will select my wife.   
Each spring a dozen local kings drive up   
And lead their daughters naked round our yard.   
Some decent local girl. My father's worth   
Is all the wealth we will require.   
    You Greeks will not take Troy.   
You have disintegrated as a fighting force.   
Troy is your cemetery. Blame your King.   
The man who you say has done all he can.   
The man who has admitted he was wrong.   
But he has not done all he can.   
And he has not admitted he was wrong.   
Or not to me.   
    I want him here, your King.   
His arms straight down his sides, his shoulders back,   
Announcing loud and clear that he was wrong to take my she.   
Apologising for that wrong, to me, the son of Pleus.   
Before my followers, with you, Pylos and Salamis,   
Crete. Sparta. Tyrins, Argos, Calydon, the Islands, here,   
Stood to attention on either side of him.   
      That is my offer. Take it, or die.   

    Nestor may stay the night.   
You, dear cousin Ajax, tell your King what I have said.   
Preferably, in front of everyone.   
                      
                                    
                      Who said,   
As my Achilles lifted his guitar:   

"Lord, I was never so bethumped with words   
Since first I called my father Dad.   



    The sea.   
Their feet along the sand to Agamemnon's gate.   
And in starlit air   
The Trojans singing:   

"I love my wife, I love her dearly,   
      I love the hole she pisses through,   
      I love her lily-white tits   
      And her nut-brown arsehole,   
      I could eat her shit with a wooden spoon.





Between Hallowe'en and Bonfire Night
 

Just then, encountering my ruddy face    
in the grand piano's cold black craquelure,    
it conjured the jack-o'-lantern moon    
dipping up over the roofs of the Tenderloin.    
    
Only when I have done with the myths--    
the inner spill that triggers us to flame,    
breasts so sensitive a moment's touch             
will call down fever; the dark sea-lane    
    
between limbic squall and the heart's harbour--    
will I picture you, just beyond innocence,    
lying stripped by a thrown-wide window,    
letting the cool breeze covet your ardour.





The Dipper
 

It was winter, near freezing,   
I'd walked through a forest of firs   
when I saw issue out of the waterfall   
a solitary bird.   

It lit on a damp rock,   
and, as water swept stupidly on,   
wrung from its own throat   
supple, undammable song.   

It isn't mine to give.   
I can't coax this bird to my hand   
that knows the depth of the river   
yet sings of it on land.





Hairless
 

Can the bald lie? The nature of the skin says not: 
it's newborn-pale, erection-tender stuff, 
every thought visible,--pure knowledge, 
mind in action--shining through the skull. 
I saw one, a woman, hairless absolute, cleaning. 
She mopped the green floor, dusted bookshelves, 
all cloth and concentration, Queen of the moon. 
You can tell, with the bald, that the air 
speaks to them differently, touches their heads 
with exquisite expression. As she danced 
her laundry dance with the motes, everything 
she ever knew skittered under her scalp. 
It was clear just from the texture of her head, 
she was about to raise her arms to the sky; 
I covered my ears as she prepared to sing, roar, 
to let the big win resonate in the little room.





The Dead
 

Our business is with fruit and leaf and bloom;    
though they speak with more than just the season's tongue--    
the colours that they blaze from the dark loam    
all have something of the jealous tang    
    
of the dead about them. What do we know of their part    
in this, those secret brothers of the harrow,    
invigorators of the soil--oiling the dirt    
so liberally with their essence, their black marrow?    
    
But here's the question. Are the flower and fruit    
held out to us in love, or merely thrust    
up at us, their masters, like a fist?    
    
Or are they the lords, asleep amongst the roots,    
granting to us in their great largesse    
this hybrid thing--part brute force, part mute kiss?





Magnificat
 

When he had suckled there, he began    
to grow: first, he was an infant in her arms,    
but soon, drinking and drinking at the sweet    
milk she could not keep from filling her,    
from pouring into his ravenous mouth,    
and filling again, miraculous pitcher, mercy    
feeding its own extinction . . . soon he was    
huge, towering above her, the landscape,    
his shadow stealing the color from the fields,      
even the flowers going gray. And they came    
like ants, one behind the next, to worship    
him--huge as he was, and hungry; it was    
his hunger they admired most of all.    
So they brought him slaughtered beasts:    
goats, oxen, bulls, and finally, their own    
kin whose hunger was a kind of shame      
to them, a shrinkage; even as his was      
beautiful to them, magnified, magnificent.      
    
The day came when they had nothing left    
to offer him, having denuded themselves    
of all in order to enlarge him, in whose    
shadow they dreamed of light: and that      
is when the thought began to move, small    
at first, a whisper, then a buzz, and finally,    
it broke out into words, so loud they thought    
it must be prophecy: they would kill him,      
and all they had lost in his name would return,    
renewed and fresh with the dew of morning.    
Hope fed their rage, sharpened their weapons.    
    
And who is she, hooded figure, mourner now    
at the fate of what she fed? And the slow rain,      
which never ends, who is the father of that?      
And who are we who speak, as if the world    
were our diorama--its little figures moved    
by hidden gears, precious in miniature, tin soldiers,    
spears the size of pins, perfect replicas, history    
under glass, dusty, old fashioned, a curiosity    
that no one any longer wants to see,    
excited as they are by the new giant, who feeds    
on air, grows daily on radio waves, in cyberspace,      
who sows darkness like a desert storm,    
who blows like a wind through the Boardrooms, 
 who touches the hills, and they smoke.





And Day Brought Back My Night
 

It was so simple: you came back to me 
And I was happy. Nothing seemed to matter 
But that. That you had gone away from me 
And lived for days with him--it didn't matter. 
That I had been left to care for our old dog 
And house alone--couldn't have mattered less! 
On all this, you and I and our happy dog 
Agreed. We slept. The world was worriless. 

I woke in the morning, brimming with old joys 
Till the fact-checker showed up, late, for work 
And started in: Item: it's years, not days. 
Item: you had no dog. Item: she isn't back, 
In fact, she just remarried. And oh yes, item: you 
Left her, remember? I did? I did. (I do.)





Lady MacBeth's Confession
 

Never mind thick night! Darkness move quick!   
Madness engulf me like Jacob's coat;   
colors tighten like sickness 'round me throat.   
Wha it is do already can't tek back   
but it still got me a wash me hand   
til they sour and callus, de visions   
plaguing de dark a me mind like locust.   

Me conscience no business dem days   
when me could grin up and skin teet 1    
inna company of great men   
who smile up smile up wid me   
an looking fava 2  inna secret eyes an backdoor smiles.   
I know say woman like me plain wicked an conniving:   
stinkin' wid ambition, smilin' close against you skin,   
seeking confession wid de devil.   

Now so, me lay up inna bed wid death   
a-write me love letter. Got me   
a crave colors to soothe me spirit;   
red never could please me,   
purple grind like a grater on me cheek,   
orange sting like a ledda on me hot skin,   
and white--mek me breast feel weight down   
wid milk, got me head swirling like inna hurricane.   
I chew down me bitter nails til I taste de poison

1 be insincere; 2 special treatment





Suburban Pastoral
 

Twilight folds over houses on our street;   
its hazy gold is gilding our front lawns,   
delineating asphalt and concrete   
driveways with shadows. Evening is coming on,   
quietly, like a second drink, the beers   
men hold while rising from their plastic chairs   
to stand above their sprinklers, and approve.   

Soon the fireflies will rise in lucent droves--   
for now, however, everything seems content   
to settle into archetypal grooves:   
the toddler's portraits chalked out on cement,   
mothers in windows, finishing the dishes.   
Chuck Connelly's cigarette has burned to ashes;   
he talks politics to Roger in the drive.   

"It's all someone can do just to survive,"   
he says, and nods--both nod--and pops another   
beer from the cooler. "No rain. Would you believe--"   
says Chuck, checking the paper for the weather.   
At least a man can keep his yard in shape.   
Somewhere beyond this plotted cityscape   
their sons drive back and forth in borrowed cars:   

how small their city seems now, and how far   
away they feel from last year, when they rode   
their bikes to other neighborhoods, to score   
a smoke or cop a feel in some girl's bed.   
They tune the radio to this summer's song   
and cruise into the yet-to-exhale lung   
of August night. Nothing to do but this.   

These are the times they'd never dream they'll miss--   
the hour spent chasing a party long burned out,   
graphic imagined intercourse with Denise.   
This is all they can even think about,   
and thankfully, since what good would it do   
to choke on madeleines of   temps perdu    
when so much time is set aside for that?   

Not that their fathers weaken with regret   
as nighttime settles in--no, their wives   
are on the phone, the cooler has Labatt   
to spare; at nine the Giants play the Braves.   
There may be something to romanticize   
about their own first cars, the truths and lies   
they told their friends about some summer fling,   

but what good is it now, when anything   
recalled is two parts true and one part false?   
When no one can remember just who sang   
that song that everybody loved? What else?   
It doesn't come to mind. The sprinkler spits   
in metronome; they're out of cigarettes.   
Roger folds up his chair, calls it a day.   

The stars come out in cosmic disarray,   
and windows flash with television blues.   
The husbands come to bed, nothing to say   
but   'night . Two hours late--with some excuse--   
their sons come home, too full of songs and girls   
to notice dew perfect its muted pearls   
or countless crickets singing for a mate.





On the Birth of a Son
 

Families when a child is born
Hope it will turn out intelligent.
I, through intelligence
Having wrecked my whole life,
Only hope that the baby will prove
Ignorant and stupid.
Then he'll be happy all his days
And grow into a cabinet minister.





First Fig
 


My candle burns at both ends;
    It will not last the night;
 But ah, my foes, and oh, my friends--
    It gives a lovely light!





People
 

The great gold apples of night
Hang from the street's long bough
       Dripping their light
On the faces that drift below,
On the faces that drift and blow
Down the night-time, out of sight
       In the wind's sad sough.

The ripeness of these apples of night
Distilling over me
       Makes sickening the white
Ghost-flux of faces that hie
Them endlessly, endlessly by
Without meaning or reason why
       They ever should be.





To a Grey Dress
 

There's a flutter of grey through the trees:
   Ah, the exquisite curves of her dress as she passes
   Fleet with her feet on the path where the grass is!

I see not her face, I but see
   The swift re-appearance, the flitting persistence--
   There!--of that flutter of grey in the distance.

It has flickered and fluttered away:
   What a teasing regret she has left in my day-dream,
   And what dreams of delight are the dreams that one may 
         dream!

It was only a flutter of grey;
   But the vaguest of raiment's impossible chances
   Has set my heart beating the way of old dances.





Dreams
 

                                  I

To dream of love, and, waking, to remember you:
As though, being dead, one dreamed of heaven, and woke
      in hell.
At night my lovely dreams forget the old farewell:
Ah! wake not by his side, lest you remember too!



                                  II

I set all Rome between us: with what joy I set
The wonder of the world against my world's delight!
Rome, that hast conquered worlds, with intellectual might
Capture my heart, and teach my memory to forget!





Bilbea
 

(From tablet writing, Babylonian excavations of the 4th millennium B.C.)
Bilbea, I was in Babylon on Saturday night.
I saw nothing of you anywhere.
I was at the old place and the other girls were there, 
But no Bilbea.

Have you gone to another house? or city?
Why don't you write?
I was sorry. I walked home half-sick.

Tell me how it goes.
Send me some kind of a letter.
And take care of yourself.






The Root
 

Love faded in my heart--
I thought it was dead.
Now new flowers start,
Fresh leaves outspread.
Why do these flowers upstart
And again the leaves spread?
Oh, when will it be dead--
This root that tears my heart!






The Man Moves Earth
 

The man moves earth 
to dispel grief. 
He digs holes 
the size of cars. 
In proportion to what is taken 
what is given multiplies-- 
rain-swollen ponds 
and dirt mounds 
rooted with flame-tipped flowers. 
He carries trees like children 
struggling to be set down. 
Trees that have lived 
out their lives, 
he cuts and stacks 
like loaves of bread 
which he will feed the fire. 
The green smoke sweetens 
his house. 

The woman sweeps air 
to banish sadness. 
She dusts floors, 
polishes objects 
made of clay and wood. 
In proportion to what is taken 
what is given multiplies-- 
the task of something 
else to clean. 
Gleaming appliances 
beg to be smudged, 
breathed upon by small children 
and large animals 
flicking out hope 
as she whirls by, 
flap of tongue, 
scratch of paw, 
sweetly reminding her. 

The man moves earth, 
the woman sweeps air. 
Together they pull water 
out of the other, 
pull with the muscular 
ache of the living, 
hauling from the deep 
well of the body 
the rain-swollen, 
the flame-tipped, 
the milk-fed-- 
all that cycles 
through lives moving, 
lives sweeping, water 
circulating between them 
like breath, 
drawn out of leaves by light.





Recuerdo
 

We were very tired, we were very merry--

We had gone back and forth all night on the ferry.

It was bare and bright, and smelled like a stable--

But we looked into a fire, we leaned across a table,

We lay on a hill-top underneath the moon;

And the whistles kept blowing, and the dawn came soon. 


We were very tired, we were very merry--

We had gone back and forth all night on the ferry; 

And you ate an apple, and I ate a pear, 

From a dozen of each we had bought somewhere; 

And the sky went wan, and the wind came cold, 

And the sun rose dripping, a bucketful of gold. 


We were very tired, we were very merry,

We had gone back and forth all night on the ferry.

We hailed, Good morrow, mother! to a shawl-covered head, 

And bought a morning paper, which neither of us read;

And she wept, God bless you! for the apples and pears,

And we gave her all our money but our subway fares.





End of the Comedy
 

Eleven o'clock, and the curtain falls.
The cold wind tears the strands of illusion; 
The delicate music is lost
In the blare of home-going crowds
And a midnight paper.

The night has grown martial;
It meets us with blows and disaster. 
Even the stars have turned shrapnel, 
Fixed in silent explosions.
And here at our door 
The moonlight is laid 
Like a drawn sword.






Kalamazoo
 

Once, in the city of Kalamazoo,   
The gods went walking, two and two,   
With the friendly phoenix, the stars of Orion,   
The speaking pony and singing lion.   
For in Kalamazoo in a cottage apart   
Lived the girl with the innocent heart. 

Thenceforth the city of Kalamazoo   
Was the envied, intimate chum of the sun.   
He rose from a cave by the principal street.   
The lions sang, the dawn-horns blew,   
And the ponies danced on silver feet.   
He hurled his clouds of love around;   
Deathless colors of his old heart 
Draped the houses and dyed the ground.   
O shrine of the wide young Yankee land,   
Incense city of Kalamazoo,   
That held, in the midnight, the priceless sun   
As a jeweller holds an opal in hand! 

From the awkward city of Oshkosh came 
Love the bully no whip shall tame, 
Bringing his gang of sinners bold. 
And I was the least of his Oshkosh men; 
But none were reticent, none were old. 
And we joined the singing phoenix then, 
And shook the lilies of Kalamazoo   
All for one hidden butterfly.   
Bulls of glory, in cars of war   
We charged the boulevards, proud to die   
For her ribbon sailing there on high.   
Our blood set gutters all aflame,   
Where the sun slept without any heat-- 
Cold rock till he must rise again.   
She made great poets of wolf-eyed men-- 
The dear queen-bee of Kalamazoo,   
With her crystal wings, and her honey heart.   
We fought for her favors a year and a day   
(Oh, the bones of the dead, the Oshkosh dead,   
That were scattered along her pathway red!)   
And then, in her harum-scarum way,   
She left with a passing traveller-man-- 
With a singing Irishman   
Went to Japan. 

Why do the lean hyenas glare 
Where the glory of Artemis had begun-- 
Of Atalanta, Joan of Arc, 
Cinderella, Becky Thatcher, 
And Orphant Annie, all in one? 
Who burned this city of Kalamazoo 
Till nothing was left but a ribbon or two-- 
One scorched phoenix that mourned in the dew, 
Acres of ashes, a junk-man's cart, 
A torn-up letter, a dancing shoe, 
(And the bones of the dead, the dead)? 
Who burned this city of Kalamazoo-- 
Love-town, Troy-town Kalamazoo? 

A harum-scarum innocent heart.





Davy Jones' Door-Bell
 

A Chant for Boys with Manly Voices
(Every line sung one step deeper than the line preceding)
Any sky-bird sings,
         Ring, ring!
Any church-chime rings,
         Dong ding!
Any cannon says,
         Boom bang!
Any whirlwind says,
         Whing whang!
The bell-buoy hums and roars,
         Ding dong!
And way down deep,
Where fishes throng,
By Davy Jones' big deep?sea door,
Shaking the ocean's flowery floor,
His door-bell booms
         Dong dong,
         Dong dong,
Deep, deep down,
         Clang boom,
         Boom dong.





The Horrid Voice of Science
 

"There's machinery in the butterfly;
         There's a mainspring to the bee;
There's hydraulics to a daisy,
         And contraptions to a tree.

"If we could see the birdie
         That makes the chirping sound
With x-ray, scientific eyes,
    We could see the wheels go round."

And I hope all men 
Who think like this 
Will soon lie 
Underground.





The Artist
 

Why do you subdue yourself in golds and purples?   
Why do you dim yourself with folded silks? 
Do you not see that I can buy brocades in any draper's shop,   
And that I am choked in the twilight of all these colors. 
How pale you would be, and startling--   
How quiet; 
But your curves would spring upward   
Like a clear jet of flung water, 
You would quiver like a shot-up spray of water,   
You would waver, and relapse, and tremble.   
And I too should tremble, 
Watching. 

Murex-dyes and tinsel-- 
And yet I think I could bear your beauty unshaded.





Autumn
 

All day I have watched the purple vine leaves
Fall into the water.
And now in the moonlight they still fall,
But each leaf is fringed with silver.





from Pecksniffiana: Fabliau of Florida
 

Barque of phosphor
 On the palmy beach,
  
 Move outward into heaven,
 Into the alabasters
 And night blues.
  
 Foam and cloud are one.
 Sultry moon-monster
 Are dissolving.
  
 Fill your black hull
 With white moonlight.
  
 There will never be an end
 To this droning of the surf.






Anecdote of the Jar
 

I placed a jar in Tennessee,   
And round it was, upon a hill.   
It made the slovenly wilderness   
Surround that hill. 

The wilderness rose up to it, 
And sprawled around, no longer wild.   
The jar was round upon the ground   
And tall and of a port in air. 

It took dominion everywhere.   
The jar was gray and bare. 
It did not give of bird or bush,   
Like nothing else in Tennessee.





A Prayer for My Daughter
 

Once more the storm is howling, and half hid   
Under this cradle-hood and coverlid   
My child sleeps on. There is no obstacle   
But Gregory's Wood and one bare hill   
Whereby the haystack and roof-levelling wind,   
Bred on the Atlantic, can be stayed;   
And for an hour I have walked and prayed   
Because of the great gloom that is in my mind. 

I have walked and prayed for this young child an hour, 
And heard the sea-wind scream upon the tower, 
And under the arches of the bridge, and scream 
In the elms above the flooded stream; 
Imagining in excited reverie 
That the future years had come   
Dancing to a frenzied drum   
Out of the murderous innocence of the sea. 

May she be granted beauty, and yet not   
Beauty to make a stranger's eye distraught,   
Or hers before a looking-glass; for such,   
Being made beautiful overmuch,   
Consider beauty a sufficient end,   
Lose natural kindness, and maybe   
The heart-revealing intimacy   
That chooses right, and never find a friend. 

Helen, being chosen, found life flat and dull,   
And later had much trouble from a fool;   
While that great Queen that rose out of the spray,   
Being fatherless, could have her way,   
Yet chose a bandy-leggd smith for man.   
It's certain that fine women eat   
A crazy salad with their meat   
Whereby the Horn of Plenty is undone. 

In courtesy I'd have her chiefly learned;   
Hearts are not had as a gift, but hearts are earned   
By those that are not entirely beautiful.   
Yet many, that have played the fool 
For beauty's very self, has charm made wise;   
And many a poor man that has roved,   
Loved and thought himself beloved,   
From a glad kindness cannot take his eyes. 

May she become a flourishing hidden tree,   
That all her thoughts may like the linnet be,   
And have no business but dispensing round   
Their magnanimities of sound;   
Nor but in merriment begin a chase,   
Nor but in merriment a quarrel.   
Oh, may she live like some green laurel   
Rooted in one dear perpetual place. 

My mind, because the minds that I have loved,   
The sort of beauty that I have approved,   
Prosper but little, has dried up of late,   
Yet knows that to be choked with hate   
May well be of all evil chances chief.   
If there's no hatred in a mind   
Assault and battery of the wind   
Can never tear the linnet from the leaf. 

An intellectual hatred is the worst,   
So let her think opinions are accursed.   
Have I not seen the loveliest woman born 
Out of the mouth of Plenty's horn,   
Because of her opinionated mind   
Barter that horn and every good   
By quiet natures understood   
For an old bellows full of angry wind? 

Considering that, all hatred driven hence,   
The soul recovers radical innocence   
And learns at last that it is self-delighting, 
Self-appeasing, self-affrighting,   
And that its own sweet will is heaven's will,   
She can, though every face should scowl   
And every windy quarter howl   
Or every bellows burst, be happy still. 

And may her bridegroom bring her to a house   
Where all's accustomed, ceremonious;   
For arrogance and hatred are the wares   
Peddled in the thoroughfares.   
How but in custom and in ceremony   
Are innocence and beauty born?   
Ceremony's a name for the rich horn,   
And custom for the spreading laurel tree.





Silence
 

There is the sudden silence of the crowd 

above a player not moving on the field, 

and the silence of the orchid. 


The silence of the falling vase 

before it strikes the oor, 

the silence of the belt when it is not striking the child. 


The stillness of the cup and the water in it, 

the silence of the moon 

and the quiet of the day far from the roar of the sun. 


The silence when I hold you to my chest, 

the silence of the window above us, 

and the silence when you rise and turn away. 


And there is the silence of this morning 

which I have broken with my pen, 

a silence that had piled up all night 


like snow falling in the darkness of the house-- 

the silence before I wrote a word 

and the poorer silence now.





Sea-Wash
 

The sea-wash never ends.
The sea-wash repeats, repeats.
Only old songs? Is that all the sea knows?
             Only the old strong songs?
             Is that all?
The sea-wash repeats, repeats.






The Widows Lament in Springtime
 

Sorrow is my own yard 
where the new grass 
flames as it has flamed 
often before, but not 
with the cold fire 
that closes round me this year. 
Thirty-five years 
I lived with my husband. 
The plum tree is white today 
with masses of flowers. 
Masses of flowers 
load the cherry branches 
and color some bushes 
yellow and some red, 
but the grief in my heart 
is stronger than they, 
for though they were my joy 
formerly, today I notice them 
and turn away forgetting. 
Today my son told me 
that in the meadows, 
at the edge of the heavy woods 
in the distance, he saw 
trees of white flowers. 
I feel that I would like 
to go there 
and fall into those flowers 
and sink into the marsh near them.





Leave-Taking
 

I do not know where either of us can turn 
Just at first, waking from the sleep of each other. 
I do not know how we can bear 
The river struck by the gold plummet of the moon, 
Or many trees shaken together in the darkness. 
We shall wish not to be alone 
And that love were not dispersed and set free-- 
Though you defeat me, 
And I be heavy upon you. 

But like earth heaped over the heart 
Is love grown perfect. 
Like a shell over the beat of life 
Is love perfect to the last. 
So let it be the same 
Whether we turn to the dark or to the kiss of another; 
Let us know this for leavetaking, 
That I may not be heavy upon you, 
That you may blind me no more. 






To a Dead Lover
 

The dark is thrown 
Back from the brightness, like hair 
Cast over a shoulder. 
I am alone, 

Four years older; 
Like the chairs and the walls 
Which I once watched brighten 
With you beside me. I was to waken 
Never like this, whatever came or was taken. 

The stalk grows, the year beats on the wind. 
Apples come, and the month for their fall. 
The bark spreads, the roots tighten. 
Though today be the last 
Or tomorrow all, 
You will not mind. 

That I may not remember 
Does not matter. 
I shall not be with you again. 
What we knew, even now 
Must scatter 
And be ruined, and blow 
Like dust in the rain. 

You have been dead a long season 
And have less than desire 
Who were lover with lover; 
And I have life--that old reason 
To wait for what comes, 
To leave what is over. 






Ars Poetica
 

A poem should be palpable and mute   
As a globed fruit, 

Dumb 
As old medallions to the thumb, 

Silent as the sleeve-worn stone 
Of casement ledges where the moss has grown-- 

A poem should be wordless   
As the flight of birds. 

                         *               

A poem should be motionless in time   
As the moon climbs, 

Leaving, as the moon releases 
Twig by twig the night-entangled trees, 

Leaving, as the moon behind the winter leaves,   
Memory by memory the mind-- 

A poem should be motionless in time   
As the moon climbs. 

                         *               

A poem should be equal to: 
Not true. 

For all the history of grief 
An empty doorway and a maple leaf. 

For love 
The leaning grasses and two lights above the sea-- 

A poem should not mean   
But be. 








Blue Juniata
 

Farmhouses curl like horns of plenty, hide   
scrawny bare shanks against a barn, or crouch   
empty in the shadow of a mountain. Here   
there is no house at all-- 

only the bones of a house, 
lilacs growing beside them, 
roses in clumps between them,   
honeysuckle over; 
a gap for a door, a chimney 
mud-chinked, an immense fireplace,   
the skeleton of a pine, 

and gandy dancers working on the rails 
that run not thirty yards from the once door. 

I heard a gandy dancer playing on a jew's harp   
Where is now that merry party I remember long ago?   
Nelly was a lady ... twice ... Old Black Joe, 
as if he laid his right hand on my shoulder, 
saying, "Your father lived here long ago, 
your father's father built the house, lies buried   
under the pine-- 
                         Sing Nelly was a lady   
... Blue Juniata ... Old Black Joe: 

for sometimes a familiar music hammers 
like blood against the eardrums, paints a mist   
across the eyes, as if the smells of lilacs,   
moss roses, and the past became a music   
made visible, a monument of air.





Counsel to Unreason
 

These lovers' inklings which our loves enmesh,   
Lost to the cunning and dimensional eye,   
Though tenemented in the selves we see,   
Not more perforce than azure to the sky,   
Were necromancy-juggled to the flesh,   
And startled from no daylight you or me. 

For trance and silvemess those moons commend,   
Which blanch the warm life silver-pale; or look   
What ghostly portent mist distorts from slight   
Clay shapes; the willows that the waters took   
Liquid and brightened in the waters bend,   
And we, in love's reflex, seemed loved of right. 

Then no more think to net forthwith love's thing,   
But cast for it by spirit sleight-of-hand; 
Then only in the slant glass contemplate,   
Where lineament outstripping line is scanned,   
Then on the perplexed text leave pondering,   
Love's proverb is set down transliterate.





from The Bridge: Cutty Sark
 

I met a man in South Street, tall-- 
a nervous shark tooth swung on his chain.   
His eyes pressed through green glass   
--green glasses, or bar lights made them   
so-- 
      shine-- 
                GREEN-- 
                           eyes-- 
stepped out--forgot to look at you 
or left you several blocks away-- 

in the nickel-in-the-slot piano jogged 
"Stamboul Nights--weaving somebody's nickel--sang-- 

      O Stamboul Rose--dreams weave the rose! 

            Murmurs of Leviathan he spoke,   
            and rum was Plato in our heads . . . 

"It's S.S. Ala--Antwerp--now remember kid   
to put me out at three she sails on time.   
I'm not much good at time any more keep 
weakeyed watches sometimes snooze-- his bony hands   
got to beating time . . . "A whaler once-- 
I ought to keep time and get over it--I'm a   
Democrat--I know what time it is--No   
I don't want to know what time it is--that   
damned white Arctic killed my time . . .  

      O Stamboul Rose--drums weave-- 

"I ran a donkey engine down there on the Canal   
in Panama--got tired of that-- 
then Yucatan selling kitchenware--beads-- 
have you seen Popocatepetl--birdless mouth   
with ashes sifting down--? 
                                          and then the coast again . . .  

      Rose of Stamboul O coral Queen-- 
      teased remnants of the skeletons of cities-- 
      and galleries, galleries of watergutted lava   
      snarling stone--green--drums--drown-- 

Sing! 
"--that spiracle! he shot a finger out the door . . .   
"O life's a geyser--beautiful--my lungs-- 
No--I can't live on land--!" 

I saw the frontiers gleaming of his mind; 
or are there frontiers--running sands sometimes   
running sands--somewhere--sands running . . . 
Or they may start some white machine that sings.   
Then you may laugh and dance the axletree-- 
steel--silver--kick the traces--and know-- 

      ATLANTIS ROSE drums wreathe the rose,   
      the star floats burning in a gulf of tears   
      and sleep another thousand-- 

                                              interminably 
long since somebody's nickel--stopped-- 
playing-- 

A wind worried those wicker-neat lapels, the   
swinging summer entrances to cooler hells . . .   
Outside a wharf truck nearly ran him down   
--he lunged up Bowery way while the dawn 
was putting the Statue of Liberty out--that   
torch of hers you know-- 

I started walking home across the Bridge . . . 

                  .         .         .         .         .          

Blithe Yankee vanities, turreted sprites, winged 
                                           British repartees, skil-          
ful savage sea-girls            
that bloomed in the spring--Heave, weave 
those bright designs the trade winds drive . . . 

      Sweet opium and tea, Yo-ho! 
      Pennies for porpoises that bank the keel!   
      Fins whip the breeze around Japan! 

Bright skysails ticketing the Line, wink round the Horn   
to Frisco, Melbourne . . . 
                                       Pennants, parabolas-- 
clipper dreams indelible and ranging,   
baronial white on lucky blue! 

      Perennial-Cutty-trophied-Sark! 

Thermopylae, Black Prince, Flying Cloud through Sunda   
--scarfed of foam, their bellies veered green esplanades,   
locked in wind-humors, ran their eastings down; 

      at Java Head freshened the nip   
      (sweet opium and tea!) 
      and turned and left us on the lee . . . 

Buntlines tusseling (91 days, 20 hours and anchored!)   
                                                    Rainbow, Leander 
(last trip a tragedy)--where can you be 
Nimbus? and you rivals two-- 

            a long tack keeping-- 
                                           Taeping?   
                                          Ariel?





O Carib Isle!
 

O Carib Isle! 

The tarantula rattling at the lily's foot 
Across the feet of the dead, laid in white sand   
Near the coral beach--nor zigzag fiddle crabs   
Side-stilting from the path (that shift, subvert 
And anagrammatize your name)--No, nothing here   
Below the palsy that one eucalyptus lifts   
In wrinkled shadows--mourns. 

                                        And yet suppose 
I count these nacreous frames of tropic death,   
Brutal necklaces of shells around each grave   
Squared off so carefully. Then 

To the white sand I may speak a name, fertile 
Albeit in a stranger tongue. Tree names, flower names   
Deliberate, gainsay death's brittle crypt. Meanwhile   
The wind that knots itself in one great death-- 
Coils and withdraws. So syllables want breath. 

But where is the Captain of this doubloon isle 
Without a turnstile? Who but catchword crabs 
Patrols the dry groins of the underbrush? 
What man, or What 
Is Commissioner of mildew throughout the ambushed senses?   
His Carib mathematics web the eyes' baked lenses! 

Under the poinciana, of a noon or afternoon 
Let fiery blossoms clot the light, render my ghost   
Sieved upward, white and black along the air   
Until it meets the blue's comedian host. 

Let not the pilgrim see himself again 
For slow evisceration bound like those huge terrapin   
Each daybreak on the wharf, their brine-caked eyes; 
--Spiked, overturned; such thunder in their strain!   
And clenched beaks coughing for the surge again! 

Slagged of the hurricane--I, cast within its flow,   
Congeal by afternoons here, satin and vacant. 
You have given me the shell, Satan,--carbonic amulet   
Sere of the sun exploded in the sea.





Villon
 

I 

He whom we anatomized 
whose words we gathered as pleasant flowers 
and thought on his wit and how neatly he described things'   
speaks 
to us, hatching marrow, 
broody all night over the bones of a deadman. 

My tongue is a curve in the ear. Vision is lies. 
We saw is so and it was not so, 
the Emperor with the Golden Hands, the Virgin in blue.   
(--A blazing parchment, 
Matthew Paris his kings in blue and gold.) 

It was not so, 
scratched on black by God knows who,   
by God, by God knows who. 

In the dark in fetters 
on bended elbows I supported my weak back 
hulloing to muffled walls blank again 
unresonant. It was gone, is silent, is always silent. 
My soundbox lacks sonority. All but inaudible 
I stammer to my ear: 
Naked speech! Naked beggar both blind and cold! 
Wrap it for my sake in Paisley shawls and bright soft fabric,   
wrap it in curves and cover it with sleek lank hair. 

What trumpets? What bright hands? Fetters, it was the Emperor   
with magic in darkness, I unforewained. 
The golden hands are not in Averrhoes, 
eyes lie and this swine's fare bread and water 
makes my head wuzz. Have pity, have pity on me! 

To the right was darkness and to the left hardness   
below hardness darkness above 
at the feet darkness at the head partial hardness   
with equal intervals without 
to the left moaning and beyond a scurry.   
In those days rode the good Lorraine 
whom English burned at Rouen, 
the day's bones whitening in centuries' dust. 

Then he saw his ghosts glitter with golden hands,   
the Emperor sliding up and up from his tomb   
alongside Charles. These things are not obliterate.   
White gobs spitten for mockery; 
and I too shall have CY GIST, written over me. 

Remember, imbeciles and wits,   
sots and ascetics, fair and foul,   
young girls with little tender tits,   
that DEATH is written over all. 

Worn hides that scarcely clothe the soul   
they are so rotten, old and thin, 
or firm and soft and warm and full--   
fellmonger Death gets every skin. 

All that is piteous, all that's fair,   
all that is fat and scant of breath,   
Elisha's baldness, Helen's hair,   
is Death's collateral: 

Three score and ten years after sight   
of this pay me your pulse and breath   
value received. And who dare cite,   
as we forgive our debtors, Death? 

Abelard and Eloise, 
Henry the Fowler, Charlemagne,   
Gene, Lopokova, all these 
die, die in pain. 

And General Grant and General Lee,   
Patti and Florence Nightingale,   
like Tyro and Antiope 
drift among ghosts in Hell, 

know nothing, are nothing, save a fume   
driving across a mind 
preoccupied with this: our doom   
is, to be sifted by the wind, 

heaped up, smoothed down like silly sands.   
We are less permanent than thought. 
The Emperor with the Golden Hands 

is still a word, a tint, a tone, 
insubstantial-glorious, 
when we ourselves are dead and gone   
and the green grass growing over us. 


II 

Let his days be few and let 
his bishoprick pass to another, 
for he fed me on carrion and on a dry crust,   
mouldy bread that his dogs had vomited, 
I lying on my back in the dark place, in the grave,   
fettered to a post in the damp cellarage. 
            Whereinall we differ not. But they have swept the floor,   
there are no dancers, no somersaulters now,   
only bricks and bleak black cement and bricks,   
only the military tread and the snap of the locks. 
            Mine was a threeplank bed whereon   
I lay and cursed the weary sun. 
They took away the prison clothes 
and on the frosty nights I froze. 
I had a Bible where I read 
that Jesus came to raise the dead-- 
I kept myself from going mad 
by singing an old bawdy ballad 
and birds sang on my windowsill 
and tortured me till I was ill, 
but Archipiada came to me 
and comforted my cold body 
and Circe excellent utterer of her mind 
lay with me in that dungeon for a year 
making a silk purse from an old sow's ear 
till Ronsard put a thimble on her tongue. 
    Whereinall we differ not. But they have named all the stars,   
trodden down the scrub of the desert, run the white moon to a schedule,   
Joshua's serf whose beauty drove men mad. 
They have melted the snows from Erebus, weighed the clouds,   
hunted down the white bear, hunted the whale the seal the kangaroo,   
they have set private enquiry agents onto Archipiada: 
What is your name? Your maiden name? 
Go in there to be searched. I suspect it is not your true name.   
Distinguishing marks if any? (O anthropometrics!) 
Now the thumbprints for filing. 
Colour of hair? of eyes? of hands? O Bertillon! 
How many golden prints on the smudgy page? 
Homer? Adest. Dante? Adest. 
Adsunt omnes, omnes et 
Villon. 
Villon? 
Blacked by the sun, washed by the rain, 
hither and thither scurrying as the wind varies. 


III 

Under the olive trees   
walking alone 
on the green terraces   
very seldom 
over the sea seldom 
where it ravelled and spun 
blue tapestries white and green 
gravecloths of men   
Romans and modern men   
and the men of the sea 
who have neither nation nor time 
on the mountains seldom   
the white mountains beyond 
or the brown mountains between 
and their drifting echoes 
in the clouds and over the sea 
in shrines on their ridges 
the goddess of the country 
silverplated in silk and embroidery 
with offerings of pictures 
little ships and arms   
below me the ports   
with naked breasts   
shipless spoiled sacked   
because of the beauty of Helen 

precision clarifying vagueness; 
boundary to a wilderness 
of detail; chisel voice 
smoothing the flanks of noise; 
catalytic making whisper and whisper   
run together like two drops of quicksilver;   
factor that resolves 
                        unnoted harmonies; 
name of the nameless; 
                        stuff that clings 
to frigid limbs 
                        more marble hard 
than girls imagined by Mantegna ...   

The sea has no renewal, no forgetting,   
no variety of death, 
is silent with the silence of a single note. 

How can I sing with my love in my bosom?   
Unclean, immature and unseasonable salmon.





Midsummer
 

The adolescent night, breath of the town,   
Porchswings and whispers, maple leaves unseen   
Deploying moonlight quieter than a man dead   
After the locust's song. These homes were mine   
And are not now forever, these on the steps   
Children I think removed to many places, 
Lost among hushed years, and so strangely known. 

This business is well ended. If in the dark 
The firefly made his gleam and sank therefrom,   
Yet someone's hand would have him, the wet grass   
Bed him no more. From corners of the lawn 
The dusk-white dresses flutter and are past. 
Before our bed time there were things to say,   
Remembering tree-bark, crickets, and the first star 

After, and as the sullenness of time 
Went on from summer, here in a land alien   
Made I my perfect fears and flower of thought:   
Sleep being no longer swift in the arms of pain,   
Revisitations are convenient with a cough,   
And there is something I would say again   
If I had not forever, if there were time.





Sylvesters Dying Bed
 

I woke up this mornin'   
'Bout half-past three.   
All the womens in town   
Was gathered round me. 

Sweet gals was a-moanin',   
"Sylvester's gonna die! 
And a hundred pretty mamas   
Bowed their heads to cry. 

I woke up little later 
'Bout half-past fo', 
The doctor n' undertaker's   
Both at ma do'. 

Black gals was a-beggin', 
"You can't leave us here!   
Brown-skins cryin', "Daddy!   
Honey! Baby! Don't go, dear! 

But I felt ma time's a-comin',   
And I know'd I's dyin' fast. 
I seed the River Jerden 
A-creepin' muddy past-- 
But I's still Sweet Papa 'Vester,   
Yes, sir! Long as life do last! 

So I hollers, "Com'ere, babies,   
Fo' to love yo' daddy right! 
And I reaches up to hug 'em-- 
When the Lawd put out the light. 

Then everything was darkness   
In a great ... big ... night.





from First Book of Odes: 13. Fearful Symmetry
 

Muzzle and jowl and beastly brow, 
bilious glaring eyes, tufted ears, 
recidivous criminality in the slouch, 
--This is not the latest absconding bankrupt 
but a beautiful' tiger imported at great expense from   
Kuala Lumpur. 

7 photographers, 4 black-and-white artists and an R.A.   
are taking his profitable likeness;   
28 reporters and an essayist 
are writing him up. 
Sundry ladies think he is a darling   
especially at mealtimes, observing 
that a firm near the docks advertises replicas 
fullgrown on approval for easy cash payments. 

Felis Tigris (Straits Settlements) (Bobo) takes exercise   
up and down his cage before feeding 
in a stench of excrements of great cats 
indifferent to beauty or brutality. 
He is said to have eaten several persons 
but of course you can never be quite sure of these things. 







Chomei at Toyama
 

(Kamo-no-Chomei, born at Kamo 1154, died at Toyama on Mount Hino, 24th June 1216)  
Swirl sleeping in the waterfall! 
On motionless pools scum appearing   
                     disappearing! 

Eaves formal on the zenith,   
lofty city Kyoto, 
wealthy, without antiquities! 

Housebreakers clamber about,   
builders raising floor upon floor   
at the corner sites, replacing   
gardens by bungalows. 

In the town where I was known   
the young men stare at me.   
A few faces I know remain. 

Whence comes man at his birth? or where   
does death lead him? Whom do you mourn?   
Whose steps wake your delight? 
Dewy hibiscus dries: though dew 
outlast the petals. 

I have been noting events forty years. 

On the twentyseventh May eleven hundred   
and seventyseven, eight p.m., fire broke out   
at the corner of Tomi and Higuchi streets.   
In a night 
palace, ministries, university, parliament   
were destroyed. As the wind veered 
flames spread out in the shape of an open fan.   
Tongues torn by gusts stretched and leapt. 
In the sky clouds of cinders lit red with the blaze. 
Some choked, some burned, some barely escaped.   
Sixteen great officials lost houses and 
very many poor. A third of the city burned;   
several thousands died; and of beasts, 
limitless numbers. 

Men are fools to invest in real estate. 

Three years less three days later a wind 
starting near the outer boulevard 
broke a path a quarter mile across 
to Sixth Avenue. 
Not a house stood. Some were felled whole, 
some in splinters; some had left 
great beams upright in the ground 
and round about 
lay rooves scattered where the wind flung them. 
Flocks of furniture in the air, 
everything flat fluttered like dead leaves. 
A dust like fog or smoke, 
you could hear nothing for the roar, 
                      bufera infernal! 
Lamed some, wounded some.   
This cyclone turned southwest. 

Massacre without cause.   

Portent? 

The same year thunderbolted change of capital,   
fixed here, Kyoto, for ages. 
Nothing compelled the change nor was it an easy matter 
but the grumbling was disproportionate.   
We moved, those with jobs 
or wanting jobs or hangers on of the rest,   
in haste haste fretting to be the first.   
Rooftrees overhanging empty rooms;   
dismounted: floating down the river.   
The soil returned to heath. 

I visited the new site narrow and too uneven, 
cliffs and marshes, deafening shores, perpetual strong winds; 
the palace a logcabin dumped amongst the hills   
(yet not altogether inelegant). 
There was no flat place for houses, many vacant lots,   
the former capital wrecked, the new a camp, 
and thoughts like clouds changing, frayed by a breath:   
peasants bewailing lost land, newcomers aghast at prices.   
No one in uniform: the crowds 
resembled demobilized conscripts. 

There were murmurs. Time defined them.   
In the winter the decree was rescinded,   
we returned to Kyoto; 
but the houses were gone and none 
could afford to rebuild them. 

I have heard of a time when kings beneath bark rooves   
watched chimneys. 
When smoke was scarce, taxes were remitted. 

To appreciate present conditions   
collate them with those of antiquity. 

Drought, floods, and a dearth. Two fruitless autumns.   
Empty markets, swarms of beggars. Jewels 
sold for a handful of rice. Dead stank 
on the curb, lay so thick on 
Riverside Drive a car couldnt pass. 
The pest bred. 
That winter my fuel was the walls of my own house. 

Fathers fed their children and died, 
babies died sucking the dead. 
The priest Hoshi went about marking their foreheads   
A, Amida, their requiem; 
he counted them in the East End in the last two months,   
fortythree thousand A's. 

Crack, rush, ye mountains, bury your rills! 
Spread your green glass, ocean, over the meadows! 
Scream, avalanche, boulders amok, strangle the dale!   
O ships in the sea's power, O horses 
On shifting roads, in the earth's power, without hoofhold! 
This is the earthquake, this was   
the great earthquake of Genryaku! 

The chapel fell, the abbey, the minster and the small shrines   
fell, their dust rose and a thunder of houses falling.   
O to be birds and fly or dragons and ride on a cloud!   
The earthquake, the great earthquake of Genryaku! 

A child building a mud house against a high wall:   
I saw him crushed suddenly, his eyes hung   
from their orbits like two tassels. 
His father howled shamelessly--an officer.   
I was not abashed at his crying. 

Such shocks continued three weeks; then lessening,   
but still a score daily as big as an average earthquake;   
then fewer, alternate days, a tertian ague of tremors.   
There is no record of any greater. 
It caused a religious revival. 
Months ...   
Years ...   
........... 
Nobody mentions it now. 

This is the unstable world and   
we in it unstable and our houses. 

A poor man living amongst the rich 
gives no rowdy parties, doesnt sing. 
Dare he keep his child at home, keep a dog?   
He dare not pity himself above a whimper. 

But he visits, he flatters, he is put in his place,   
he remembers the patch on his trousers.   
His wife and sons despise him for being poor.   
He has no peace. 

If he lives in an alley of rotting frame houses 
he dreads a fire. 
If he commutes he loses his time 
and leaves his house daily to be plundered by gunmen. 
The bureaucrats are avaricious. 
He who has no relatives in the Inland Revenue,   
poor devil! 

Whoever helps him enslaves him 
and follows him crying out: Gratitude!   
If he wants success he is wretched.   
If he doesnt he passes for mad. 

Where shall I settle, what trade choose   
that the mind may practise, the body rest? 

My grandmother left me a house 
but I was always away 
for my health and because I was alone there. 
When I was thirty I couldnt stand it any longer,   
I built a house to suit myself: 
one bamboo room, you would have thought it a cartshed,   
poor shelter from snow or wind. 
It stood on the flood plain. And that quarter 
is also flooded with gangsters. 

One generation 
I saddened myself with idealistic philosophies, 
but before I was fifty 
I perceived there was no time to lose, 
left home and conversation. 
Among the cloudy mountains of Ohara 
spring and autumn, spring and autumn, spring and autumn,   
emptier than ever. 

The dew evaporates from my sixty years,   
I have built my last house, or hovel,   
a hunter's bivouac, an old 
silkworm's cocoon: 
ten feet by ten, seven high: and I, 
reckoning it a lodging not a dwelling,   
omitted the usual foundation ceremony. 

I have filled the frames with clay,   
set hinges at the corners; 
easy to take it down and carry it away 
when I get bored with this place. 
Two barrowloads of junk 
and the cost of a man to shove the barrow,   
no trouble at all. 

Since I have trodden Hino mountain 
noon has beaten through the awning 
over my bamboo balcony, evening 
shone on Amida. 
I have shelved my books above the window, 
lute and mandolin near at hand, 
piled bracken and a little straw for bedding, 
a smooth desk where the light falls, stove for bramblewood.   
I have gathered stones, fitted 
stones for a cistern, laid bamboo 
pipes. No woodstack, 
wood enough in the thicket. 

Toyama, snug in the creepers! 
Toyama, deep in the dense gully, open   
westward whence the dead ride out of Eden   
squatting on blue clouds of wistaria. 
(Its scent drifts west to Amida.) 

Summer? Cuckoo's Follow, follow--to   
harvest Purgatory hill! 
Fall? The nightgrasshopper will 
shrill Fickle life! 
Snow will thicken on the doorstep, 
melt like a drift of sins. 
No friend to break silence, 
no one will be shocked if I neglect the rite.   
There's a Lent of commandments kept   
where there's no way to break them. 

A ripple of white water after a boat,   
shining water after the boats Mansami saw   
rowing at daybreak 
at Okinoya. 
Between the maple leaf and the caneflower   
murmurs the afternoon--Po Lo-tien   
saying goodbye on the verge of Jinyo river.   
(I am playing scales on my mandolin.) 
Be limber, my fingers, I am going to play Autumn Wind 
to the pines, I am going to play Hastening Brook 
to the water. I am no player 
but there's nobody listening, 
I do it for my own amusement. 

Sixteen and sixty, I and the gamekeeper's boy,   
one zest and equal, chewing tsubana buds,   
one zest and equal, persimmon, pricklypear,   
ears of sweetcorn pilfered from Valley Farm. 

The view from the summit: sky bent over Kyoto,   
picnic villages, Fushimi and Toba: 
a very economical way of enjoying yourself.   
Thought runs along the crest, climbs Sumiyama;   
beyond Kasatori it visits the great church, 
goes on pilgrimage to Ishiyama (no need to foot it!)   
or the graves of poets, of Semimaru who said: 
                      Somehow or other 
                      we scuttle through a lifetime.   
                      Somehow or other 
                      neither palace nor straw-hut   
                      is quite satisfactory. 

Not emptyhanded, with cherryblossom, with red maple   
as the season gives it to decorate my Buddha   
or offer a sprig at a time to chancecomers, home! 

A fine moonlit night, 
I sit at the window with a headful of old verses. 

Whenever a monkey howls there are tears on my cuff. 

Those are fireflies that seem   
the fishermen's lights   
off Maki island. 

A shower at dawn   
sings 
like the hillbreeze in the leaves. 

At the pheasant's chirr I recall 
my father and mother uncertainly. 

I rake my ashes. 
                         Chattering fire, 
soon kindled, soon burned out,   
fit wife for an old man! 

Neither closed in one landscape   
nor in one season 
the mind moving in illimitable   
recollection. 

I came here for a month   
five years ago. 
There's moss on the roof. 

And I hear Soanso's dead   
back in Kyoto. 
I have as much room as I need. 

I know myself and mankind.   
........ 
I dont want to be bothered. 

(You will make me editor   
of the Imperial Anthology?   
I dont want to be bothered.) 

You build for your wife, children,   
cousins and cousins' cousins.   
You want a house to entertain in. 

A man like me can have neither servants nor friends   
in the present state of society. 
If I did not build for myself 
for whom should I build? 

Friends fancy a rich man's riches,   
friends suck up to a man in high office. 
If you keep straight you will have no friends 
but catgut and blossom in season. 

Servants weigh out their devotion 
in proportion to their perquisites   
What do they care for peace and quiet?   
There are more pickings in town. 

I sweep my own floor 
--less fuss. 
I walk; I get tired 
but do not have to worry about a horse. 

My hands and feet will not loiter   
when I am not looking. 
I will not overwork them. 
Besides, it's good for my health. 

My jacket's wistaria flax,   
my blanket hemp, 
berries and young greens   
my food. 

(Let it be quite understood, 
all this is merely personal. 
I am not preaching the simple life   
to those who enjoy being rich.) 

I am shifting rivermist, not to be trusted. 
I do not ask anything extraordinary of myself.   
I like a nap after dinner 
and to see the seasons come round in good order. 

Hankering, vexation and apathy,   
that's the run of the world. 
Hankering, vexation and apathy,   
keeping a carriage wont cure it. 

Keeping a man in livery 
wont cure it. Keeping a private fortress   
wont cure it. These things satisfy no craving,   
Hankering, vexation and apathy ...   

I am out of place in the capital, 
people take me for a beggar, 
as you would be out of place in this sort of life, 
you are so          I regret it         so welded to your vulgarity. 

The moonshadow merges with darkness   
on the cliffpath, 
a tricky turn near ahead. 

Oh! There's nothing to complain about.   
Buddha says: None of the world is good.'   
I am fond of my hut ...   

I have renounced the world;   
have a saintly   
appearance. 

I do not enjoy being poor,   
I've a passionate nature.   
My tongue 
clacked a few prayers.





On Inhabiting an Orange
 

All our roads go nowhere.

Maps are curled

To keep the pavement definitely 

On the world.


All our footsteps, set to make 

Metric advance,

Lapse into arcs in deference 

To circumstance.


All our journeys nearing Space 

Skirt it with care,

Shying at the distances

Present in air.


Blithely travel-stained and worn, 

Erect and sure,

All our travels go forth,

Making down the roads of Earth 

Endless detour.





Ondine
 

At supper time an ondine's narrow feet 
made dark tracks on the hearth. 
Like the heart of a yellow fruit was the fire's heat,   
but they rubbed together quite blue with the cold.   
The sandy hem of her skirt dripped on the floor.   
She sat there with a silvered cedar knot 
for a low stool; and I sat opposite, 
my lips and eyelids hot 
in the heat of the fire. Piling on dry bark, 
seeing that no steam went up from her dark dress,   
I felt uneasiness 
as though firm sand had shifted under my feet   
in the wash of a wave. 

I brought her soup from the stove and she would not eat,   
but sat there crying her cold tears, 
her blue lips quivering with cold and grief. 
She blamed me for a thief, 
saying that I had burned a piece of wood 
the tide washed up. And I said, No, 
the tide had washed it out again; and even so, 
a piece of sodden wood was not so rare 
as polished agate stones or ambergris. 

She stood and wrung her hair 
so that the water made a sudden splash 
on the round rug by the door. I saw her go   
across the little footbridge to the beach. 
After, I threw the knot on the hot coals. 
It fell apart and burned with a white flash, 
a crackling roar in the chimney and dark smoke. 
I beat it out with a poker   
in the soft ash. 

Now I am frightened on the shore at night,   
and all the phosphorescent swells that rise 
come towards me with the threat of her dark eyes   
with a cold firelight in them; 
and crooked driftwood writhes 
in dry sand when I pass. 

Should she return and bring her sisters with her,   
the withdrawing tide 
would leave a long pool in my bed. 
There would be nothing more of me this side   
the melting foamline of the latest wave.




